 Jack Richer, spokesman for a committee of independent directors established to solicit bids for Cineplex Odeon Corp., said the committee's investment advisers are reviewing a number of bids received for the company.  Mr. Richer said he couldn't comment on the number of bids received, their value or any terms or conditions.  He didn't say whether Cineplex Odeon Chairman Garth Drabinsky submitted his own bid for the Toronto-based theater-exhibition chain.  The committee was formed in the wake of a dispute between Mr. Drabinsky and the company's major holder, MCA Inc.  Spokesmen for the committee's investment advisers, RBC Dominion Securities Inc. and Morgan Stanley Canada Ltd., weren't available for comment.  Sources said the advisers may be ready to report on the bids and submit their recommendations to the committee by the end of this week.  Mr. Richer said he didn't know when details would be made public.  Motorola Inc. and Digital Equipment Corp. said they will work together to design and produce a fiber distributed data interface chip.  The alliance between the two technology giants is in a rapidly evolving area of semiconductor design.  Fiber distributed chips allow computers to communicate with each other over optical fibers, which can transmit more information at higher speeds than conventional wiring.  The chips are used to help link networks of high-power, high-speed computers.  The companies said they initially plan to produce a group of four chips.  The chips will be manufactured at Motorola facilities and Digital will purchase a portion of them for its own computers and other products that use optical fibers.  UtiliCorp United Inc. said its earnings for the third quarter are expected to rise 9.7% to $11.3 million, or 45 cents a share, from $10.3 million, or 49 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue should increase 6.7% to $143 million from $134 million, the Kansas City, Mo., utility holding company said.  The company said its average common shares outstanding increased to 20.8 million from 19.7 million in the third quarter of 1988.  The increase is primarily due to a public offering of two million new common shares in August 1988.  In addition, UtiliCorp said that dividends on the convertible preference stock issued in May reduced third-quarter earnings per common share.  For the nine-month period, the company said it expects to earn $34.4 million, or $1.48 a share, up 14% from $30.1 million, or $1.49 a share.  Revenue is expected to rise 23%, to $497 million from $486 million.  The company said that the third quarter reflects milder summer temperatures in the Midwestern region compared with the previous two years.  The company's shares closed yesterday at $19.625, off 25 cents, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Smith Corona Corp., New Canaan, Conn., said it intends to "vigorously defend" itself against a patent- and copyright-infringement lawsuit brought against it by Franklin Computer Corp., Mount Holly, N.J.  The Franklin suit, reported earlier, alleges that two electronic spelling machines made by Smith Cornona violate patents and copyrights on Franklin's hand-held spellers, which appeared in the market several years before Smith Corona's models.  In a statement, Smith Corona said the technology in its spelling machines is "directly derived from the spelling technology used in Smith Corona's typewriters which were introduced long before any Franklin spelling devices existed in the market."  Smith Corona didn't comment on Franklin's charge that it is falsely advertising its spelling-only devices as "dictionaries."  Chairman Lloyd Bentsen of the Senate Finance Committee is considering imposing a tax on the short-term trades of securities by currently tax-free pension funds.  In an interview, the Texas Democrat said he was considering the new levy "among other options" as part of his drive to raise enough taxes to meet deficit-reduction goals this year.  He added that he hasn't made any decision about the pension option.  The notion stems from Sen. Bentsen's interest in encouraging long-range thinking by American business interests and in discouraging short-term trading for quick profits.  "I'm deeply concerned about the churning of stocks and short-term horizons," he said.  "That's been particularly true of the pension managers and some of the tax-free funds."  Sen. Bentsen and his committee soon will begin drafting legislation designed to raise some $5.3 billion in taxes to reduce the budget deficit.  A package of proposals meeting a similar obligation is pending in the House, and is scheduled to be voted on as early as next week.  The House version of the revenue-raising plan, passed last week by the House Ways and Means Committee, doesn't include a similar tax on pension-fund trades.  A proposal to tax pension-fund trading would cause tremors on Wall Street, where such a levy would cut broker commissions by reducing trading.  The tax would also be a clear violation of President Bush's "no tax" pledge.  But the idea would be a shrewd political response by Sen. Bentsen to efforts by Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady to devise measures to discourage short-term thinking by U.S. businesses.  A senior Treasury official said the department hasn't considered any proposals to tax pension funds, and noted that that would clearly violate the president's tax stance.  But some administration officials are sympathetic to the idea.  Taxing pension funds also has bipartisan support on Capitol Hill.  Republican Sen. Nancy Kassebaum of Kansas wrote a column in the New York Times Aug. 30 proposing a 20% capital-gains tax on pension investments held for less than three months.  Under Sen. Kassebaum's proposal, the tax would be reduced each quarter and phased out for assets held more than a year.  Sen. Kassebaum said she sent a copy of the column to Sen. Bentsen last week and received a note from the Finance Committee chairman saying he'd like to discuss the idea with her.  Staff aides to Sen. Kassebaum and Senate Minority Leader Robert Dole (R., Kan.) also met with Treasury officials last week to promote the idea of taxing pension funds.  Cooper Cos. and a group of dissident shareholders agreed to drop lawsuits they had filed against each other earlier this year.  The shareholders, who control 7.18% of the company's stock, had sued the company and seven directors for allegedly "disseminating false and misleading proxy materials" to holders.  The suit, filed Aug. 1 in a federal court in Manhattan, claimed that the directors sought to ensure their re-election by not disclosing the latest financial information about the contact-lens company.  The Palo Alto, Calif., company, in turn, sued the shareholders' group for alleged securities-law violations in its solicitation of proxies for a dissident slate of directors.  Attorneys for the two sides said the agreement to drop the suits didn't involve any settlement by the parties.  But Melvin A. Brosterman, an attorney for Cooper, said the accord stemmed from a board decision to accept the nomination as a director of Moses Marx, a member of the shareholders' group.  However, Greg A. Danilow, an attorney for the shareholders' group, said the suits weren't dropped in return for the nomination of Mr. Marx, who controls 6% of Cooper's stock.  The company's annual meeting, twice postponed, is scheduled for Sept. 27.  Frank B. Hall & Co., Briarcliff Manor, N.Y., said it entered into a definitive agreement to sell one million new convertible preferred shares to its largest shareholder, Reliance Group Holdings Inc., for $50 million.  The insurance brokerage firm said its audit committee approved issuance of the shares without shareholder approval under an exception to New York Stock Exchange rules; the exception permits such action when delay would "seriously jeopardize the financial viability of the enterprise."  Donald Bell, chairman and chief executive officer, said the funds would strengthen Hall's financial position and provide working capital.  About 74% of Hall is held by Reliance Group, controlled by Saul Steinberg.  Hall in August reported a second-quarter loss of $60.8 million, largely because of charges related to discontinued operations.  Dividends on the preferred may be paid in Hall common, an option that will be used for the "foreseeable future," Hall said.  Todd G. Cole, 68 years old, was named vice chairman of this airline holding company's Eastern Airlines unit, a new post.  He previously was chairman and chief executive officer of CIT Financial Corp., from which he retired in 1986.  Mr. Cole was Eastern's vice chairman during the 1960s and has served on Eastern's board since June.  H. Glen Leason, 64 years old, a California securities-firm executive, was elected chairman and Ronald S. Tucker, 50, a lawyer, was elected a director of this computer software firm.  They succeeded Charles F. Smith and Robert A. Rademacher, who didn't stand for re-election.  The Securities and Exchange Commission said it completed the settlement of insider trading charges with Carl Karcher Enterprises Inc., its chairman, Carl N. Karcher, and six members of his family.  The defendants had agreed in July to pay $664,000 to settle the charges.  Federal Judge Edward Rafeedie entered a final judgment of a permanent injunction, disgorgement and imposition of civil penalties against the defendants.  Each of the defendants consented to the entry of the judgment without admitting or denying the allegations of insider trading.  The complaint had alleged that Mr. Karcher conveyed inside information about a plunge in the fast-food chain's profit in 1984 to four of his children, Margaret J. LeVecke, Catherine Karcher-Everly, Jerome Karcher and Barbara Karcher Wall, and two of his sons-in-law, Daniel Everly and Donald E. Fergus Jr., who then sold their common shares in the company.  Carl N. Karcher isn't alleged to have sold any stock at that time.  The final judgment requires Carl N. Karcher to pay a one-time penalty of $332,122.50, Mrs. LeVecke to disgorge $97,500, the Everlys to disgorge $34,375, Jerome Karcher to disgorge $72,500, Mrs. Wall to disgorge $63,873.75, and Mr. Fergus to disgorge $63,873.75.  Alvin A. DeShano, the company's director of accounting, settled for $24,772 in August.  M. Jeffrey Branman has been named managing director of this investment banking company that specializes in retailing and merchandising.  He had been a vice president in the mergers and acquisitions group of the First Boston Corp. unit of CS First Boston Inc., New York.  Craig B. Tate was named to the new post of vice president, global business development, at this household and personal products company.  He had been vice president, world-wide marketing.  James Figura was named vice president, consumer research and insights, expanding his previous duties as director of marketing research.  David A. Metzler was named president of the Colgate Latin America division, a new post.  He had been vice president in charge of the division.  Alois D. Juliber was named to the new post of president of the Colgate Far East and Canada divisions.  She had been vice president of the Far East division.  Kimbark Oil & Gas Co. and Hallador Exploration Co. completed a merger in which Kimbark is issuing about 25.5 million common shares in exchange for Hallador's outstanding shares.  The swap gives former Hallador holders a 62% stake in the combined equity of the two companies.  Officials of Denver-based Kimbark said they expect that the company's preferred stock will be converted into 6.8 million common shares after its annual meeting, set for Dec. 12.  They said they expect Kimbark's convertible note owed to investors in Harco, a Hallador affiliate, will be converted into 1.5 million common shares.  Combined proved reserves of the oil and gas exploration company as of June 30 were estimated by a company spokesman at 800,000 barrels of oil and 15 million cubic feet of natural gas with a present pretax value exceeding $17 million.  Norton Co. said it fired its director of advanced-ceramics research, alleging he stole trade secrets.  In a brief statement, the company said it filed a lawsuit in federal district court in Boston against its former manager, Chien-Min Sung, "charging him with misappropriation of trade secrets and other proprietary information for his own benefit and the benefit of other parties."  General Electric Co., Mr. Sung's former employer, joined Norton in filing the suit against Mr. Sung and also alleges that he stole trade secrets, Norton said.  Norton added that a "legal investigation" is under way on the matter but declined to elaborate on it.  A company spokesman said no criminal charges have been filed against Mr. Sung.  Mr. Sung, reached at home, said: "The charges have no grounds.  They say I had some proprietary documents of theirs at home.  I had to bring some documents home related to my work but they have them now.  I don't know why they are bringing these charges."  Norton hired Mr. Sung, an expert in synthetic-diamond research, in 1984.  He formerly worked at a Norton facility in Utah in research on industrial diamonds and was recently moved to Massachusetts to oversee advanced-ceramics research.  Mr. Sung said he also was involved in diamond research at GE.  Norton makes sandpaper and other abrasives, diamond tools, specialty plastics and ceramics.  The company's advanced-ceramics business conducts research on ceramic engine components, military armor made with ceramics and other ceramic products.  Kroger Co., Cincinnati, estimated that its identical store sales and operating cash flow from continuing units for the third quarter were ahead of the year-ago quarter.  In last year's third quarter, Kroger earned $56.2 million, or 65 cents a share, on sales of $5.58 billion.  William J. Sinkula, the supermarket chain's chief financial officer, said results for the first 13 weeks of the 16-week quarter indicate strong sales momentum and expense control accomplished in the first half of the year.  He said sales from identical stores are running more than 5% ahead of the year-ago quarter's performance, and operating cash flow for the quarter is expected to be at least 20% ahead of the $197 million generated the year earlier.  Results for the latest quarter will be released Oct. 16.  The news that troubled Campeau Corp. will get a cash infusion from Canada's Olympia & York Development Inc. helped to spark a spirited rally in the junk bond market.  Campeau said Olympia & York agreed to provide a $250 million loan, enough to tide over Campeau while it restructures, and enabling its Federated and Allied department stores to meet payments to suppliers and creditors.  Although junk bond prices were higher across the board, the so-called "high quality" junk bonds picked up the biggest gains, with some rising as many as three points, or about $30 for each $1,000 face amount.  While those are impressive gains, they represent only a portion of the market's loses from last week when junk issues fell about five points.  The high-yield bond market was thrown into turmoil last week when Campeau disclosed it was running short of cash.  But, "at least for now, the downward pressure on prices appears to have subsided," said Frank V. Colombo, director of high-yield research at Dillon Read & Co.  The biggest gainers, he said, were companies such as RJR Holdings, Kroger and Quantum Chemicals, which are considered among the financially stronger junk bond issuers.  The Campeau announcement triggered price gains in the bonds of other retailers as well, including R.H. Macy & Co., whose 14 1/2% subordinated debentures due 2001 traded late at 101, up about two points.  RJR Holdings' 14.7% convertible pay-in-kind securities maturing in 2009 jumped 3 1/2 to close at 99 while Kroger's 12 7/8% senior subordinated debentures due 1999 rose one point to 104.  The bonds of Campeau's Federated unit, among the worse hit in last week's sell off, recouped some loses but remain at extremely low levels.  Federated's 16% senior subordinated debentures due 2000 were bid at 61 yesterday after being quoted in the mid-50s late last week.  "The Campeau news certainly helped, but we reached a point where many bargain hunters believed prices had hit the bottom," said Peter Avelar, portfolio manager of the PaineWebber High Yield Bond Fund.  He said: "The sellers have been forced out already," including some large junk bond mutual funds that sold portions of their holdings last week to raise cash to meet redemption needs.  As the junk bond market gained momentum, some potential buyers complained of a growing scarcity of supply.  Said one money manager: "The illiquidity on the upside is as bad as the illiquidity on the down side."  It was a busy day for bonds in other markets as well.  In the municipal market, more than $1 billion of new tax-exempt notes and bonds were issued yesterday.  Treasury prices, after rising in early trading, ended narrowly mixed.  Mortgage-backed securities gained 1/32 to 2/32.  Meanwhile, the World Bank's $1.5 billion debut in the federal agency debt market "was several times oversubscribed, easily," according to World Bank Treasurer Don Roth.  The 10-year global bonds, a new type of security that will be denominated in dollars and traded globally on a 24-hour basis, were priced at 8 3/8% at 99.55 to yield 8.44%.  The yield was about .375 percentage point above the outstanding 10-year Treasury note, tighter than some traders had expected.  When secondary trading began, the notes traded at a premium, another sign of strong demand.  The offering was made simultaneously in the U.S. and Europe through an international syndicate led by Salomon Brothers Inc. and Deutsche Bank Capital Markets Ltd.  Treasury, Agency Securities  Treasurys ended narrowly mixed after retracing earlier gains.  Bond prices moved higher yesterday morning after the Department of Labor reported better-than-expected inflation statistics and lower-than-expected housing starts data.  "The news was bullish for the market," said James Capra, a vice president at Shearson Lehman Government Securities Inc.  But Treasury bonds fell later in the day as dealers began selling Treasury securities in an effort to hedge against the World Bank's $1.5 billion 10-year notes offering.  The benchmark 30-year Treasury bond was quoted late at a price of 100 9/32 to yield 8.09% compared with 100 10/32 to yield 8.085% Monday.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted late at 99 10/32 to yield 8.08% compared with 99 09/32 to yield 8.086% Monday.  Short-term interest rates rose slightly.  The discount rate on three-month Treasury bills was quoted at 7.73% for a bond equivalent yield of 7.97% while the rate on six-month Treasury bills was 7.68% for a yield of 8.08%.  Elsewhere, Financing Corp. said it accepted a bid from Salomon Brothers Inc. to purchase $665 million of 8.60% 30-year bonds at a weighted price of 99.698 and a weighted yield of 8.628%.  Looking ahead, analysts said they don't expect any surprises in today's release of the Federal Reserve's latest edition of the so-called "Tan Book."  The Tan Book is an official summary of the economic reports by the Fed's 12 district banks that is prepared before a meeting of the Federal Open Market Committee.  The Fed's policy-making arm will next convene on Oct. 3.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Mortgage securities ended another quiet session with gains of 1/32 to 2/32.  Trading was light in both the passthrough sector and the derivative securities market, which had been active during the past week because of heavy issuance of real estate mortgage investment conduits.  Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities for October delivery ended at 97 25/32, up 2/32; 9 1/2% securities at 99 27/32, up 2/32; and Federal Home Loan Mortage Corp. 9% securities at 96 29/32, up 1/32.  The Ginnie Mae 9s were yielding 9.44% as the spread above the 10-year Treasury note held at 1.37 percentage points.  The 10-year note was up about 3/32 at 99 15/32.  Municipals  Swamped by the pricing of more than $1 billion in new long-term issues, municipal bonds posted session losses of as much as 7/8 point and were markedly underperforming U.S. Treasurys.  Symptomatic of the underperformance, December municipal futures slipped 15/32 to 92 3/32, while December T-bond futures lost only 2/32 to end the afternoon session at 97 8/32.  A two-part Dormitory Authority of the State of New York borrowing, totaling more than $874 million, dominated the long-term arena yesterday.  Lazard Freres & Co. was the lead underwriter.  The offering includes about $692.1 million of State University Educational Facilities revenue bonds priced to yield from 6.3% in 1991 to 7.52% in 2015.  There were also $182.2 million of special obligation bonds due 1989, priced to yield from 5.9% in 1990 to 7% in 2003-2007.  In the secondary market, New Jersey Turnpike Authority 7.2% issue of 2018 was locked at 97 1/8, down 3/8 on the bid side and yielding about 7.44%.  Late Monday, the bonds were quoted at 97 1/2 to 97 3/4, where they yielded about 7.39%.  Foreign Bonds  Helped by profit-taking on short positions, the Japanese government bond market ended firmer Tuesday.  Some Japanese institutional investors closed their short positions in the futures market to take profits after recent declines, according to traders.  In a short sale, dealers sell borrowed securities and later seek to make a profit by buying the securities back a lower price to replace what was borrowed.  As a result, Japan's benchmark No. 111 4.6% bond due 1998 ended on brokers' screens at 95.75, up 0.43.  The yield fell to 5.31%.  However, this rebound is just a temporary recovery, said one dealer, echoing bearish sentiment expressed by other participants recently.  Either the yen will weaken further, as many analysts believe, or the Bank of Japan will boost interest rates to defend the yen as well as quell domestic inflationary pressures.  In either case, the yen bond market will weaken, the dealer said.  Elsewhere:  -- In London, prices of British government bonds ended slightly lower.  Britain's benchmark Treasury 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 fell 6/32 to 113 17/32 to yield 9.88% while the Treasury's 11 3/4% notes due 1991 were unchanged at 99 10/32 to yield 12.26%.  -- West German government bonds ended as much as 0.30 point higher.  Bonn's 6 3/4% bond due June 1999 ended 0.15 point higher at 98.90 to yield 6.90% while the 6 3/4% notes due 1994 are up the same amount at 98.775 and yield 7.05%.  Corporate Issues  Investment-grade corporate bonds ended unchanged in quiet trading.  There were no new issues.  AIRCOA HOTEL PARTNERS L.P. said it will make a special distribution of $1.90 a Class A unit on Oct. 16 to stock of record Sept. 29.  The Denver hotel master limited partnership said the distribution is contingent on the completion of the sale of the Kona Village Resort for $55 million.  The sale is scheduled to close next Tuesday.  Aircoa said its partnership agreement requires it to distribute a portion of the proceeds from the sale of hotel or resort properties if the gain is $1 or more per Class A unit.  Because of the special distribution, Aircoa said the distribution for the third and fourth quarters of this year will be 57 cents a unit, compared with previous distributions of 60 cents a unit.  WHO'S NEWS: William G. Moll, president of the Television Bureau of Advertising, was named vice president and general manager of WNBC, the New York station owned by General Electric Co.'s National Broadcasting Co.  He succeeds Carl (Bud) Carey, who resigned in June to become president of Times Mirror Broadcasting.  International Business Machines Corp. introduced an array of products aimed at helping corporate customers write software faster.  Customers and consultants generally welcomed the announcement, because the difficulties faced by mainframe programmers have left most data-processing departments with a two-year to three-year backlog of software work.  Down the road, the announcement is likely to energize the market for computer-aided-software-engineering (CASE) tools.  Moreover, if companies really do produce additional software, that will create demand for additional hardware.  "CASE has been very slow to take off, because there were a lot of products, but nobody was big enough to set a standard," said Esther Dyson, editor of Release 1.0, an industry newsletter.  "IBM's blessing means a lot."  Still, even IBM acknowledged that the products aren't a quick fix.  George Conrades, the executive in charge of the Armonk, N.Y., computer giant's U.S. marketing operations, said most customers he's talked to think it will take three to five years for them to implement and fully benefit from the IBM strategy.  Some customers also said they thought IBM's announcement left many holes that it will have to fill in to make the effort really useful.  "I'm a supporter of the efforts, and this is a good first step, but I need more," said George DiNardo, an executive vice president at Mellon Bank in Pittsburgh.  The crux of the announcement is the Repository, a database that will become available next June.  The Repository will hold information that all of an organization's programmers will draw on and that will discipline the writing of software.  The information will include such things as who gets access to certain types of data and how numbers should be presented on a screen.  The Repository also will store data on what software a company has written, so someone on the East Coast doesn't waste time writing some code that a West Coast programmer has already written.  Richard Carpenter, chief executive officer of Index Technology Corp. and one of the early players in the CASE industry, said the Repository will reduce the fragmentation in the CASE field.  Mr. Carpenter, whose company has a marketing and development relationship with IBM, said that CASE developers will find that their products can work with those of other companies if all of them just make products that mesh with the Repository.  He likened the situation to that of Federal Express, which found it far more efficient to route overnight packages through Memphis, Tenn., rather than to arrange flights from each city in the U.S. to every other city.  IBM also announced several products that address the various other parts of the software-development process.  DevelopMate, which lets companies produce prototypes of the software they're designing, will be available in December 1990.  A new version of IBM's Cross System Product, which generates software code, will be available in November 1990.  The Software Analysis Test Tool, which helps manage the testing process, will be available in March.  IBM also announced that three companies in which it recently invested -- Index, Bachman Information Systems Inc. and KnowledgeWare Inc. -- would make their existing products mesh with the Repository and the other tools, which IBM is collectively calling AD/Cycle.  The companies' products, among the more successful ones on the market, mainly help in the early stages of software development, such as modeling, planning, analysis and design.  IBM said it will work with several systems integrators, which customers could hire to come in and do the application development work for them.  IBM also established a consulting practice that will offer a similar service.  Earl Wheeler, the IBM vice president responsible for AD/Cycle, lamented the fact that most programming is still done using languages that were around when he entered the business 31 years ago.  "Most programmers who wouldn't dream of using a machine that is 10 years old are still using programs that are much older," Mr. Wheeler said.  CASE researchers have said that most programmers generate an average of just 10 lines of code a day, and that many companies have resisted using CASE tools both because senior management isn't sure of the benefits and because programmers think of themselves more as artists than as engineers.  That resistance will be hard to break down, but IBM's decision to bring its considerable weight to bear on the problem should greatly accelerate the process.  Mr. Conrades, the IBM marketing executive, said that better use of CASE tools will hardly mean that the application backlog will disappear, because there are plenty of other things that corporations would attempt if they cleared their plates of what's on them now.  "It's a glass that never drains," he said.  And if customers solve their development problems, he added, "we'll sell a ton of hardware and software and additional services."  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, IBM shares closed at $116, down 12.5 cents.  More than three years have passed since John Lehman sat in his observation post at the Pentagon and listened to U.S. bombers pounding Libyan air bases into dust.  Now he sits at a desk high above Sixth Avenue, planning a different kind of raid.  The former Navy secretary is part of a PaineWebber investment-banking squad that is scouring the ranks of the nation's defense contractors, seeking possible targets for takeovers and restructurings.  "There will be consolidation world-wide" in the defense industry, predicts Jack Modzelewski, a Rockwell defector who is a member of the seven-member PaineWebber team.  The resulting mergers and other deals could mean handsome profits for investors who choose the right defense stocks, analysts say.  Hostile bids and foreign suitors are rare on the military scene, of course.  And takeover speculators of all stripes have been shaken by recent tremors in the junk-bond market.  After the dust settles, however, the Street expects to see a number of strategic acquisitions of defense companies.  "For the first time in a long time, assets are undervalued" in the defense sector, says Bernard L. Schwartz, the acquisitive chairman of Loral, the defense-electronics concern.  "Not since I have been in the business have I seen such an attractive situation for making acquisitions."  Contracting scandals and bad cost judgments have combined with a shrinking Pentagon budget to turn the defense stocks into market pariahs.  Many of the issues trade at or near single-digit multiples of the companies' estimated 1989 earnings.  General Dynamics, for example, is trading at less than 8 times this year's profit estimate from Shearson Lehman Hutton, well below the 13 multiple for the Standard & Poor's 500.  Grumman trades at 11 times estimated earnings, while Martin Marietta's multiple is below 9.  Some defense stocks trade below their asset values, seemingly making them takeover bait.  Michael Metz, market strategist for Oppenheimer & Co., says defense-budget cutbacks will leave the companies with scant reason to increase capital spending, but their cash flow remains strong.  It all adds up to a rocket-fuel formula that he thinks should send some of the stocks off into the wild blue yonder in takeovers.  Mr. Metz says investment bankers and possible suitors are probably looking at Tech-Sym, General Dynamics, Whitehall, Grumman and United Technologies, whose Pratt & Whitney aircraft-engine business is one segment of a sprawling conglomerate.  Raiders have been cautious so far, however, because of the industry's ties to the Pentagon and some members of Congress.  Most takeovers of defense companies will be portrayed as friendly.  "Totally neutral" is the way Loral's Mr. Schwartz describes the Defense Department's attitude toward inter-industry marriages.  Some analysts think Loral might pursue E-Systems of Dallas.  Much of E-Systems' allure lies in its "coded communications, spy-plane avionics -- 25% of their business is pure James Bond kind of stuff," says Shearson's Gary J. Reich.  Loral focuses on a different area of defense electronics, namely communications and electronic-defense systems.  From 1984 through 1988, ESystems sales rose 85% while operating profit increased only 21%, Mr. Modzelewski says.  E-Systems holders might demand that a suitor pay at least 50 for their shares, which closed yesterday at 34 1/8.  Another company well-positioned for the industry change to more surveillance and less armament is Watkins-Johnson.  "It is a well-managed company with strong underlying cash flow," says Oppenheimer's Lior Bregman.  It has businesses in intelligence, microwave and semiconductor components, and recently acquired a company that measures water contamination.  Cash flow -- defined as operating profit plus depreciation, minus expenses for equipment -- is a strong $5 a share.  At midyear the company had $27 million in cash and long-term debt of only $22 million, Mr. Bregman says.  The shares are worth 45 on a takeover basis, he says; they closed yesterday at 25 1/8.  Grumman would make a nice fit with a larger aerospace concern, such as Boeing, says Shearson's Mr. Reich: "Boeing would acquire fighter-plane expertise."  Some think Grumman shares, at 21 1/2 yesterday, could fetch 35 in a takeover.  But a suitor might wait for Grumman to hit the skids and ask for federal assistance before assuming its heavy debts.  More than 20% of General Dynamics is owned by the Crown family of Chicago, which analysts believe might sell to an aggressive bidder.  The highly diversified company makes submarines, fighter planes, tanks and missiles.  Again, a merger might require federal aid because of the company's heavy liabilities.  Dallas investor Harold Simmons holds nearly 10% of Lockheed, but many analysts think he is merely hoping to attract a larger buyer, such as Ford, Rockwell International, Chrysler or Boeing.  PaineWebber's Mr. Modzelewski says "the numbers work well into the 70s" for a takeover of Lockheed -- at 48 3/8 yesterday -- "but you are still dealing in time frames of over a year."  A final caveat comes from Jonathan de L. Squires, senior vice president at Kleinwort Benson: "If there is no takeover," he warns, "what is supporting the earnings of a Whitehall, Tech-Sym or Watkins-Johnson?  They are vulnerable to a shrinking defense budget."  Oil prices declined as concern receded that members of the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries might clash at next week's meeting.  Market participants expect the gathering of oil producers to be uneventful.  Reports that Saudi Arabian Oil Minister Hisham Nazer won't be attending the meeting due to illness has disappointed some traders who had been expecting the Saudis to vent their frustrations over quota violations.  OPEC has been consistently producing beyond its 19.5 million daily quota since the oil ministers met last June.  In fact, production may have exceeded 21 million to 22 million barrels a day at certain times in recent weeks.  "Even if they decide to increase their quota at the meeting, they'll still be producing beyond their allotment," said Andrew Lebow, analyst for E.D. & F. Man International Futures Inc. whose remarks echoed similar comments from traders who said it's unlikely any OPEC action will really change the actual supply and demand situation.  Hurricane jitters are also declining as it becomes clear that one of the most powerful tropical storms of recent years is unlikely to hit any of the refineries located along the coast in the Gulf of Mexico.  Caribbean refineries that have already been lashed by the storm appear to have escaped with minimal damage.  The only remaining concern is that gasoline shipments along the East Coast could be disrupted if Hurricane Hugo slams into that shoreline.  Also weighing prices down is a temporary glut of heating oil supplies in New York Harbor.  Market participants report that major oil companies are selling the home heating fuel at a discount of up to one cent a gallon to futures prices.  Crude oil prices for delivery during October may become especially vulnerable to declines because several refineries will be closed for scheduled maintenance turnarounds.  As a result, demand for crude would decline temporarily.  Crude for October delivery yesterday fell 32 cents a barrel to $19.56 in moderate to heavy trading action.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  COPPER: Futures prices fell after a sharp early advance.  The December contract settled at $1.2595 a pound, down 1.75 cents.  The December contract traded as high as $1.2990, up 3.20 cents from Monday.  However, the most dramatic turnaround was in the spot September contract, which will cease trading Sept. 27.  At first it traded up to a new life-of-contract high of $1.4050, then dropped to end at $1.37, for a net loss of 0.80 cent.  The price retreat began following an announcement by the Commodity Exchange that its margin committee has raised the original margin requirement, or good faith money, for the September contract to its full value from $2,600 for each speculative contract and $2,000 for each hedge contract.  Based on $1.4050 a pound, which prevailed in the September contract prior to the issuance of the margin notice, each 25,000-pound futures contract would have been worth $35,125.  The September contract has been at a premium over December since the beginning of the month as Commodity Exchange warehouse stocks of copper for delivery against September have dwindled, said John Gross, president of J.E. Gross & Associates, a New City, N.Y., industry consulting firm.  "The premium has risen from 3.3 cents on Sept. 1 to 11.05 cents yesterday, with the September settlement price of $1.37, compared with December at $1.2595," he said.  Yesterday, Comex copper warehouse stocks fell by 1,156 tons to 11,987 tons.  Mr. Gross observed that the open interest, or the number of contracts remaining to be nullified by an opposite trade or fulfilled by delivery of copper, at 3,750 contracts yesterday was equal to 46,875 tons, or about three times the amount of copper in storage for delivery against the September contract.  "With that kind of discrepancy, one would have to believe that the majority of the buying of contracts has to be by traders who'd previously sold in anticipation that prices would go down," he said.  GRAINS and SOYBEANS: The prices of most corn and wheat futures contracts dipped amid continued speculation that the Soviet Union might skip its usual autumn buying binge of U.S. grains.  The speculation was touched off last week by a top Soviet trade official's remarks that it doesn't need to import grain for the remainder of the year.  Most U.S. analysts are skeptical -- the Soviet Union has long depended on imports to meet its internal food needs and might be trying to depress the prices of the grains it needs.  Remarks by other Soviet officials seem to indicate that it will continue to be a major purchaser of world crops.  But analysts are nonetheless jittery: the Soviet purchases are one of the biggest price-moving developments to occur in the fall, and prices would dip sharply if the Soviet Union actually didn't buy U.S. grain for the rest of the year.  That would help Soviet agriculture officials avoid the political embarrassment of importing massive amounts of crops at a time when they are trying to encourage more production from Soviet farmers with cash bonuses.  Indeed, there is speculation that the management of the Soviet Union's importing arm is being changed, and that this reflects a new import policy.  SUGAR: Futures prices dropped slightly from Monday's strong gains.  The October contract ended with a loss of 0.09 cent a pound at 14.27 cents.  One analyst said Hurricane Hugo had bypassed Cuba and that, as concern over possible damage to sugar-growing areas on that island diminished, so did demand for contracts.  However, he noted, there is increasing belief that India, after having rejected offers three times recently, will buy sugar on the world market this week, along with several other countries.  "This spate of anticipated demand was sufficient to provide some support and minimize reaction from Hurricane Hugo," the analyst said.  The House Labor Committee approved a measure that raises the minimum wage to $4.25 an hour over two years and that sets a 60-day subminimum training wage for employees with less than two month's working experience.  Last June, the president vetoed a bill that would have increased the minimum wage to $4.55 an hour over three years and set a 60-day subminimum training wage for first-time workers.  President Bush has insisted he will veto legislation that sets the wage floor higher than $4.25 an hour over three years.  He also says the measure must permit new employees in minimum-wage jobs to be paid a training wage for six months.  The Democratic sponsors of the new measure say they compromised by limiting the increase to $4.25, but that they refuse to compromise further on the training wage.  In a statement yesterday, Labor Secretary Elizabeth Dole reiterated Mr. Bush's promise to veto any bill that raises the minimum wage to more than $4.25 an hour in less than three years or that establishes a training wage for less than six months.  The bill approved yesterday by voice vote would increase the minimum wage by 45 cents in January 1990 and another 45 cents in January 1991.  The minimum wage has been $3.35 an hour since 1981.  The full House is expected to consider the measure within two weeks.  Although the bill is expected to pass, congressional aides say it's uncertain whether it will attract the two-thirds vote needed to override a veto.  In August, the Senate Labor Committee passed the same bill the president vetoed last June, but Senate Democrats are expected to modify the measure when it's considered on the floor.  Avon Products Inc. cut its forecast of 1989 earnings, prompting speculation on Wall Street that the company may soon be a takeover target again.  James Preston, chairman and chief executive officer of Avon, said in a statement that weak sales and the strong U.S. dollar have prompted the company to reduce its forecast of 1989 per-share earnings to a range of $1.95 to $2.15, down from an earlier estimate of $2.30 to $2.40 a share.  Avon, primarily a door-to-door sales concern, said its new gift and jewelry products are posting disappointing sales, a trend expected to continue as the key Christmas selling season starts.  Non-cosmetic products account for about half of Avon's fourth-quarter sales.  The trend appears so significant that the company has also reduced its 1990 earnings estimates below the $3.35 to $3.45 it previously forecast.  Avon has decided not to make any new projections for 1990 earnings at this time.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Avon closed at $31.75 a share, down $2.125.  The stock reached a 1989 high of $41.25 on May 17.  Earlier this year, Avon rejected takeover bids from Amway Corp. and Minneapolis investor Irwin Jacobs.  At that time, Avon management not only projected increased earnings but stated that Avon shareholders would benefit from cost efficiencies then being implemented.  In August, Mr. Preston met with Mr. Jacobs to discuss Avon's future prospects.  Following that meeting, Mr. Jacobs stated he was happy with the company's direction.  Several Wall Street money managers expressed severe disappointment with Avon management and said they believed Mr. Jacobs, who controls a bit more than 10% of Avon's stock, may now try to make another run at the company.  Mr. Jacobs couldn't be reached for comment.  Jeffrey Ashenberg, an analyst with Dean Witter Reynolds Inc., said that Avon is experiencing what he described as serious roadblocks.  He also questioned whether the company's earnings projections were unduly affected by the bids by Mr. Jacobs and Amway.  "It's conceivable that estimates by management were made in a frenzy to protect itself from hostile takeovers then underway," said Mr. Ashenberg.  "If the disappointment is deep enough another hostile offer may be . . . forthcoming."  Mr. Preston, responding to this criticism, said through a spokesman, "There was no way in May to forecast that the gift and jewelry lines would underperform in the fourth quarter.  We expected continued growth of 4% to 5%, which we could build on by adding sales representatives."  He said the lower-than-expected gift and jewelry sales "will more than offset the expanded sales staff."  Mr. Preston denied that the company made its earnings projections as a response to the bids by Amway or Mr. Jacobs.  Robert Renck, Jr., managing partner at R.L. Renck & Co., said some investors will undoubtedly be disappointed with Avon's performance, but he praised the company for releasing the bad news quickly.  "The real question that comes to mind is whether this is an Avon trend or an indication of what the Christmas selling season is going to be like," he said.  In 1988, profit from continuing operations was $1.70 a fully diluted share.  After a charge related to an accounting change and a loss from discontinued operations, Avon had a loss of $404.5 million for the year.  Have you driven a Ford lately?  Before long, the answer might be yes even if your car is a Jaguar or, perhaps, a Saab.  Ford Motor Co. yesterday jolted the automotive world -- and Britain -- by disclosing that it wants to buy a stake of up to 15% of Britain's leading luxury-car maker, Jaguar PLC.  The announcement came just two weeks after Ford said it was negotiating "closer cooperation" with Sweden's Saab Scania AB.  Other European auto makers -- Group Lotus PLC, Aston Martin Lagonda Ltd., Automobili Lamborghini S.p.A. and Alfa Romeo S.p.A. -- have surrendered their independence in recent years, but now the trend, driven by growing competition, may be shifting into high gear.  Though Ford's overtures to Jaguar and Saab haven't produced any firm deals yet, auto-industry watchers are already wondering who's next.  Prime candidates for an alliance, they suggest, are Britain's Vickers PLC, which makes Rolls-Royce and Bentley cars, and West Germany's Porsche AG.  Some even suggest that Germany's Bayerische Motoren Werke AG, or BMW, might one day need a partner.  All are gilded marques that confer instant status on their owners, especially in the U.S., where sales of European luxury cars boomed in the early 1980s.  But in the last few years, their U.S. sales have plunged, thanks to a lower dollar that made all imports more expensive and to an onslaught of new competition from Japanese luxury cars.  Now, many of Europe's best-known small auto makers -- BMW being the notable exception -- are struggling financially, and unable to spend the huge sums needed to develop and market innovative new models in an increasingly competitive world.  "The European little guys were already losing out as independent competitors before the Japanese came on the {luxury-car} scene," says James Womack, research director of the International Motor Vehicle Program at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology.  "I basically think all the little guys are going to become subsidiaries of the big guys."  Such a shakeout promises to be shaped by individual corporate strategies, executive egos and, not least, by national pride.  Ford's bold bid to buy Italy's Alfa Romeo a couple of years ago got squashed when Fiat S.p.A. came on the scene, and argued that Alfa should be kept in Italian hands.  Likewise, when General Motors Corp. tried to buy the Land Rover and Leyland subsidiaries of state-owned BL PLC three years ago, British politicians howled at the thought of foreigners owning a national institution.  GM backed off.  It isn't clear how British pride might affect Ford's move on Jaguar, but the U.S. auto maker clearly will have to deal with Jaguar's corporate pride first.  Ford's terse announcement was made at around 4 p.m. London time and 11 a.m. EDT in Detroit.  "We believe there are substantial benefits for both companies in a holding that could lay the foundation for a long-term association between Ford and Jaguar," L. Lindsey Halstead, chairman of Ford of Europe, said.  He praised Jaguar as "an outstanding British company with a distinctive product range," and promised that if Ford should eventually gain control, it would keep Jaguar "as a separate and autonomous entity."  Those diplomatic words notwithstanding, the announcement caught Jaguar executives flat-footed.  Though rumors of a possible Ford overture had been circulating since last spring, the executives had no warning of Ford's decision beyond a phone call from the auto maker just before the announcement yesterday.  "I think we are going to remain independent," declared Sir John Egan, the tough-minded Jaguar chairman who was dubbed "England's Lee Iacocca" for rescuing his company from the brink of bankruptcy in 1986.  "I would remind you of the 'golden share' provisions."  The "golden share" is a strong anti-takeover measure.  When the British government sold its stake in Jaguar in 1984, it retained one share that prevents any outside investor, British or foreign, from buying more than 15% of Jaguar without the government's permission.  The golden share expires on Dec. 31, 1990.  It isn't clear how the British government might view Ford's move, but the spate of British acquisitions in the U.S. in recent years might head off outright opposition.  "We look silly if we don't allow Americans to buy here," says David Willetts, director of a London-based think tank with close ties to Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher.  "The last thing you want is to give the economic nationalists in Congress an excuse to be obstructive about British takeovers."  But it is clear that, beneath Sir John's stern words and the golden-share protection, Jaguar's fortunes are slipping badly.  The company recently reported a precipitous decline in pretax profit for the first half of this year to #1.4 million ($2.2 million) from #22.5 million.  In recent months, Sir John has talked to virtually every major car maker about a possible partnership, but found nothing to his liking yet.  Jaguar's problems, and those of Saab as well, illustrate the woes afflicting virtually every one of Europe's small auto makersa situation that contrasts starkly with their huge prosperity earlier in the decade.  Then, a strong dollar made imported goods of all kinds inexpensive to Americans.  The Reagan years -- with their robust stock market and recovery from recession -- made upscale consumption fashionable.  European makes became the cars of choice for a generation of Americans who suddenly had money, but wanted no part of their father's Oldsmobile, Cadillac or Lincoln.  Jaguar's U.S. sales jumped 55% between 1983 and 1986.  During the same period, BMW's American sales surged 63%, Mercedes-Benz's 35%, Porsche's 40% and Saab's 83%.  European auto makers got so bullish on America they expanded their plants.  In early 1984, for example, Saab could produce 105,000 cars a year.  Over the years it kept enlarging its factories, to the point that now it has the capacity to build 180,000 cars annually.  Saab had assumed its sales in the U.S. would continue to grow.  But the world was changing.  In 1985, with the U.S. trade deficit burgeoning, governments of the major industrial nations agreed to drive down the value of the dollar.  The U.S. currency nearly halved in value compared with other major currencies, and suddenly, European cars weren't so affordable any more.  The base sticker price of Saab's 900 four-door sedan in the U.S., for example, has soared 38% in the last four years to $17,515.  The Mercedes 190D with a 2.5-liter engine has jumped in price more than 27% since 1986.  Making matters worse, Japanese auto makers invaded the luxury-car market.  Honda Motor Co. led the way with its Acura division, which sold nearly 53,000 cars in its inaugural year, 1986.  Last year Acura sold more than 128,000 cars, and many were purchased by people who once owned European cars.  One is George Pendergast, who lives in suburban Boston and markets financial services.  Just last month he traded in his 1986 Saab turbo for a new Acura Legend, which carries a sticker price of nearly $27,000.  "One of the things I miss is having that 'ugly' Saab around," says Mr. Pendergast, who concedes he grew fond of the Swedish car's quirky shape.  But he says he found the Acura far more comfortable, with a much smoother ride.  The Japanese threat to the Europeans is only getting worse.  Last month Toyota Motor Corp. launched its luxury Lexus line in the U.S., and in November Nissan Motor Co. is unveiling its Infiniti models.  The Japanese offer technologically advanced cars that get completely re-engineered every four to five years.  The big change on European models, in contrast, tends to be their price tags; the Europeans often make only minor physical changes in their cars for the better part of a decade.  Jaguar's 1988 model XJ6 luxury sedan, for example, is the only car the auto maker completely re-engineered during the 1980s.  This year, to boost lagging U.S. sales, the company is introducing a stripped-down variation of the car, which will come without a sun roof, fancy suspension system and full-scale walnut interior trim.  The price is $39,700, compared with the regular XJ6's $44,000.  But even the "bargain" Jaguar costs more than the top-of-the-line Lexus and Infiniti models.  The Europeans' problem: the huge sums it takes to develop new cars and bring them to market.  Small auto makers must spread those development costs -- which can run in the billions -- over a thin sales base.  For years, the small European companies assumed they never had to bother with frequent make-overs of their products.  Now they know better, but simply don't have the money.  Access to cash, and to technical talent, is what Ford is dangling before Jaguar.  "We could help strengthen Jaguar in areas like advanced technological design and development, manufacturing processes and world-wide marketing," said Ford's Mr. Halstead, "by offering full access to our technical and financial resources in Britain and around the world."  What Ford appears to want in return from Jaguar and Saab is snob appeal.  Ford has a distinctly middle-brow image, both in the U.S. and Europe.  Its effort to ship some of its European-made Fords into the U.S. and sell them under the pricey Merkur label has bombed.  "Ford hasn't got any $40,000 to $50,000 cars in the U.S.," says David Healy, auto analyst with Drexel Burnham Lambert.  "This is an easy way to associate themselves with a luxury-car producer that can broaden their product mix."  Ford's risk, though, is in possibly buying a couple of losers.  "I don't see sales turning around for the Europeans," says Edward J. Sullivan, who tracks the auto industry for the WEFA Group, a consulting firm in Bala Cynwyd, Pa.  "I don't see what Ford is going to gain.  They would be throwing {Jaguar} right into the teeth of Lexus and Infiniti."  It's uncertain how the battle for Jaguar will play out, or even if there's to be a battle.  Ford is already bracing for political repercussions in Britain, where Jaguar is a national symbol.  At a news briefing, Ford executives wrapped themselves in the British flag as a pre-emptive move.  "We are the biggest British car maker," said Derek Barron, a native Londoner and chairman of Ford's U.K. subsidiary.  After breaking their news to Jaguar's Sir John in a phone call yesterday, Ford officials instructed their investment bankers to start buying Jaguar stock.  Ford's purchases didn't exceed $15 million, says Bruce Blythe, vice president of business strategy for Ford's European operations.  That's enough to buy just over 1% of Jaguar.  Jaguar shares surged after the Ford announcement Tuesday in very heavy volume on London's Stock Exchange.  Some 8% of the company's shares changed hands, and the price closed at 467 pence ($7.33), up 62 pence (97 cents).  Jaguar could command a total price of about $1.4 billion, said Andrew Chambers, an analyst at Nomura Research Institute in London, a securities firm.  Under U.S. law, Ford can't buy more than $15 million worth of Jaguar stock for the next 30 days, Mr. Blythe explained.  But after that, Ford could raise its stake to 15%.  Jaguar's board, meanwhile, is expected to meet this week to map strategy.  The company so far is keeping its options open.  "Let's get our breath back," said a Jaguar spokesman yesterday.  "We only got {word of} this this afternoon."  WELLS FARGO & Co., San Francisco, said it increased the dividend on its common shares 20% to 90 cents from 75 cents, payable Oct. 20 to stock of record Sept. 30.  The bank-holding company declined to comment on why it raised the dividend.  Wells Fargo has had strong recent profit growth, driven largely by its success in tapping into California's strong banking market.  For the six months ended June 30, Wells Fargo had net income of $288.9 million, or $5.24 a share.  In New York Stock Exchange trading yesterday, Wells Fargo shares closed at $88.375, down 37.5 cents.  CAMPEAU REACHED a definitive accord in which it will cede substantial control to Olympia & York in return for a $250 million loan.  Olympia & York also will supervise a major restructuring of the Toronto-based retail and real estate concern.  Apparel makers, many of which halted shipments to Campeau-owned stores last week, had mixed reactions.  Junk-bond prices staged a partial recovery following news of the Campeau bailout.  The market was thrown into turmoil last week by disclosures about the company's financial woes.  ---  Consumer prices held steady in August, the first time in over three years they didn't rise.  A drop in energy costs kept prices in check, though economists remain wary about inflation.  Housing starts plunged 5%, the biggest slide in six months.  ---  American Airlines proposed sizable fare increases that would take effect next week if competitors match the move.  Most carriers were still studying the plan late yesterday.  ---  Short-term securities trades by pension funds could be taxed under a plan being considered by Senate Finance Chairman Bentsen.  The levy is "among other options" under review to raise revenue, Bentsen said.  ---  Ford Motor disclosed it wants to buy up to 15% of British luxury-car maker Jaguar.  Ford also is negotiating an alliance with Sweden's Saab.  The moves come amid a growing consolidation of Europe's car industry.  ---  MGM Grand plans to build a movie theme park as well as a 4,000-room hotel in Las Vegas.  The Kirk Kerkorian-owned firm also sued Walt Disney over use of the name "MGM Grand" for a movie theme park.  ---  Upjohn's prescription drug Halcion is being investigated for safety by the FDA. Halcion is the most widely prescribed sleeping agent in the world.  ---  Australian financier Alan Bond announced a series of moves to ease the financial strains on his flagship company, including the sale of half of his Australian brewery empire.  --- A fiscal 1990 deficit plan isn't likely to clear Congress in time to avoid automatic budget reductions next month, officials say.  But Congress is expected to restore the cuts later.  ---  Resorts International unveiled a recapitalization plan aimed at keeping the company out of Chapter 11.  But bondholders attacked the plan.  ---  Avon Products cut its forecast of 1989 earnings, prompting speculation the door-to-door sales company may soon be a takeover target again.  ---  IBM introduced an array of products aimed at helping corporate customers write software faster.  ---  Ferranti of Britain is discussing a possible merger or alliance with two suitors as one way to resolve the financial crisis at the defense firm.  ---  A mortgage insurance program designed to help low and moderate-income people buy homes was unveiled by GE Capital Mortgage Insurance, Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 141,610,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2687.31, off 0.19; transportation 1450.21, up 8.00; utilities 216.55, up 0.06.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3335.28, up 0.32.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 129.66, off 0.58; spot index 129.57, off 0.01.  Dollar: 145.85 yen, off 0.03; 1.9545 marks, up 0.0025.  NORTHEAST UTILITIES said its Connecticut Light & Power Co. unit sold $75 million of 30-year first-mortgage bonds with a coupon rate of 9.375%.  Proceeds were used to reduce short-term debt.  The bonds are due Sept. 1, 2019.  Northeast Utilities, which is based in Hartford, Conn., is a utility holding company.  Investors looked for leadership in the market but found none.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average eased 0.19 to 2687.31, and the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index edged down 0.18 to 346.55.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange picked up only slightly to 141,610,000 shares from Monday's 136,940,000.  Trading was thin enough that a brief spurt of computer-driven program selling near the close wiped out the day's gains in a matter of minutes.  Even though Campeau announced a funding agreement with Olympia & York yesterday, traders said many investors remain concerned about the future of leveraged buy-outs because of the cash squeeze at the Toronto-based retailer, a major junk-bond issuer.  Consequently, some flight-to-quality buying was seen in big, well-known stocks.  American Telephone & Telegraph rose 1/2 to a new high of 42, for example, and Philip Morris rose 2 1/4 to 158 5/8.  Meanwhile, undaunted speculators traded a number of rumor-driven or "whisper" stocks back up again.  Hilton Hotels, currently entertaining acquisition offers, rose 2 to 101 1/4.  AMR, parent of American Airlines, rose 3/4 to 76 1/2.  "What you are seeing is an attempt to restore confidence after they knocked Humpty Dumpty off the wall last week," said Jack Solomon, technical analyst at Bear Stearns.  Outside of the takeover arena, however, investors sat, wondered and barely traded.  "There is no market leadership to speak of," said Leo Grohowski, director of equity portfolio management at Marinvest.  "Where are the values?  In cyclical stocks, we are still worried about the possibility of a recession.  And consumer stocks still look expensive.  It is difficult to find compelling stories" to trade on, he said.  Money managers appeared to shrug at yesterday's consumer price report for August.  Excluding the volatile food and energy sectors, consumer prices rose 0.2%.  Because prices will probably rise in the next few months, many analysts concluded that the Federal Reserve won't lower interest rates anytime soon.  But that conclusion didn't seem to prompt any response from the money managers.  "There is an attitude of non-interest, and it has been a little puzzling," said Philip Puccio, managing director in charge of equity trading at Prudential-Bache Securities.  Federal National Mortgage Association, which shot to a 52-week high Monday, fell 1 5/8 on profit-taking to 113 7/8.  The company announced a 3-for-1 stock split and an increase in its quarterly dividend, pending regulatory approval.  The New York Stock Exchange halted trading in Fannie Mae at 11:33 a.m. EDT, shortly after the company informed the exchange of the stock split.  The exchange doesn't usually halt trading on stock split announcements.  But exchange officials were concerned that investors might not initially understand that the company's actions are subject to approval by the Department of Housing and Urban Development, a Fannie Mae spokesman said.  M.D.C. Holdings was the largest loser on the Big Board in percentage terms, dropping 1/2 to 2 1/8 after yesterday's Wall Street Journal quoted an analyst as saying that the highly leveraged company is close to defaulting on its junk bonds and might declare bankruptcy.  Avon Products was the most active stock, slipping 2 1/8 to 31 3/4 on volume of 2.2 million shares.  The company cut its earnings estimate for the full year as a result of softening sales trends in the U.S. and a stronger-than-expected dollar abroad.  Earnings for 1989 now are projected at $1.95 to $2.15 a share, compared with earlier estimates of $2.30 to $2.40 a share.  Also on the most active list, Niagara Mohawk Power gained 5/8 to 14.  An article in Barron's magazine said the utility hopes to return the No. 1 Unit of its Nine Mile Point nuclear facility to full power soon.  The unit has been idle for nearly two years.  Ames Department Stores lost 7/8 to 16 5/8.  A 1.2 million-share block was traded by Salomon Brothers in the afternoon.  The company said it is planning to issue $100 million of convertible debentures.  Manufacturers Hanover gained 2 1/4 to 44.  Trading in the stock was halted late Monday when the banking concern announced a series of moves to improve its capital position, including the $1.28 billion sale of a 60% stake in its CIT Group unit to Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank.  The Japanese bank also will pay $120 million for a 4.9% equity stake in Manufacturers Hanover.  Blockbuster Entertainment gained 1 to 16 after it agreed to sell one million of its shares to Cox Cable for $15 million.  First Bank System lost 1 3/4 to 21 1/8.  The stock slid 1 1/8 Monday after it said it would take a charge of $25 million to $40 million against third-quarter earnings to raise its loan-loss provision.  Varian Associates fell 1 1/4 to 25 3/4.  The company said it expects to report fourth-quarter net income lower than the 45 cents a share it reported for its third quarter.  Dreyfus gained 1 1/8 to 34 1/2.  The Wall Street Journal said the company agreed to sell the credit card operation of its Dreyfus Consumer Bank to a unit of Bank of New York for $168 million.  Bank of New York eased 1/4 to 49 5/8.  Dayton Hudson gained 1 3/8 to 61 3/8.  The company is offering to buy back seven million of its 7.7 million common shares outstanding for between $60 and $65 a share.  Upjohn closed unchanged at 36 3/8 on volume of 1.1 million shares.  The company boosted its quarterly dividend by three cents to 25 cents a share.  Separately, the company's president, L.C. Hoff, said he will retire at the end of the year.  Warner-Lambert gained 2 1/4 to 106 1/2.  Smith Barney Harris Upham raised its recommendation on the stock to "trading buy" from "hold," according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  Kerr-McGee dropped 1 1/8 to 49 3/8 after gaining 2 1/2 points Monday.  The company's 84-year-old co-founder, Dean A. McGee, died Friday.  American depository receipts of Mitsubishi Bank began trading on the New York Stock Exchange and was unchanged at 22 1/4 on volume of 204,600 shares.  The American Stock Exchange Index went down 0.67 to 378.83.  Volume totaled 9,990,000 shares, compared with 9,420,000 Monday.  There were 251 issues advancing, 285 declining and 296 unchanged.  ComputerLand Corp. reported a loss of $13.9 million for its third quarter ended June 30, mainly because of problems in its Australian operations and unrest in China.  The company was hurt earlier in the year by fraud in its Hong Kong office.  ComputerLand is a closely held chain of computer retail outlets, most of which are owned by franchise holders.  ComputerLand franchises sell more computers than any other retailer, with more than $1.9 billion in sales for the nine months ended June 30.  Because it issued publicly traded debt last spring, the concern now has to file disclosures with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Its first such report, released yesterday, portrays a company with surging sales but some control problems.  ComputerLand has agreed to take over its Australian operation, a joint venture between it and an ex-franchise holder, because of losses discovered by a company audit.  B. Wade Monroe, ComputerLand's chief financial officer, said the former franchise holder operated the 21 Australian outlets "with an absence of elementary business sense," allowing inventory to almost disappear and spending millions of dollars on ill-fated advertising campaigns and promotions.  Furthermore, the financial reports sent back to headquarters by the former franchise holder masked the extent of the problem, Mr. Monroe said.  ComputerLand had a loss of $14.3 million in the quarter from its Australia operations and expects to report another loss in the current quarter.  For the nine months, the Australian losses totaled $15.7 million.  For the year-earlier quarter, ComputerLand had a loss of $2.2 million, including a $5.3 million loss from discontinued operations.  For the nine months, ComputerLand's losses totaled $5.1 million.  For the year-earlier nine months, the company earned $6.5 million.  There weren't any per-share earnings because of preferred dividend requirements.  ComputerLand got stung by the upheaval in China.  Mr. Monroe said two trading companies that owed ComputerLand millions of dollars appear to have been closed down following the Chinese army's attacks against student protesters last summer in Beijing.  One of the companies, which Mr. Monroe said had been run by a pro-student businessman who has since fled the country, was seized by the government.  Mr. Monroe said ComputerLand hasn't been able even to contact the other trading company.  As a result, ComputerLand took a $2.8 million charge in the latest quarter.  ComputerLand also was nicked last spring by an export scam run by employees in its Hong Kong office, Mr. Monroe said.  In an apparent effort to pump up sales figures, the employees deliberately evaded Hong Kong law by shipping computers into China without export licenses, Mr. Monroe said.  That cost ComputerLand $900,000 in the second quarter ended March 31.  Mr. Monroe said ComputerLand fired the employees and later closed its Hong Kong office, ended its Chinese operations and instituted rigorous controls in Australia.  The SEC filing showed that ComputerLand had a profit of $14.8 million from its other operations, mainly those in the U.S. and Europe.  Total retail sales for the quarter from all ComputerLand franchises rose 28% to $639.7 million from $500.9 million, reflecting booming demand for business computers, ComputerLand said.  For the nine months, sales rose 27% to $1.9 billion.  Because ComputerLand only recognizes as revenue the royalties paid it by franchise holders and sales from the handful of stores it owns outright, the company's revenue for the quarter as reported in the filing totaled $25.9 million, down from $27.2 million.  For the nine months, revenue rose from $92.9 million to $80.6 million.  Richard J. Hatchett, president of a Dallas-based investment banking firm, was named to the board of this manager of outpatient medical centers, increasing board membership to five.  IPM Technology Inc. said it terminated a five-month-old agreement for a $5-a-share leveraged buy-out by its majority shareholder, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Seymour Kahn.  The announcement was made after the end of trading in IPM stock, which closed at $4.25, down 12.5 cents in composite trading on the American Stock Exchange.  IPM, based in Los Angeles, provides fueling services to civilian and military aircraft and has airport cargo-handling operations.  Mr. Kahn owns a 58% stake.  IPM said the agreement was terminated because a special committee of IPM's board determined that the $5-per-share price was no longer fair.  A company spokesman declined to elaborate.  The agreement, reached in early April by IPM and SK Acquisition Inc., which is wholly owned by Mr. Kahn, called for SK to tender for the 42% of IPM's stock that Mr. Kahn didn't already own.  The offer had an indicated value of about $4.5 million.  Mr. Kahn told the committee that SK can't obtain financing for a higher offer.  GE Capital Mortgage Insurance Cos., Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac jointly announced a mortgage insurance program designed to help low-income and moderate-income people buy homes.  The Community Home Buyer's Program relaxes lending standards to help lower-income families qualify for a mortgage.  To help avoid defaults, however, the program requires buyers to attend a training course on choosing, financing and owning a home, and it emphasizes prepurchase inspections.  GE Capital, a General Electric Co. unit, said it will insure as much as $500 million in loans, or enough money to finance nearly 10,000 dwellings.  Fannie Mae, as the Federal National Mortgage Association is known, agreed to buy as much as $200 million of the loans from lenders.  Freddie Mac, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp., didn't specify a total.  Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac are federally chartered, stockholder-owned corporations that operate a secondary market in mortgage loans, buying loans from lenders and packaging them into securities for sale to investors or holding them in portfolio.  GE Capital said six lenders have signed up already and the company expects 50 lenders to participate in the next few months.  Gregory T. Barmore, president of GE Capital, said the buyers' program "addresses a critical need while offering a good business opportunity" for GE, lenders, Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac.  Earlier this year, GE and Fannie Mae launched a similar initiative, with GE Capital insuring home loans to low-income and moderate-income families in five Midwest cities.  Under that program, Fannie Mae agreed to buy $40 million in mortgages.  The program announced yesterday allows buyers to apply 33% of their income to their monthly housing expenses, rather than the standard 28% required for most financing with a 5% down payment.  The program also waives the condition that buyers have a cash reserve equal to two monthly mortgage payments, and it permits buyers to use a subsidized second mortgage to cut costs.  As evidence of good credit history, borrowers can also use non-traditional documents such as rent and utility payments.  In addition, the Community Home Buyer's Program requires potential buyers to attend classes that explain the mortgage application process as well as the income level, savings and credit history needed to obtain a mortgage.  Instructors also teach buyers how to choose a home that isn't going to need extensive repairs, and emphasize home inspections to avert a potential default because of a costly maintenance problem in the first few years.  In some cases, the inspections are subsidized.  The Senate voted to raise the national ceiling on Federal Housing Administration-insured mortages for single-family homes to nearly $125,000 -- a roughly one-quarter increase from the current level.  Final approval came after prolonged debate in which the chamber narrowly split over a proposal to do away with any fixed ceiling and allow FHA-insured home loans to rise with the median cost of housing in individual markets.  The more generous provision had the backing of real-estate agents and lawmakers from high-cost states on the East and West coasts, but conservatives led by Sen. Don Nickles (R., Okla.) ultimately succeeded in peeling away enough votes to preserve some fixed dollar limit.  The floor action came as Republican negotiators offered a compromise that would significantly increase spending above President Bush's request for law-enforcement and anti-drug programs in the fiscal year beginning Oct. 1.  As outlined in a closed-door meeting, the package moves about halfway toward increases demanded by Senate Appropriations Committee Chairman Robert Byrd (D., W.Va.).  But major differences remain with Democrats, who will caucus today, over how to finance the added costs.  Though specifics remain subject to negotiation, the GOP plan would open the door to additions of as much as $800 million in new budget authority above the $2.2 billion in increases proposed by Mr. Bush for the related programs.  Of this increase, $200 million would be designated for state and local law-enforcement grants, but the greater share would go to drug-treatment and education programs favored by the Democrats.  Measured in direct spending, the increased appropriations would add $400 million to federal outlays in the coming fiscal year, and these increases must be offset by cuts elsewhere to stay within budget targets.  The GOP proposal assumes an across-the-board cut of one-quarter of 1% on domestic and military accounts to cover the bulk of the president's proposals.  However, all of the $800 million in additional budget authority would still have to be matched by more-selective, individual reductions.  These cuts could come in some cases from defense as well as domestic accounts, but the Bush administration is fearful that if a blanket across-the-board formula is applied, the military will be forced to absorb two-thirds of the total package.  The FHA provision was an amendment to a pending fiscal 1990 spending bill providing more than $67 billion to fund federal housing and veteran programs as well as independent agencies covering science, space and the environment.  The diverse and competing programs lead to immense fiscal pressure on the lawmakers allocating funds, resulting in an annual scramble for accounting devices to stay within the budget.  These considerations helped fuel the drive to stimulate FHA lending, and thereby increase premiums paid by borrowers.  As initially proposed by the Senate Appropriations Committee, the bill would have removed any fixed cap and allowed the FHA to insure loans of as much as 95% of the median value of sales in a state or market area.  Budget analysts estimated that new revenues would amount to $157 million, but opponents argued that the immediate windfall disguised a long-term risk for the government.  An early bid to set the ceiling at approximately $118,000 lost on back-to-back 50-49 roll calls, but a second alternative -- about $124,875 -- survived a tabling motion, 55-43, and was then approved by voice vote.  The new ceiling would be more than $24,000 above the current limit of approximately $101,000, and though still restrictive on lending in such states as California and New York, the new limit is expected to encourage FHA activity and yield $104 million in new premiums.  The increase would have the greatest effect on sales of new housing, and in more than a dozen states including Illinois, Michigan, Maine and Maryland, the new ceiling would be above or roughly the equivalent of median purchase prices, according to figures used by the Senate Banking, Housing and Urban Affairs Committee.  Though not approaching the $180,000 to $189,000 level of metropolitan New York, the higher ceiling comes far closer to the New York state median, and FHA terms would encourage first-time buyers, who are required to put up only 5% of the total purchase price.  The bigger premiums would help give the Senate the flexibility to raise annual spending for the space station to $1.85 billion, which is twice this year's level and includes the first construction funds for the massive project.  The space station figures are nearly $195 million above the House-passed level.  The measure also provides $62 million to preserve the advanced communications-technology satellite being developed by General Electric Co.  Funding for the administration's high-speed aerospace plane was rejected, but the bill preserves at least partial financing of $20 million for starting up the CRAF-Cassini mission -- a successor to the celebrated Voyager probe.  Among major domestic accounts, the bill endorses a House-passed increase of more than 20% in funding to modernize public housing occupied by many of the nation's poorest tenants.  Financing for the Superfund program to clean toxic-waste sites would be increased 10% above current appropriations, and total spending for the Environmental Protection Agency's programs would exceed $5.6 billion, or 15% above the president's request.  Though the Senate completed debate last night on the underlying bill, final approval was delayed by the GOP leadership in an apparent effort to gain some leverage in the negotiations on anti-drug programs.  The larger result is to slow the entire appropriations process, and with less than two weeks before the new fiscal year, the Senate has yet to give even initial approval to bills covering the bulk of defense and domestic spending.  By slowing the process, the GOP preserves its options for offering competing drug-funding amendments if the party can't reach a settlement with the Democrats, but for some, the strategy is directed too at Mr. Byrd.  The West Virginia Democrat was adamant in opposing anything but an across-the-board cut to finance the entire drug package, and his position makes him a target for Republicans who resented his tenure as Democratic leader in the Senate.  Republicans deny any animosity toward Mr. Byrd, but by delaying the bills, some GOP senators see an opportunity to take aim at Mr. Byrd's pride in "running the trains on time."  It has prompted recollections of an earlier analogy in which a senior Republican suggested half-jokingly of devising a "Gaslight" strategy, in which the GOP would seek to undermine its old nemesis much as Charles Boyer sought to drive his wife mad in the 1940s suspense movie set in London.  "I'm puzzled by that approach; I'm saddened by it," Mr. Byrd said of the delaying tactics.  But Sen. Alan Simpson (R., Wyo.) vigorously denied any effort to "bait Byrd."  "I wouldn't be part of it," he said.  BAKER SAID the U.S. has dropped a basic demand in superpower arms talks.  In an attempt to "get the ball rolling" with the Soviet Union in negotiations in Geneva aimed at reducing strategic arms, the secretary of state said the Bush administration has instructed its negotiators to stop insisting on a ban on mobile intercontinental ballistic missiles.  Baker, who is to meet in Wyoming this weekend with Soviet Foreign Minister Shevardnadze, also predicted progress in the areas of chemical weapons and nuclear testing.  Shevardnadze, who has made clear he wants to confer about a summit between Bush and Gorbachev, is expected to offer new arms-control proposals.  ---  THE VATICAN SAID a convent should be moved from its site near Auschwitz.  In the first public declaration by the Roman Catholic hierarchy on the controversy that has offended Jewish groups, the Vatican issued a communique calling for the removal of the convent of Carmelite nuns from the site of the former Nazi death camp in Poland.  The statement, which rejected the opposition to the relocation by Poland's Cardinal Glemp, also said the Vatican would help pay to build a new prayer center.  Jewish leaders hailed the decision, and the World Jewish Congress said it would call for an end to a freeze on formal relations with the Holy See.  ---  GORBACHEV RECEIVED the chance to revamp the Communist Party next year.  As the policy-making Central Committee opened a meeting in Moscow primarily devoted to ethnic unrest in the Soviet Union, members approved a plan to reschedule the party's next congress for October 1990.  The session originally was scheduled for the spring of 1991.  The move, called for by the Soviet president, was calculated to hasten the pace of his restructuring program and to change the Kremlin leadership.  Gorbachev said that attempts by outlying republics to secede wouldn't be tolerated and actions to kindle ethnic strife would be dealt with severely.  ---  Hurricane Hugo churned past the Bahamas on an uncertain path that threatens an area from Florida to North Carolina by the weekend.  Disaster teams worked in Puerto Rico and on a string of islands thrashed by the storm in the Caribbean.  More than 50,000 people were left homeless, and at least 25 were reported killed.  ---  A French passenger plane vanished with as many as 170 people aboard, probably over the African nation of Niger, officials said.  Radio contact with the DC-10, bound for Paris from the Congo, was lost after taking off from a stopover in Chad.  Passengers included the wife of the U.S. envoy to N'Djamena, the French airline UTA said.  ---  A judge in Bogota issued an arrest warrant for an Israeli army reserve colonel, Yair Klein, who is suspected of training hit squads for Colombian drug traffickers.  The arrest of an Israeli civilian also was ordered on the same charges.  Israel doesn't have an extradition treaty with Colombia.  ---  Burkina Faso executed by firing squad two leaders of a foiled plot to overthrow the government of President Blaise Compaore, an official of the West African nation said.  The coup apparently was timed for Compaore's return to the country, formerly called Upper Volta, from a trip to Asia.  ---  The FAA ordered ultrasonic inspections of the type of General Electric Co. engine whose failure led to the July crash of a United Airlines DC-10 in Sioux City, Iowa, killing 112 people.  The "emergency regulation" was announced during a Senate panel's hearing on the airworthiness of the tri-jet.  ---  West Germany announced that it would indefinitely close its embassy in Warsaw today, saying the situation caused by refugees seeking resettlement in the West was untenable.  The move came as more than 600 East German emigres occupied Bonn's missions in Poland and Czechoslovakia.  ---  Israel's Premier Shamir held talks with Rabin about the defense minister's discussions Monday with Egyptian President Mubarak.  Speculation mounted, meanwhile, that the government could collapse over a dispute caused by Mubarak's plan to sponsor Israeli-Palestinian peace talks.  ---  Quayle met in Seoul with Prime Minister Kang, while hundreds of students held rallies denouncing South Korea's government and the U.S.  The vice president, on the first stop of an Asian tour, discussed a range of issues with Kang, including the future of 43,000 U.S. troops in South Korea, aides said.  ---  Haiti's president has commuted the life sentence of Luc Desir, the ex-chief of secret police who directed torture sessions during the Duvalier regime, a state-run newspaper in Port-au-Prince reported.  Desir's sentence was reduced to 30 years, but the move was viewed as a step toward a full pardon.  ---  A New York state appeals court declared the San Diego Yacht Club the winner of the 1988 America's Cup, reversing an earlier decision that the club had unfairly won the sailing competition by using a catamaran.  The court said San Diego had properly fulfilled its obligations under the rules when it beat New Zealand.  MCI Communications Corp. named Howard C. Crane president of its Pacific division, succeeding Harold S. Trimmer, whose new job wasn't announced.  Mr. Crane, 50 years old, had been senior vice president, corporate affairs, for the Washington-based long-distance telephone company.  Before joining MCI in 1982, he was vice president of corporate relations at the Federal National Mortgage Association, and previously had been a manager at Cigna Corp. and International Business Machines Corp.  The company said Mr. Trimmer's new post will be announced soon.  Mr. Trimmer is 51.  Mr. Crane will be based in San Francisco, where he will oversee MCI operations in California and Nevada.  Housing and Urban Development Secretary Jack Kemp announced a Bush administration goal of cutting the nation's homeless population in half by 1992.  In prepared remarks for a bi-regional conference of the federal Interagency Council on the Homeless, Mr. Kemp said his strategy calls for giving priority to families and the mentally ill who are homeless, closing welfare hotels and providing transitional and permanent homes to families along with supportive services, such as counseling and job training, if needed.  Mr. Kemp didn't, however, offer specific details on how to accomplish the goal.  "It's hard to be specific, not because we don't know what we are going to do, but we're waiting to see how it all rolls out," said Anna Kondratas, assistant secretary for community planning and development for HUD.  One proposal in the Kemp plan would allow nonprofit groups that are not tax-supported to buy foreclosed HUD homes for a 10% discount, as some tax-supported nonprofit groups have done.  He also promised to continue efforts to simplify the "complex mess" of bureaucratic barriers that has hindered federal homeless assistance.  Lo Yuk-sui, who is seeking control of Australia's struggling Hooker Corp., has a reputation as a stickler for detail.  But he also likes to keep details of his business dealings to himself, and that could pose problems down the road.  Since 1984, the 45-year-old entrepreneur has acquired dozens of hotels and properties in Hong Kong and in the U.S., often by buying into moribund businesses.  His flagship company, Century City International Holdings Ltd., with seven publicly listed affiliates under its control, is one of Hong Kong's fastest-growing companies.  Respectability hasn't come as easily.  His hotels division represents spoils from a widely publicized family feud that he won over his father.  Bitterness over the 1984 episode lingers.  A year ago, he backed off after waging a takeover battle for Hongkong & Shanghai Hotels Ltd., earning a modest share-trading profit and a reputation -- perhaps undeserved -- both as a lightweight and something of an opportunist.  And his habit of shuffling investments within his amorphous corporate structure confuses even admirers and deflects the interest of major institutional investors from all but one or two of his companies.  "The group structure seems to have grown increasingly untidy," says John Mulcahy, a director at Peregrine Brokerage Ltd., a local securities firm.  This record may bedevil Mr. Lo even if his Hooker proposal passes the scrutiny of the cash-strapped company's bank creditors.  Through Richfield International Holdings Ltd., a Century City affiliate, Mr. Lo has offered Hooker a 100 million Australian dollar (US$76.6 million) loan.  In return, Richfield is seeking a stake of at least 65% in the Australian company, which owns substantial retail and property interests in the U.S.  To raise the money, Mr. Lo may need to gain the confidence of Hong Kong investors.  Not that those investors seem to question his ability to make the most out of Hooker.  But given Mr. Lo's characteristic reticence over the proposal, it is hard to predict which of his companies might reap the benefits from Hooker's assets and which might foot the rescue bill.  Attempts to reach Mr. Lo and executives of his Century City group for comment weren't successful.  As one of nine children, Mr. Lo's mastery over the property business stood out when he was helping to run Great Eagle Co., the real-estate concern headed by his father, Lo Ying-shek.  Being one of the most headstrong of the Lo heirs, some of his associates say, his break in 1984 with his family seemed inevitable.  Since striking out on his own, he has come to be known as a demanding boss who lets few details slip by.  After seizing control of Regal Hotels International Holdings Ltd., the hotel unit his father once headed, Mr. Lo insisted on signing all the company's checks, an associate says.  Another recalls that one of his hotels had trouble replacing a worn carpet because the staff couldn't get his blessing.  From what little is known of the Hooker plan, analysts consider it a typically shrewd move.  For the loan to Hooker, Richfield is requesting not just security, but also preferential status over other creditors.  Moreover, Mr. Lo's fluid corporate structure could ultimately dilute his own exposure in the proposed arrangement.  According to a company chart dated July 17, Mr. Lo owns a 51.7% interest in Century City, the group holding concern.  His effective interest in Richfield, after filtering through several other affiliate companies, comes to just 18%.  Though his tactics vary, Mr. Lo's strategy -- gaining control over prime assets with minimum capital investment -- has remained relatively consistent.  During the 1984 family feud over Regal Hotels, Mr. Lo seemed the underdog because he owned relatively few shares compared with his father and siblings.  What his father apparently didn't realize was that Mr. Lo had been accumulating warrants, or rights to buy new Regal stock.  The warrants, trading at a fraction of the shares' value but carrying disproportionate voting rights, enabled the dissident son to beat the odds.  Diamond Shamrock R&M Inc. said it completed the acquisition of a hydrocarbon-storage company and related trading company from Belvieu Enterprises Co., Houston, for an undisclosed cash sum.  Diamond Shamrock said the purchase of XRAL Storage & Terminaling Co. and XCEL Products Co. will bring to 25 the number of underground-storage wells it has in the Mont Belvieu area near Houston.  The wells have a capacity of nearly 60 million barrels of hydrocarbons, it said.  Amsterdam-Rotterdam Bank N.V. of the Netherlands and Belgium's Generale de Banque S.A., as expected, called off their intended merger.  The decision put to rest chances for the first cross-border merger of two European banking groups in anticipation of the European Community's removal of internal market barriers in 1992.  The banks said they now plan to reduce their previous 10% cross-shareholdings in each other to 5% each, with the remaining shares resold to third parties at a substantial book profit of about 250 million guilders ($112.7 million).  Generale and Amro will share that profit equally.  The companies first agreed to extensive business links in February 1988, when they announced plans to merge under one holding company within a few years.  The cross-shareholdings were taken at that time.  Yesterday, however, the banks said that technical problems, especially regarding "legal and tax matters," and differing ideas on how the integration would work, led to the decision to cease merger plans.  The companies said they will continue to broaden their business ties world-wide.  They added that a full or partial merger might be considered in the future.  Rite Aid Corp. said it entered a definitive agreement to acquire Lane Drugs Corp., a drugstore chain in southern and central New Jersey.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Lane, a closely held company based in Lakewood N.J., operates 18 stores.  Rite Aid, the largest drugstore chain in the U.S., said it expects to close the transaction by Sept. 29.  Team Inc. said it was low bidder on $6.2 million of Texas State Highway Department maintenance contracts.  The company, which specializes in facility repair and maintenance, said it expects the contracts to be awarded next Tuesday.  Team Inc. also said it signed an agreement as a subcontractor for maintenance, management and building services at three military installations in Texas and Missouri.  The subcontract will generate $7 million in revenue in the year ending next May 31, the company said.  Skittish investors have forced media magnate Rupert Murdoch to scotch plans for an ambitious new investment vehicle.  But a source close to the situation said Murdoch's News Corp. and its investment bank adviser Credit Suisse First Boston Corp. hope to relaunch the proposal in an altered form.  The failure of the proposed venture, Media Partners International Ltd. -- dubbed Son of News Corp. by Mr. Murdoch -- potentially complicates News Corp.'s long-term international expansion plans.  Mr. Murdoch needs another vehicle to take the borrowing pressure off his Sydney-based News Corp., whose debts have ballooned in the wake of a five-year acquisition streak.  "It is a setback," said Viktor Shvets, an analyst at Sydney stockbrokers Capel Court Powell Ltd. But, he added, "I'm sure it's a temporary one."  Mr. Shvets and others think News Corp. is likely to redesign the venture to make it more advantageous to investors other than News Corp.  Under the original plan announced in March, Credit Suisse First Boston intended to raise at least $1 billion in a world-wide private placement by June 30, 1989, the end of News Corp.'s fiscal year.  News Corp. was to own 20% of the new company and manage it and be entitled to certain fees.  As part of the plan, News Corp. would have then transferred its book-publishing assets to the new company, a transaction that would have lowered News Corp.'s hefty debt.  But analysts say that, among other things, potential investors were concerned about the fees payable to News Corp.  Mr. Murdoch disclosed News Corp.'s intention to abandon the proposal in an interview with London's Financial Times.  "It was a clever idea," Mr. Murdoch was quoted as saying.  "But it was too much of a blank check."  Other News Corp. officials weren't immediately available for comment.  Signs that the Media Partners idea was in trouble emerged in early June when Credit Suisse First Boston conceded it had been able to get commitments for only $450 million from investors other than News Corp., which planned to invest at least $200 million.  A Credit Suisse First Boston official said then that trying to put together such a transaction within four months was too optimistic.  He attributed the tepid response, particularly among Australian investors, to a misunderstanding of the transaction.  The investment bank was confident it would reach its $1 billion target by the end of July, but the commitments stalled at about $500 million.  Meanwhile, News Corp. began to implement a stopgap measure, which a senior company official said in June was an "insurance policy" against the "remote chance" that the Media Partners plan could fall through.  News Corp. sold its book-publishing interests, including Harper & Row Publishers Inc. and William Collins PLC, for about $1.3 billion to a joint-venture company owned by News Corp. and a company associated with Credit Suisse First Boston.  News Corp. also asked Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co. of New York to arrange an $880 million loan repayable over 7 1/2 years and a $120 million four-year loan to be used as working capital for the joint venture.  That transaction helped News Corp. meet bank creditors' demands that it lower its debt-to-equity ratio.  But it also reduced the pressure on News Corp. to quickly complete the Media Partners arrangement.  Now, any new transaction is probably months away.  Cooper Industries Inc. said Deutsche Gardner-Denver, part of its Cooper Air Tools division, was awarded $12.5 million in contracts to supply automated engine assembly transfer lines to Volkswagen AG plants in West Germany.  The public sector borrowing requirement, the most widely used measure of Britain's government deficit or surplus, showed a deficit of #700 million ($1.1 billion) in August, after surpluses of #1.4 billion in July and #1.58 billion in August 1988, the U.K. Treasury said.  In the five months since the current fiscal year began April 1, the measure shows a surplus of #700 million, compared with a surplus of #4.8 billion a year earlier.  Cognex Corp. said it entered into a four-year agreement to sell machine-vision systems to Komatsu Ltd. of Japan.  Machine-vision computer systems are used to replace human vision in manufacturing processes.  Under the agreement, Tokyo-based Komatsu will buy from Cognex all machine-vision systems required for use in vision products to be developed both for the Japanese company's internal use and for sale to others.  Komatsu makes heavy equipment used in construction.  Terms weren't disclosed, but Cognex said it expects the multimillion-dollar partnership agreement to help it reach new machine-vision markets in Japan.  Komatsu initially will use the Cognex systems to develop products to perform such tasks as reading and inspection in industrial applications.  Tridex Corp. said it completed the sale of its Cambridge Products Corp. connector business to a subsidiary of Jordan Industries Inc., Deerfield, Ill.  Tridex, a maker of specialized electronic products for printers and scanners, said it will have "a substantial gain" on the sale.  Jordan Industries said it paid more than $12 million for Cambridge Products.  Eric W. McInroy said he holds a 5.4% stake in Transmation Inc.'s common shares outstanding.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Mr. McInroy, president of Transcat Inc., a subsidiary of Transmation, said he holds 124,875 Transmation common shares, including 8,000 shares purchased on Sept. 6 for $30,000.  Eric McInroy said his 5.4% stake in Rochester, N.Y.-based Transmation is "strictly an investment."  Nederlandsche Middenstandsbank N.V. (NMB) and Postbank N.V. said they completed arrangements for their intended merger and will sign official agreements on Oct. 4.  The Dutch banking companies said they then plan to split their post-merger shares 5-to-1 if shareholders approve the merge and split at a special meeting called for Oct. 5.  Approval is expected.  The completion of the merger had previously been expected in September, but developed a last-minute hitch because of disagreements among different unions representing employees at the companies.  Those problems were resolved last week.  Raw-steel production by the nation's mills increased 2.8% last week to 1,743,000 tons from 1,695,000 tons the previous week, the American Iron and Steel Institute said.  Last week's output fell 10.4% from the 1,945,000 tons produced a year earlier.  The industry used 78.4% of its capability last week, compared with 76.3% the previous week and 91.2% a year ago.  @ The American Iron and Steel Institute reported:  @ Net tons Capability  @ produced utilization  @ Week to Sept.16 .............. 1,743,000 78.4%  @ Week to Sept. 9 .............. 1,695,000 76.3%  @ Year to date.................. 70,983,000 86.3%  @ Year earlier to date ......... 71,227,000 89.6%  The capability utilization rate is a calculation designed to indicate at what percent of its production capability the industry is operating in a given week.  McDonnell Douglas Corp. was awarded $476.6 million in contracts for 84 Navy F/A-18 aircraft and for logistics support for Army AH-64 helicopters.  Mine Safety Appliances Co. was given an $86.8 million Air Force contract for chemical masks.  General Electric Co. got a $48.4 million Navy contract for Phalanx shipboard-weapons system parts.  ESL Inc. won a $20.9 million Army contract for communications equipment.  Hughes Aircraft Co., a unit of General Motors Corp., received a $20.8 million Army contract for TOW missiles.  Ford Motor Co. said it is recalling about 67,000 of its 1988 model Tracers because of a problem involving front seat belts.  In some cases, seat belts may be difficult to extend for buckling or impossible to pull out.  A Ford spokesman said the auto maker isn't aware of any injuries caused by the defective seat belts.  The company said it will ask owners to return their cars to dealers if they have been having trouble pulling out their front seat belt.  In a notice to the London Stock Exchange, Saatchi & Saatchi PLC disclosed that U.S. investment-management concern Southeastern Asset Management Inc. boosted its holding in the world's largest advertising and communications group to 10.2% from 9.4%.  Memphis, Tenn.-based Southeastern became Saatchi's largest shareholder just two weeks ago when it picked up about 14.9 million shares represented by American depositary receipts, or ADRs.  Southeastern's total holding in Saatchi now stands at 16.1 million shares.  The move also follows Southeastern's purchase last week of a 7.16% holding in Blue Arrow PLC, the world's largest employment services concern.  At midafternoon yesterday, Saatchi shares were up three pence at 319 pence on the London Stock Exchange.  Arab foreign debt has grown in the past few years to an estimated $140 billion in 1988, compared with $68 billion in 1982, said the monthly bulletin of Gulf International Bank.  The report called the level a matter for concern.  It cited an average rate of total external debt to gross domestic product of 65.8% in 1987, compared with 52.5% in 1982.  The corresponding average rate for the world's 17 most-indebted countries was 63.1% in 1987.  For Egypt, Sudan, Jordan and Morocco, external debt exceeded GDP, the report said.  It noted that those four Arab countries, along with Iraq, also were facing debt-repayment difficulties and have had to reschedule part or all of their debt to reduce their overall debt-service burden.  Algeria, Syria, South Yemen and North Yemen have been able to forestall debt rescheduling.  Lebanon, Somalia and Mauritania have virtually no access to international borrowing, while Oman, Qatar and Libya are able to tap international markets at reasonably good rates.  The remaining Arab countries, Saudi Arabia, Kuwait, the United Arab Emirates and Bahrain, have opted until now not to borrow internationally, preferring instead to draw on their domestic markets through government bonds and treasury bills.  Italy's public sector deficit narrowed to 56.6 trillion lire ($40.07 billion) in the first seven months of the year from a revised 64.899 trillion lire ($45.96 billion) deficit in the year-earlier period, the Treasury announced.  The year-earlier deficit was revised from the original estimate of 65.039 trillion lire.  The narrowing of the deficit was due to a new rule that self-employed taxpayers have to pay 40% of their expected tax liability for the year by the end of May.  The rule was implemented for the first time this year.  In addition, tax collection in general has been higher than expected.  The government has projected that the deficit for all of 1989 will reach 133 trillion lire, down only marginally from 134 trillion lire in 1988.  Japan, Taiwan and South Korea tried to keep out American cigarettes.  But where those economic powerhouses gave in, Thailand is putting up a stiffer fight, and may win a compromise -- mainly because it has found an ally in the U.S. anti-smoking movement.  At a public hearing to be held by the U.S. Trade Representative's Office today, a parade of congressmen and public-health advocates will testify in favor of Thailand, the object of an unfair-trade complaint by the U.S. Cigarette Export Association.  In the past, such complaints had the full support of the federal government.  But now, an outcry by the U.S. anti-smoking movement against the imposition of trade sanctions is forcing U.S. trade officials to re-examine their position.  And while the Bush administration is likely to be extremely cautious about altering its policy, it might end up softening its demands.  Threats to punish a foreign country for resisting U.S. cigarettes, says Matthew Myers, director of the Coalition on Smoking OR Health, are "an international scandal."  Rep. Chester Atkins (D., Mass.), a leader of the anti-smoking movement in the House, asks, "Why should we spend so much political capital on a harmful product like cigarettes when there are other things we can sell Thailand, like agricultural products, high tech, and services?"  The Massachusetts Democrat is scheduled to speak at the trade representative's hearing today, as is Surgeon General C. Everett Koop, who will be appearing as a private citizen.  The Cigarette Export Association -- made up of the three biggest cigarette makers in the U.S., the cigarette units of RJR Nabisco Inc., Philip Morris Cos., and B.A.T Industries PLC -- used to win handily because its complaints were treated strictly as matters of trade.  But the anti-smoking movement is arguing trade policy should reflect another national goal -- discouraging tobacco use.  Fresh from its victory in persuading the Senate to approve a permanent smoking ban on domestic airline flights, the coalition, led by the American Heart Association, the American Lung Association and the American Cancer Society, has thrown its weight behind Thailand.  The Thais, who appear intent on protecting their state-run tobacco monopoly, couldn't be happier.  They don't have Japan's lobbying power, or South Korea's or Taiwan's negotiating experience.  But they did have the wits to contact the anti-smoking coalition shortly after Trade Representative Carla Hills accepted the cigarette exporters' complaint on May 25.  Less than a week later, Thai diplomats stood with coalition members and their congressional backers at a Washington celebration of World No-Tobacco Day.  "We have our own anti-smoking people, and they are well-connected with the U.S. group," says Supavud Saicheua, the Thai Embassy's trade specialist.  Asked about the irony of using the U.S. anti-smoking movement to protect his country's state-run cigarette monopoly, Mr. Saicheua argues that the clever advertising employed by U.S. cigarette companies would seduce more Thais into smoking.  The Cigarette Export Association wants to keep health out of the discussion.  "The issue isn't whether people smoke or not, but who gets the business," contends Owen Smith, the association's president.  The association charges that by banning imports, the Thai Tobacco Monopoly deprives the U.S. of a reasonable share of a $744 million-a-year retail business.  The group seeks a "free and competitive" market, including the right to advertise its brands on Thai television.  Thai officials say all TV advertising of tobacco products is banned for public-health reasons.  Even if they don't win an outright victory, the anti-smoking group hopes to secure better terms for Thailand than other countries gained.  They hope, for example, to prevent U.S. exporters from gaining the right to promote their brands on Thai television.  "We'd have won if we get at least that," Rep. Atkins says.  So far, the U.S. trade office hasn't shown how it is leaning.  If it supports the exporters, its recommendation will have to be reviewed at the cabinet level, and possibly by President Bush himself.  The Bush administration is likely to be extremely wary of siding with the anti-smoking movement.  It can't easily dismiss the export question.  One reason for the recent improvement in the U.S. trade balance has been a boom in cigarette exports, which last year were valued at $2.6 billion, more than double the 1985 figure.  The successful trade actions against Japan, South Korea and Taiwan accounted for much of that gain.  The U.S. has made few trade breakthroughs as dramatic as that.  What's more, any decision favoring the anti-smokers could set a legal precedent that might encourage other countries to invoke health reasons for contesting other U.S. trade actions involving foods, pharmaceuticals and other products.  Co op AG said it will emerge from receivership under West German bankruptcy laws after a last-minute rescue agreement with creditor banks.  Under the accord, creditor banks of the troubled West German retailer agreed to a proposal by Deutsche Genossenschafts Bank, under which the banks will forgive 75% of Co op's debt of 2.7 billion marks ($1.37 billion) and DG Bank will take over all shares in the Frankfurt concern, said Co op's chief spokesman.  "Debt forgiveness was declared, the full concept was accepted, so the state of overindebtedness no longer exists," the spokesman said.  But not all Co op's creditors agreed to the rescue plan.  "We have sufficient support, but it is not 100%," a spokesman for DG Bank said.  Bankers and company officials will try to win the support of banks that rejected the plan, he said.  The bailout plan also calls for a reduction in the nominal value of the shares, followed by a sale of shares to raise funds.  Opus Computer Products Inc. said it ended talks to sell its Gary, Ill., plant to Spectrum Datatech Inc.  Opus, a maker of magnetic media products, had signed a letter of intent with Spectrum, a Longmont, Colo., distributor of computer-related supplies.  Opus said it is looking for other buyers.  Annualized interest rates on certain investments as reported by the Federal Reserve Board on a weekly-average basis:  @ Week Ended:  @ Sep. 15, Sep. 8,  @ 1989 1989  @ Treasury bills (90 day)-a 7.60 7.82  @ Commrcl paper (Dealer, 90 day)-a 8.65 8.72  @ Certfs of Deposit (Resale, 90 day) 8.71 8.78  @ Federal funds (Overnight)-b 8.96 8.96  @ Eurodollars (90 day)-b 8.84 8.86  @ Treasury bills (one year)-c 8.07 8.27  @ Treasury notes (three year)-c 8.11 8.29  @ Treasury notes (five year)-c 8.07 8.18  @ Treasury notes (ten year)-c 8.13 8.17  @ Treasury bonds (30 year)-c 8.10 8.11  a-Discounted rate. b-Week ended Wednesday, September 13, 1989 and Wednesday September 6, 1989. c-Yields, adjusted for constant maturity.  Beginning with today's editions, The Wall Street Journal will use the Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index to indicate movement in the London stock market in the Markets Diary on Page C1.  The FT-SE 100 replaces the older but narrower FT 30-share index.  Seiyu Ltd., a major Japanese department store chain, said it agreed to buy 40% of Hong Kong's Wing On Department Stores (Bermuda) Ltd., a subsidiary of Wing On Co.  Seiyu said that it expects to pay the equivalent of approximately seven billion yen ($47 million) for its stake in the Hong Kong department store operator, subject to final negotiations with Wing On, also of Hong Kong.  Seiyu said that buying the stake in the Wing On subsidiary is part of a broad agreement to form a partnership.  It said the companies agreed to form a partnership as Wing On is seeking to expand its business, while Seiyu is seeking to develop a world-wide network.  Sony Corp. of Japan said the U.S. Committee on Foreign Investment cleared its Sony USA Inc. unit to proceed with a $14-a-share, $60 million offer to buy Materials Research Corp.  The federal committee reviews foreign takeovers to determine if U.S. national security would be threatened by the transaction.  Materials Research, based in Orangeburg, N.Y., makes semiconductor-coating and etching equipment, high-purity metals and ceramics.  Sony is a maker of consumer and industrial audio and video electronics, computer peripherals and semiconductors.  The offer, made through Sony MRC Acquisition Corp., was scheduled to expire at midnight last night.  Hoylake Investments Ltd. said it controls 2.3% of the issued share capital of B.A.T Industries PLC.  Hoylake is the consortium that has launched a hostile all-paper #13.4-billion ($20.97 billion) bid for the diversified British conglomerate.  It also announced that it would keep its offer open until Sept. 29.  Last week, Hoylake was given some breathing space when the U.K. Panel on Takeovers and Mergers said Hoylake could let its bid for B.A.T lapse until it had cleared all regulatory hurdles with U.S. insurance commissioners.  Should the outcome of legal action in the U.S. prove successful, Hoylake can then launch its offer again within 21 days, the panel ruled.  Ford Motor Co. agreed to recall nearly half a million 1985 and 1986 cars to fix air-pollution control equipment, the Environmental Protection Agency said.  The auto maker is recalling almost 200,000 1985 Ford Escort and Mercury Lynx vehicles and almost 300,000 1986 Ford Escort, Ford EXP and Mercury Lynx vehicles.  All have 1.9-liter engines; models with fuel injection and those sold in California aren't included.  EPA tests found the cars are exceeding federal hydrocarbon and carbon-monoxide limits.  Ford will make free repairs to the choke system, the distributor spark advance and the air-injection system that helps the catalytic converter control exhausts, the agency said.  Sony Corp. said it plans to build a magnetic-tape-coating plant in France.  Officials at Sony, Tokyo, said the new facility will be established in Dax-Pontonx in southern France at a cost of 500 million francs ($75.4 million).  The plant will make coated-magnetic tapes to be supplied to the three tape-product plants Sony maintains in Europe -- two in France and one in Italy.  Construction will start early in 1990, with production scheduled to get under way in the spring of 1991.  The new plant will employ about 100 people.  The Western European plants have acquired tape material from Sony plants in Japan and the U.S.  But because of Sony's rapid expansion in the magnetic-tape markets in Europe, production has reached a scale that justifies the establishment of a coating facility there, officials say.  Jon S. Saxe, 53 years old, was named president and chief executive officer of this pharmaceuticals and animal health products company, succeeding Larry Soll, 47, a founder of the company who will remain as chairman and continue an active role in the company.  Mr. Saxe, who is currently vice president, licensing and corporate development, at Hoffmann-La Roche Inc., was also elected to the board, increasing the board's size to eight.  Ann Cobb, corporate secretary, was also elected a vice president of this utility holding company.  The Canadian government said it will offer 1.50 billion Canadian dollars (US$1.27 billion) of bonds in four issues this week.  The sale will include 9.25% bonds due July 1, 1992; 9.25% bonds due Dec. 15, 1994; 9.25% bonds due Dec. 1, 1999; and 9.50% bonds due June 1, 2010.  Terms of the offer will be announced today.  The Bank of Canada has agreed to purchase at least C$100 million of the new bonds.  The remainder will be available to the public.  Proceeds from the sale will be used to redeem C$1.23 billion of government bonds maturing Oct. 1 and for general government purposes.  The Bank of Canada holds C$205 million of the maturing bonds.  Robert E. Sternenberg, formerly vice president of the Hughes Tool unit of Baker Hughes Inc., was named senior vice president, chief financial officer and treasurer of this oil and gas service and equipment supplier.  Judith Richards Hope, a senior partner with the law firm of Paul, Hastings, Janofsky & Walker of Los Angeles, was elected a director of this consumer foods company.  She succeeds retiring directors Gwendolyn A. Newkirk, a University of Nebraska professor, and Edward S. Reid, a partner with the New York law firm of Davis, Polk & Wardwell.  The company now has 16 directors.  Kirk Walters, executive vice president and controller, was named to the new post of senior executive vice president and chief financial officer at the thrift institution.  Armed with a machete, Eastman Kodak Co. Chairman Colby H. Chandler marched into a meeting with his top 75 managers last month and began whacking away at a wooden crate.  His subordinates were dumbfounded.  Usually, the diminutive Mr. Chandler emphasizes a point with intricate graphs, and he rarely raises his voice.  But after Kodak's second-quarter profit plunged 85% -- and shocked Wall Street -- only a tantrum, a vivid demonstration of how he wanted to cut costs, would suffice.  "There's no working the middle course in wartime," Mr. Chandler asserted, borrowing a line from Winston Churchill.  The 64-year-old executive, embarking on his fourth restructuring of the company in six years, knows that it is his last chance to prove his leadership before he retires next May.  Already, Kodak watchers are shaking their heads, wondering why he needs four tries to accomplish essentially one job: cut costs.  Is he simply the leader of a gang that can't shoot straight? they ask.  "He's a considerate and sincere person, but he doesn't have the creativity and adaptability needed in today's markets," says Karen Paul, a business professor at the Rochester Institute of Technology.  Even Mr. Chandler's chief lieutenants say that past restructurings, while yielding significant improvements, didn't go far enough.  "We're getting criticized by people who say, 'We've heard this all before,' and ask, 'Why haven't we delivered?' There's some justification for that," says President Kay R. Whitmore.  Indeed, a decision last month to tie annual bonuses to profits rather than to dividends on common stock was first proposed in 1986.  Vice Chairman J. Phillip Samper, says, "We have to be tougher.  Our costs are still too high."  Although the company's cost structure has improved, sales per employee last year totaled only $140,000, far below the $380,000 at Kodak's chief competitor, Fuji Photo Film Co., analysts say.  But does Kodak still have enough time to rein in expenses?  The plan announced last month includes elimination of 4,500 jobs and disposal or restructuring of 20 businesses with $1.25 billion in annual sales; it is designed to generate $1 billion in operating savings in 1990.  But it hasn't dispelled persistent takeover rumors.  Some analysts and investors consider Kodak's stock to be greatly undervalued, given the total value of its assets.  Analysts say the company would fetch at least $75 a share in a takeover, compared with the $47.75-a-share closing price on the New York Stock Exchange yesterday.  Wall Street is buzzing with talk of possible raiders, including Carl Icahn -- although a source close to him says "he hasn't owned Kodak in years."  In any event, Kodak, with 324.2 million shares outstanding and a market capitalization of about $16.2 billion, would be a huge chunk to swallow.  "But it has great break-up value and a stellar name," says a Shearson Lehman Hutton money manager.  The takeover talk is likely to intensify after a federal judge determines, in coming months, the size of the settlement in Polaroid Corp.'s successful instant-camera patent suit against Kodak.  Kodak could get a multibillion-dollar bill for damages -- a fact that has acted as a poison pill, discouraging takeover attempts.  For Mr. Chandler, the job of making elephant-like Kodak dance has been painful and frustrating.  It has required ripping apart a 100-year-old culture that guaranteed lifetime employment but fostered complacency.  Kodak had monopolized photography for so many decades that many managers didn't worry about competition -- or mistakes.  After becoming chief executive six years ago, Mr. Chandler didn't dally.  The methodical engineer set up more than a dozen business units, forced middle managers to make decisions, demanded shorter product-development cycles and even trimmed cafeteria hours.  Some results were gratifying: A color copier went from design to manufacturing in 22 months.  And a color film introduced this spring is widely considered the best in the world.  Last year, when Kodak posted record profit of $1.4 billion, its managers believed that tough times were over.  They were mistaken; in the 1989 first half, net slid 60% as operating earnings declined in most of the company's businesses.  Critics blame Mr. Chandler for not shrinking Kodak's size in one radical restructuring.  Although the entire company was reorganized in 1984 into smaller divisions to make them more efficient, that wasn't enough to avoid a 10% work-force reduction and a 5% budget cut in 1986.  Similarly, Kodak said earlier this year that it would slash costs for support services by 15% by 1990, only to embark on the fourth restructuring last month.  The repeated rounds of cutbacks, some observers say, have demoralized employees and still not done the trick.  In spite of the cuts, Kodak's employment, at 145,300, is still at a peak because of a spate of acquisitions.  And bloating of Kodak's payroll sometimes seems apparent: At a recent meeting about a small legislative matter involving Kodak's Sterling Drug unit, for example, Sterling's two managers were outnumbered by 22 Kodak staffers.  Disgruntled employees recently called for Mr. Chandler's resignation in letters to the editor of Rochester's daily newspapers.  "Perhaps it is time for you to move on and let someone else straighten up the mess," wrote James Powless, an employee at Kodak's Elmgrove plant.  Others recommend the Jack Welch approach at General Electric Co. Asserts Bernard Ouellette, a former Sterling Drug executive: "Divisions should have to defend why they should be kept.  If you want to make motors, you have to show how you can deliver a 13% profit increase.  If you can't, we'll get rid of you.  It's pretty hard stuff, but a big company like Kodak has to go through it."  But Mr. Chandler, who fondly calls his employees members of the "Kodak family," consciously avoided wholesale cuts.  "How big a change can you make without destroying everything in the process?" he asks.  The executive, who grew up on a Maine dairy farm, is especially protective of both the company employees and the city of Rochester.  "There is not a family in Rochester that isn't touched by Kodak in some way," he says.  Unlike a Manhattan executive who never has to face laid-off employees, Mr. Chandler is often greeted by managers on Rochester's streets with a wave and a "Hi, Colby."  "I agonize about every single dismissal from the company," he declares.  Meanwhile, Kodak's diversification binge culminated in its $5.1 billion takeover of Sterling Drug last year.  The camera and film company now also makes such unlikely products as artificial snow, floppy disks and aspirin.  But top executives admit that they need to cull their lines of business and narrow their focus.  "We have an accumulation that we shouldn't have built up," Mr. Chandler says.  At the same time, Kodak has been reluctant to shed products with little growth potential.  For example, the carousel slide projector, a Kodak innovation that is experiencing slow growth, doesn't generate big profits, but Mr. Chandler is reluctant to part with it.  "I have a soft spot in my heart for it," he explains.  And how could Kodak lightly abandon motion-picture film, even though the product's long-term growth is threatened by videotape and high-definition television?  Years ago, movie makers sought Kodak's help in improving film; Kodak responded, and shelves lined with Emmy and Oscar awards hail its achievement.  "There's only one Kodak in the U.S.," says John Larish, a former employee.  "People expect them to continue doing certain things."  Certainly, Kodak faces a dilemma hamstringing many American conglomerates: It must hold down prices or risk losing market share to foreign competitors.  But, at the same time, investors are demanding hefty returns now.  Kodak, which once set prices at will on everything from film to flash-cubes, has been forfeiting increases to stave off Fuji and others.  Competition has been especially fierce in Kodak's key color print film and photographic-paper businesses.  That partly explains why earnings couldn't keep pace with the healthy 9% growth in volume this year.  "Nothing in this world is simple anymore," Mr. Chandler says, adding: "You pay a terrible price to buy market share back."  Yet, at times, top Kodak executives have ignored competitors' strengths.  When a manager began tracking Fuji, he discovered that the Japanese company had been quietly licensing Kodak technology from Kodak's patent attorneys, who didn't inform senior executives.  Fuji also had a more efficient inventory system in the U.S.  While Kodak warehouses stocked almost all its products, Fuji relied on overnight air shipments, which increased freight expenses but sharply reduced inventory costs and delivery times.  After he presented his findings about Fuji to senior management, however, the manager, who has since left the company, says he was told never to talk about it again.  "The message was, 'We don't want to hear that story,'" says the departed manager, who doesn't want to be identified because his wife works at Kodak.  The company declines comment on the incident.  Nor did Kodak always listen to its employees in Japan, who urged the company to assimilate Japanese ways.  Instead, Kodak insisted on imposing its U.S. work policies and refused to offer standard Japanese benefits, such as housing assistance, according to a former Japanese manager.  And until 1985, the print on its familiar yellow film boxes was in English.  The result: Although Kodak has gained 13% share of the Japanese color print film market, employee turnover is high, and Japanese consumers' acceptance of Kodak products is slow.  Kodak acknowledges that it has broken "with some Japanese traditions in terms of office layout and uniforms" and says its housing assistance isn't as high as other employers' or even offered in all cases.  However, it believes that its salaries are generally higher and that it offers an attractive benefit package.  President Whitmore says the battle in Japan was "lost by not being there earlier."  Until five years ago, Kodak executives rejected as too costly opening offices in the world's second-largest photographic market.  "The best we can do now is fight it out," he says.  "We want to make them fight for every share point they got."  While Kodak missed the mark in Japan, the jury is still out on Mr. Chandler's biggest, boldest move -- the Sterling Drug acquisition.  That shocked investors who liked blue-chip Kodak for studiously shunning high debt -- and all the more because Sterling promises slight short-term returns.  The drug company does provide an entry into the fast-growing pharmaceutical business, although Kodak stock has yet to rebound to pre-Sterling highs.  "We won't know for sure if we did it right {buying Sterling} for another five years," Mr. Whitmore says, noting that it takes at least that long to get new drugs on the market.  Absorbing Sterling hasn't been easy.  Kodak wanted Sterling's top managers for their marketing savvy and knowledge of drugs, but within a year most of them left.  Among them was the highly regarded former chairman, John M. Pietruski.  Colleagues say Mr. Pietruski, who declines comment, felt slighted by Kodak's refusal to give him a board seat.  "Pietruski would have been a big help to Colby.  He's the kind of guy who sees things as they are and not as they want them to be," a Sterling manager says.  Kodak executives say they expected management resignations but weren't prepared for problems with Sterling's flagship product, Bayer aspirin.  Kodak assumed that Bayer would take off on reports that aspirin helps heart patients.  "We didn't understand the business," Mr. Whitmore says.  "The big part is, 'I've got a headache,' and that's very competitive."  To Kodak, even Bayer is a minor headache compared with the migraine that hit when Mr. Chandler realized how badly things were going this year.  Kodak's first half ended just a month after the company's annual meeting in May where -- right before giving shareholders free lunch and cholesterol checks -- Mr. Colby optimistically predicted a record 1989.  Although he says he was "surprised" by the pervasiveness of problems, red flags were flying since the beginning of the year.  But subordinates assured top executives that they could "turn it around," Vice Chairman Samper says.  Such was the case in information systems, where operating profits plunged 93%, after new high-tech products stalled and oversupplied customers cut orders.  Now, Kodak is telling its employees: Be productive, or you are out.  But how seriously the company means that isn't clear.  Rather than making hard-nosed decisions about who will go in the 4,500-employee cutback, the company is seeking voluntary resignations with generous severance packages.  "I don't sense a lot of fear, even after the latest announcement," says a former Kodak manager and now a consultant.  In addition, securities analysts are already saying they don't expect Kodak's profit to improve this year.  They are lowering their second-half estimates in anticipation of declines in operating profits in all of Kodak's major business segments.  Prudential-Bache Securities' Alex Henderson reduced his 1989 forecast to $3.60 a share from $3.70 a share, and says that may still be too high.  In 1988, Kodak earned $1.4 billion, or $4.31 a share, on sales of $17.03 billion.  Mr. Chandler has only nine months before his retirement to turn things around, a time pressure that could explain his resort to machete dramatics at meetings.  Mr. Whitmore explains: "We're saying to managers, 'Watch me throw a tantrum,'" in hopes that "they'll finally understand we're serious."  ---  Peter Pae contributed to this story.  John L. Azlant, formerly vice president of planning and analysis at Echo Bay Mines Ltd., was hired as vice president of finance and chief financial officer of this mining concern.  He succeeds C.J. Byrne McNamara, who left the company to pursue other interests.  Robert F. Ellsworth and Lynn E. Weaver were elected to the board of this defense electronics company, increasing board membership to 11.  Mr. Ellsworth, 63 years old, a former deputy secretary of defense and U.S. ambassador to the North Atlantic Treaty Organization, is chairman of Howmet Corp. Mr. Weaver, 58, is president of Florida Institute of Technology.  Alex Balogh was named president and Lars-Erik Johansson was named chief financial officer of this producer of nickel, copper and zinc.  Mr. Balogh, 57 years old, is currently president of Noranda Inc.'s copper division and Mr. Johansson, 43, is a vice president and controller at Boliden Mineral AB, a unit of Trelleborg AB of Sweden.  Noranda and Trelleborg last week successfully completed a tender offer for Falconbridge and plan to run the company as a joint venture.  The appointments must be approved by a new Falconbridge board, which will be named by the two acquiring companies.  William D. Manly was named a director of this energy and environmental services concern, increasing board membership to five.  Mr. Manly is a consultant to the Oak Ridge National Laboratory and previously was a senior officer of Cabot Corp.  Scientists say a new test for cystic fibrosis may be available within weeks, giving a major boost to the nascent genetic testing industry and paving the way for the first widespread screening for carriers of a genetic defect.  The new test will be based on the recent identification of a genetic glitch underlying about 70% of cases of cystic fibrosis, an inherited disease that causes thick mucus to build up in the lungs and often is fatal before age 30.  While the test's emergence was expected in the wake of the finding, its rapid development and the potentially huge demand for it promise an unexpected quantum leap for genetic testing.  Several research teams working on the new test said the technology for it will probably be ready before licensing agreements are worked out.  Companies offering the new test are expected to license it from the two institutions involved in the cystic fibrosis discovery, Toronto's Hospital for Sick Children and the University of Michigan, Ann Arbor.  A test for cystic fibrosis already exists, but the new one will be faster, cheaper, more precise and available to many more people than the old one.  About one in 20 Caucasians are "silent" carriers of the disease, that is, people who have the genetic defect but don't show signs of the disease.  If two such carriers have a child, there is a one-in-four chance their baby will have cystic fibrosis.  The new ability to identify silent carriers of cystic fibrosis "raises the possibility that there will be more genetic testing than ever before by orders of magnitude," said Philip Reilly, medical director of Boston's Shriver Center for Mental Retardation and an authority on genetic testing.  He added that unlike other genetic diseases for which fast, accurate tests exist, cystic fibrosis is one of the most common inherited disorders.  "A reasonable target for testing in the U.S. are the 3.6 million couples having babies annually," he said.  Burgeoning demand for cystic fibrosis testing could overwhelm counselors who advise people about genetic tests and intensify controversy surrounding them, he added.  For example, an obstetrician who doesn't offer the test to a couple might be held liable if they have a child with cystic fibrosis.  Prenatal testing for the disease also might motivate some pregnant women to abort fetuses afflicted with cystic fibrosis.  Alternatively, the test might reduce the number of abortions of normal fetuses by parents who fear they may have a baby with the disease because of a history of occurrence in their family.  Only a small proportion of silent carriers are now identifiable because the existing test for the disease works only in families with previous occurrences of it and requires analysis of genetic material from several family members, including one with cystic fibrosis.  Moreover, the test typically takes two weeks to complete and costs more than $1,000.  The new test initially will cost "hundreds instead of more than a thousand dollars," said Orrie Friedman, chairman and chief executive officer of Collaborative Research Inc., a Bedford, Mass., concern that is one of a handful of places offering cystic fibrosis testing.  Economies of scale, however, might eventually cut its cost to as little as $100, researchers said.  The new test is "technically feasible to do today," said Kathy Klinger, director of genetic disease research at Integrated Genetics Inc., a Framingham, Mass., biotechnology concern recently purchased by Genzyme Corp., Boston.  She added, however, that weeks or months may be needed to complete licensing agreements for commercial use of the test and for doctors to develop guidelines for its use.  Refinements of the test to enable it to identify the 30% of cystic fibrosis carriers who have genetic defects other than the recently discovered one may take a year or so, she said.  Collaborative Research and Integrated Genetics are two of the main commercial players in the market for genetic tests.  Increasing demand for such tests, however, is expected to attract new players, including large medical technology concerns that eventually may offer kits for testing for cystic fibrosis and other diseases.  Currently, the tests are offered as a service at a few laboratories, including some associated with medical schools.  In national over-the-counter trading, Genzyme closed at $12.875, up 75 cents, while Collaborative Research slipped 12.5 cents to $1.75 a share.  When Africans relate their everyday tales of economic misery, they often talk in circles.  "Our countries are too poor to develop themselves, so we must go into debt to develop; but when we have debt, we must pay it back and then we can't develop," says Francis Wainaina, tidying the shelves of his general store here at the foot of Mount Kenya.  "When there is no development, there are no jobs; and when no one has jobs, no one has money."  The circle comes round in his shop.  "When no one has money, business is slow."  Eighty miles to the south, in Nairobi's Pumwani slum, Angelina Kasiva leans against the plastic and cardboard hovel she calls home and spins another circle.  Miss Kasiva, who doesn't know her precise age but guesses 26, recalls leaving her poor rural home as a teen-ager and coming to Nairobi in search of education or a job.  She found neither.  Today, a decade older and still illiterate, she collects and sells scrap metal to provide a little food for her three children.  But she has no hope of paying for their schooling, and, she fears, they will end up just like her: no job, no education; no education, no job.  "No hope, no future," Miss Kasiva whispers.  The circle is complete.  Life in Africa is an endless series of these vicious circles, which spread economic suffering across the continent like concentric rings rippling across a pond after the splash of a stone.  In sub-Saharan Africa, the poorest pond on earth, the stone is the region's $130 billion foreign debt.  "The impact {of the debt} is felt on the whole of the microeconomy," says Kenyan Finance Minister George Saitoti, who uses one-third of his country's export earnings to service its $6 billion debt.  "Without our debt repayments," he muses, "we could have at least 6% growth."  Instead, the economy struggles to barely keep ahead of Kenya's 4% population growth.  Poverty begets debt, debt begets poverty.  Sub-Saharan Africa's debt is about one-tenth of the debt in the developing world, one-quarter of Latin America's debt, and little more than the debt of Brazil.  But according to the World Bank, the debt of sub-Saharan Africa, where 22 of the world's 30 poorest countries are located, equals two-thirds of the region's gross domestic product.  Per-capita debt is more than $240; per-capita GDP is $380.  The debt service, or the principal and interest obligations falling due, amounts to nearly half of the region's export revenues.  Without rescheduling or other relief, some countries are obligated to pay out more than their exports bring in.  Still, the African debt crisis hasn't attracted anywhere near the attention focused on the Latin American debt problem.  For in Africa, economic decay is simply overshadowed by the continent's constant stream of heart-wrenching tragedy.  "It's easy to see a crisis when it involves famine, locusts or war.  You can photograph that and show it on television," says Bisi Ogunjobi, the southern Africa representative of the African Development Bank.  "But this debt crisis is hard to see.  You can't take a picture of debt."  The rigorous fiscal adjustments necessary to meet debt-servicing obligations so strain and weaken a country's meager resources that it becomes susceptible to all manner of economic, social and political upheaval.  Today, many of Africa's vital signs are worse than they were in the 1960s, during the first heady years of the post-colonial era.  In the west African country of Benin, government workers, medical staff and teachers go on strike because they haven't been paid in more than three months.  In Zambia, 15 people die during a riot triggered by cornmeal-price boosts.  In Malawi, industry is reduced to 50% of capacity by a cut in vital imports.  In the Ivory Coast, the banking system nearly collapses when the government agricultural marketing board runs short of money.  Yet Africa's glorious post-independence dreams started shattering when the continent was awash in development money.  Much of it was coming into Africa on expensive financing terms, and much of it was being wasted by mismanagement and corruption.  Then came the oil shocks of the 1970s, which caused import prices to skyrocket, greatly increasing development costs.  At the same time, the prices of Africa's basic commodities, from copper to cocoa, began a steady nosedive, triggering a prolonged foreign-currency drought.  By the mid-1980s, as much money was leaving the continent in debt-service payments as was entering in development aid.  Creditor nations, slow to respond at first, are offering some relief; some are converting loans to grants, others are outright forgiving portions of the debt.  Two months ago, the U.S. dropped its longstanding opposition to debt forgiveness and said it would write off about 20% of its loans, or a total of about $1 billion, to 16 of the poorest African countries.  In return, more than two dozen African countries are adopting market-oriented economic reforms under strict structural-adjustment programs funded by the World Bank and the International Monetary Fund.  But, in typical African fashion, this discipline and outside pressure is causing the vicious circles to spin even faster.  Kenya, for example, is making a brave push to meet its debt obligations -- it eschews rescheduling even though its 33% debt-service ratio (repayments as a portion of export earnings) is one of the highest in Africa -- and it is swallowing the reform medicine of the IMF and World Bank.  This has earned it a credit-worthy reputation abroad.  At home, though, an economic and social time bomb is ticking.  The debt payments and reform belt-tightening are holding back the economy at a time when it needs to be running flat out, making the state turn miserly precisely when it needs to be more generous.  With the population growing at 4% a year, one of the highest rates in the world, there is tremendous pressure for more schools, health centers, agriculture output and, above all, jobs.  Even with substantial development-aid inflows, the government can't keep up with these demands, and the Kenyans, with an average per-capita income of about $360, are expected to somehow uplift themselves.  For instance, the biggest share of the state budget goes to education (mostly for teachers' salaries), but parents are obliged to pay for building and equipping schools.  The result is that more and more children, whose parents can't afford these fees, are being forced to drop out after one or two years of education.  In Nairobi's slums, the Undugu Society, a private welfare agency (Undugu means "brotherhood" in Swahili), is swamped with pupils hoping to get into its free three-year education program.  The only requirements are that the children be at least 12 years old, and have had no previous formal education.  "When classes begin, all the children of the slums suddenly become 12 years old," says Gladys Wambui, the Undugu schools coordinator.  "We have to look at the child's face and say, 'No, you're not 12 yet.'"  But even an education, a precious commodity in Africa, no longer guarantees a job.  Each year, an additional 600,000 people enter the labor market, but the economy is creating less than 100,000 jobs annually.  The streets of Nairobi are teeming with the unemployed.  The more ambitious try to eke out a living in the informal sector, called "jua kali", or hot sun, where they make and repair all manner of things in open-air workshops.  Amid a deafening din at one "jua kali" on the edge of town, where a couple of hundred men hammer metal into a variety of products, George Dhuu, 24, pounds out another chicken feeder.  He sells enough to make about $75 a month, which goes to support his wife and young son and his mother and two brothers.  "A lot of people depend on me," he says.  "But I'm sorry, this is the best I can do."  Prospects are just as grim in the countryside, as the government scales back its ambitions to develop the productive capacity of Kenya's arid and semi-arid regions.  Agriculture-ministry officials say budgetary cuts have left the agriculture-extension services with a lack of vehicles, expert staff, veterinarian supplies and farming aids, which in turn means little or no improvement in the lives of the 15 million Kenyans involved in food production.  At the moment, Kenya is one of the few African countries able to feed itself, but officials worry that the delay in rural development may leave the country dangerously vulnerable to the next drought.  The last severe drought, which historically comes in five-year cycles, was in 1984, before the debt crisis fully hit and when the country still had plenty of foreign currency to import grain.  Rep. Henry Waxman's Aug. 15 letter in response to your Aug. 3 editorial on the president's Clean Air Bill was an accurate and pointed description of America's air-quality problem.  I believe, however, that misrepresentations should be corrected.  Rep. Waxman, a champion of clean air for many years, unfortunately misstates many elements of President Bush's clean-air proposal.  First, he claims the averaging of tailpipe standards would increase emissions.  To ensure that this does not happen, the proposed legislation clearly stipulates averaging can be used "so long as averaging would achieve at least the same reductions."  It is the cost-effectiveness of this averaging program, and other programs, that enables the president's bill to achieve 95% of the environmental benefits of Rep. Waxman's bill at $6 billion less cost.  Second, Rep. Waxman says the legislation would repeal provisions protecting air quality in national parks.  In fact, Mr. Bush's proposal leaves intact protection afforded to the parks under existing regulations.  Parks will benefit from sulfur-dioxide reductions achieved from our proposed acid-rain provisions, reductions from tighter automobile and factory standards, and reductions from the phase-in of clean fuels.  The administration's proposed clean-air legislation is designed to enhance, not degrade, air quality in national parks.  Third, Rep. Waxman refers to relaxation of restrictions on tall stacks at industrial plants.  Again, he fails to note that the 10 million-ton reduction in sulfur dioxide in the president's proposal is far more than has been, or could be, provided through implementation of current regulations governing emissions from tall stacks.  Finally, he criticizes a 50% exemption of major sources of air toxics.  There is no such blanket exemption.  The administration's proposal requires 50% of the affected source categories to be regulated within seven years, with action on the remaining categories within 10 years.  These regulations will achieve a 75% to 90% reduction in air toxic emissions at an acceptable cost.  No affected facility is exempt from the administration's proposal.  William G. Rosenberg  Assistant Administrator for Air and Radiation  Environmental Protection Agency  Washington  Stock prices rose as worries about junk bonds eased, but long-term Treasury bonds and the dollar slipped a little.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average gained 12.92 points to 2687.50 in thin trading.  The dollar dropped against the mark and the yen, but traders welcomed a return to a narrow trading range after sharp swings in the U.S. currency's value Friday.  Bond prices tracked the dollar's course through much of the day.  Traders said that although investors remain worried about the viability of the junk-bond market in the wake of Campeau Corp.'s troubles, they aren't yet running for cover.  Stock-market investors still are trying to puzzle out the impact Campeau's problems ultimately may have on the financing of leveraged buy-outs and mergers and acquisitions.  "The trouble with junk bonds has clouded our market," said Dudley Eppel, senior vice president and manager of equity trading at Donaldson Lufkin & Jenrette.  But he added, "I think the market is holding up quite well."  The modest stock rebound was welcome after two straight weeks of declines from the industrial average's all-time high of 2752.09 on Sept. 1.  But few analysts said they expect another major rally to begin soon.  Besides the junk-bond concerns, investors are uncertain about the direction of the economy.  Another statistic will be added today when the government reports the August consumer-price index.  It is expected to be up about 0.2%, which would have little effect on financial markets.  Despite the dollar's decline, traders said the overall feeling about the currency remains mildly bullish.  But little action is expected this week in advance of a meeting this coming weekend of the Group of Seven industrial powers to discuss monetary policy.  G-7 nations include the U.S., Japan, Britain, West Germany, France, Italy and Canada.  Bond prices drifted lower in concert with the dollar.  Bond traders said the release this week of the Federal Reserve's so-called tan book, a summary of economic activity, may bolster perceptions that inflation continues at a modest rate.  In major market activity:  Stock prices rose in anemic trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 136.9 million shares.  Advancing issues on the Big Board were ahead of decliners 751 to 693.  The dollar eased.  In late afternoon New York trading the currency was at 1.9520 marks and 145.88 yen compared with 1.9660 marks and 146.43 yen Friday.  Bond prices were off slightly.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond lost less than an eighth of a point, or less than $1.25 for each $1,000 of face amount.  The yield on the issue was 8.08%.  More bad oil news is coming out of Alaska.  Although it has been obscured by fallout from the Exxon Valdez oil spill, production in Alaska's big Prudhoe Bay field has peaked and is declining.  Output is expected to fall an average 150,000 barrels a day this year from the 1.6 million a day produced in 1988.  Experts estimate that in 1990 and beyond, production will continue falling at between 4% and 10% a year.  In the oil world, that development isn't a surprise.  No oil fields last forever.  Among some of the oil companies operating on Alaska's North Slope, such as Atlantic Richfield Co., the only surprise is that production hadn't slowed earlier.  Still, the realization that output at the fabled Prudhoe field is slipping is setting off alarms in the industry -- and may do the same soon in Washington.  The field accounts for 20% of U.S. oil output, and its reduced flow would increase U.S. dependence on oil imports.  That in turn could add to the U.S. trade deficit and influence future U.S. energy policies.  Production didn't begin from Prudhoe Bay until 1977, after years of political debate over the building of a pipeline across Alaska.  The field was discovered a decade earlier on Alaska's frigid North Slope.  Its initial 10 billion barrels of proven reserves made it America's largest and one of only 35 so-called supergiants -- those with five billion barrels or more of recoverable oil -- ever discovered.  It soon became a cornerstone of operations for some of the world's biggest oil companies, including Atlantic Richfield and Exxon Corp., which jointly discovered it.  The peaking of Prudhoe Bay production is believed to have been a major factor in British Petroleum Co.'s decision to restructure its operations.  BP's biggest oil holding is in Prudhoe, and it operates half the field.  BP announced last week it is selling $1.31 billion in oil and gas assets and shaking up its world-wide exploration business to spend more money on a "frontier" search for new oil reserves.  Oil experts say the drop in Prudhoe Bay's production underscores the seriousness of the deterioration of America's petroleum base.  The U.S. was once the world's largest oil producer, and until this year, increasing Alaskan output helped offset the plunge in production in Texas and the Southwest.  Between 1985 and 1988, Alaskan crude oil production, the bulk of it from Prudhoe Bay, increased more than 200,000 barrels a day to two million barrels a day, notes John H. Lichtblau, president of the New York-based Petroleum Industry Research Foundation.  During that period, he adds, output in the remainder of the U.S. dropped one million barrels a day to 6.1 million barrels.  "For the last several years, Prudhoe Bay has been the principal factor in offsetting the declines in the lower 48 states," says Mr. Lichtblau, "but now it isn't doing that any more."  No one is writing off Alaska.  Prudhoe Bay isn't the only major field in the state.  The Kuparuk, the second-largest oil field in North America, also is on the North Slope.  And there are others, including a recent significant Atlantic Richfield discovery called the Point McIntyre.  "We still see a long life ahead for Alaska," says an Atlantic Richfield spokesman.  Bernard J. Picchi, a Salomon Brothers Inc. oil analyst recently in Alaska for an on-the-spot look at Point McIntyre and other fields, agrees.  "Alaska has an incredible resource base," he says.  But Mr. Picchi and others worry about the strong anti-oil attitude that has sprung up following the Exxon tanker spill.  They say that may eliminate or postpone the possible discovery and development of new Alaskan fields to replace Prudhoe.  "The Valdez incident has created much negative damage -- a setback for any attempts to make up routine declines in existing fields," says Brice Sachs, a former Exxon planner who is now an energy consultant based in Morristown, N.J.  Among the casualties, he and others note, is any exploration soon in Alaska's Arctic National Wildlife Refuge.  The refuge, or Anwar as it's commonly called, is believed to contain the types of geological structures that could harbor deposits of oil on a par with those of Prudhoe Bay.  But industry officials concede the political impossibility of exploring for oil there for at least two to three years.  Even if big fields exist there, with the lag time needed for development, oil couldn't flow until the next century.  Meantime, the decline in Prudhoe Bay's production, combined with disruptions in shipping oil from Alaska after the Exxon Valdez spill in March, will result in a decline in North Slope output to fewer than 1.9 million barrels a day this year, from two million a day last year. (Alaska produces a modest 40,000 barrels a day outside the North Slope.)  This drop is having a noticeable effect on U.S. crude-oil output.  Industry officials say it is accelerating the erosion that has been entrenched since the 1986 oil-price crash and subsequent drilling collapse.  The American Petroleum Institute says domestic oil output is suddenly falling at an average annual rate of 5% to 6%, nearly double the 3%-plus declines of recent years.  The API reports production for August averaged 7.5 million barrels a day, down from nearly 8.1 million barrels a year earlier and the lowest figure in 25 years.  Oil imports are climbing faster than U.S. production is shrinking because domestic consumption of petroleum is increasing.  According to the API, imports totaled nearly 8.6 million barrels a day in August, up from 7.4 million a year earlier.  Iroquois Brands Ltd. said it agreed to sell the assets of its Schiff Products subsidiary to Weider Health & Fitness of Woodland Hills, Calif., for $8.2 million.  The sale, which will result in a $4.8 million pretax loss, reflects the company's plan to change its business to industrial products from vitamins and pharmaceutical products, Iroquois said.  Proceeds will be used to further that strategy.  MLX Corp. filed a registration statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission covering $120 million of long-term, senior subordinated notes and warrants to acquire some of its own common stock.  The company said it plans to use the proceeds of the offering, combined with certain other new credit facilities, to pay substantially all of the outstanding indebtedness of its operating subsidiaries.  As a result, MLX would acquire the outstanding minority interests in its two principal operating subsidiaries.  MLX also said it has made a formal request to its lenders to reschedule a $21.1 million payment due Sept. 30.  The company said it has asked that the payment be moved back to Dec. 15, and that it expects to reach agreement on the new terms by Sept. 30.  MLX makes equipment for aircraft and heavy-duty vehicles.  Kroger Co. said it signed a pact to sell its Heartland Farms Dairy in Hazelwood, Mo., to Schnuck Markets Inc., a closely held St. Louis food store chain.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The sale is part of Kroger's previously announced plan to sell 11 of its food manufacturing plants as part of a corporate restructuring.  The operator of grocery stores expects the sale of those plants to result in an after-tax gain of about $260 million.  Ametek Inc. said it completed its acquisition of Schlumberger Industries Inc.'s Weston unit, a maker of aircraft cockpit instruments.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Ametek is an instrument maker.  Schlumberger is a unit of Schlumberger Ltd., a New York-based oil-field services concern.  McCormick & Co. said its board authorized the buy-back of as much as 5% of the spice maker's common shares outstanding.  McCormick, which currently has about 20.8 million shares outstanding, has bought back about 3.4 million shares since March 1988.  Concerning your Aug. 15 article about the many ex-aides of key congressional leaders who guided the 1986 tax-reform measure to its successful conclusion who have now become lobbyists against various provisions of the act:  The only clear beneficiaries of the tax system now in effect are those with more than $150,000 in adjusted gross income who find their taxes reduced by 5%; those with more than $250,000 in AGI who find their taxes reduced by 10%; and at, say, $500,000, the very rich are paying at least 20% less under the new law.  The lobbyists against the bill clearly have ended up as beneficiaries.  Nearly all congressmen, with their ability to earn large amounts in lectures and appearances, are also clear beneficiaries.  Cabinet members and most of the people in the Washington establishment at the policy-making levels are beneficiaries.  Corporate executive officers, star athletes, anchormen, successful writers and many others have found their taxes reduced.  But what about the rest of us?  Even the better-off of us are in about the same position as these congressional aides working on civil-service salaries were before they became lobbyists.  And it is far from clear that we have a fairer tax system.  It is instead a much more complicated system that is unfair to millions of taxpayers in the lower- to upper-middle-income brackets.  William W. Hollister  Retired Economist  Rego Park, N.Y.  Your Aug. 16 page-one story concerning the Great Plains must have caused the ghost of Walter Prescott Webb to nod sadly in understanding and agreement.  In his fascinating and scholarly book "The Great Plains," he chronicled the fates of the several homestead acts, told how many cattle went up from Texas to Kansas on the big drives from 1867 through 1880, and described agricultural and water-use practices as the open range changed to fenced farms.  He lamented what he saw as inevitably in store for that vast region if there was crop farming west of the 98th meridian.  What he predicted has come true.  Here in southern Arizona we have a situation in which real-estate developers, irrigating farmers and the mines devour water on the apparent conviction that the underground (and our only) supply is limitless.  Let's hope they're right.  We receive no net recharge to the underground water on which we live, and the hope of the local populace is that a diversion of water called the Central Arizona Project, soon to come to our rescue, will save us all from our profligacy and enable us to continue to pump water for farms and indulge in such ventures as fountains and artificial lakes.  Interestingly, the anti-conservation forces claim that there is no serious water problem, and the economy of the state -- at least of the southern part -- is based upon a constant, almost frantic, drive for population growth.  I have a feeling that if Prof.  Webb were here now he would have no more impact on this situation than he did on the situation he saw so clearly in the Great Plains area.  Time will tell.  Danforth Killips  Tucson, Ariz.  Lloyds Bank PLC, continuing its retrenchment from low-margin U.S. businesses, agreed to sell its U.S. commercial-banking operation to Japan's Daiwa Bank Ltd. for about $200 million.  The U.S. operation, with 170 employees in 15 offices, had net income of $11 million last year on overall assets of $1.46 billion, for a return of about 0.8%.  It represents about a third of Lloyds's activities in the U.S.  The sale reflects Lloyds's strategy to divest itself of low-profit, overseas businesses to concentrate on higher-margin operations in Britain and elsewhere in Europe.  It also may blunt takeover speculation surrounding the bank, Britain's fourth-largest in assets.  The agreement also highlights the rising profile of Japanese banks in the U.S.  The acquisition gives Daiwa -- the world's 25th-largest bank and one of Japan's 13 major commercial banks -- an established U.S. network, staff and expertise to expand its business with medium-sized U.S. corporations.  The transaction appears relatively low-cost: Daiwa is paying roughly 1.66 times indicated book value for the business.  Lloyds said its U.S. commercial-banking business wasn't achieving returns on equity or assets targeted for the group world-wide.  The business's return on net assets was a quarter of the bank's average, and the U.S. operation's 8% return on equity was well below the 18% targeted by the bank as a whole.  "The return was perfectly respectable in the U.S. but it just isn't good enough for us," said Michael Thompson, Lloyds's deputy chief executive.  "We could get the same returns if we kept it all in cash in the money markets" in Europe, he said.  Mr. Thompson added that the divestment reflects Lloyds's previously announced plan to focus on four major business areas: retail banking in Britain, financial services, corporate banking and private banking.  Banking industry analysts also said the higher cost of capital for European banks, which trade at much lower price-to-earnings ratios than Japanese competitors, makes far-flung operations increasingly unattractive for European institutions.  Bankers estimate the average British bank's cost of capital is currently triple that for a Japanese bank.  Lloyds has freed up #800 million ($1.25 billion) in capital over the past five years through such transactions as selling its California unit to Sanwa Bank Ltd. and closing its U.S. government-securities primary dealership.  Mr. Thompson said the divestment of the U.S. commercial-banking business could contribute to a Lloyds defense against any hostile takeover bid, a subject of continuing speculation in the London markets.  "The defense {to a takeover} is performance; this is certainly part of maintaining that performance," he said.  Mr. Thompson said proceeds will be used for general corporate purposes, and that Lloyds isn't planning any major acquisitions.  Lloyds's biggest recent acquisition was last year's purchase of a 57% stake in Abbey Life Group PLC, a British insurer, which sharply increased the bank's financial-services activities in Britain.  The sale will leave Lloyds with about 350 employees in the U.S. in foreign-exchange and other money-market operations, corporate lending and private banking.  The divested commercial-banking network includes offices in New York, Chicago, Los Angeles, Atlanta and Dallas.  Fall's Alarm  Dear baseball team, you've been supreme]  This doubting fan you've shocked]  With joy I wept in Aug. and Sept.  And prayed for a great Oct.]  -- Dick Emmons.  ---  Easy Money  To the politician a sin tax,  Is one that rarely will hurt you,  For it painlessly brings in more cash,  Than would a tax on virtue.  -- Edward F. Dempsey.  The International Monetary Fund approved a $53.3 million loan to Gabon to support economic and financial changes in the African oil-exporting country.  The IMF loan will be disbursed in installments during the next 18 months.  Gabon's agreement calls for action by the country to revive growth in the non-oil sector of its economy, adoption of a restrictive domestic-credit policy and reductions in Gabon's international-payments deficit during the 1989-1990 period.  In other action, the IMF cleared a $25.5 million loan to Laos, to support structural economic adjustments in the Southeast Asian country during the next three years.  The IMF said the borrower, formally known as the Lao People's Democratic Republic, since 1985 has been shifting its economy away from central planning to give the private sector a greater role in production, trade and other developments.  Foreign-exchange restrictions also have been eased, the agency said.  Separately, the IMF cleared a $26 million loan to Haiti.  The loan will be disbursed in installments during the next 15 months to support the Caribbean country's economic changes.  Two of three European companies linked by the Italian news media to a scandal surrounding unauthorized lending by Banca Nazionale del Lavoro's Atlanta branch denied any wrongdoing, while a third declined to comment.  A spokesman for Creusot Loire Industrie S.A. denied the French maker of armor plate has done business with BNL. Creusot Loire, along with West Germany's Thyssen AG and Britain's Ferranti International Signal PLC were named in the report as being under investigation by the Italian secret service.  The secret service declined to comment on the report.  A Thyssen spokesman said that earlier this year, the company had to deliver some spare parts -- worth less than $10 million -- for a petrochemical plant in Basra, Iraq.  The transaction was guaranteed by the Central Bank of Iraq, which obtained a counterguarantee from BNL's Atlanta branch.  The plant was built several years ago by Thyssen Rheinstahl Technik, a Thyssen unit, and Lummus Crest Inc.  "We have delivered the parts and we've got our money," said the spokesman.  "That's all" Thyssen had to do with BNL Atlanta, he said, adding, "It was completely normal business; nothing to do with weapons."  In London, a Ferranti spokesman declined to comment on whether BNL provided commercial guarantees for a Ferranti weapons contract to Iraq.  He added that his company uses "many, many banks" in financing its various international-defense contracts.  He denied that any BNL guarantees are involved in Ferranti's current problems.  Ferranti has indefinitely suspended its stock-trading in London pending an internal audit on "significant irregularities" in certain of its overseas defense contracts.  New Deal philosophers Adolph Berle and Gardner Means in 1932 published "The Modern Corporation and Private Property," a book that much pleased the American near-left.  It argued that the ascendancy of professional managers as a result of the broad spread of public stock ownership of the Roaring '20s had severed corporate control from corporate ownership.  Government was justified in challenging these managers who had usurped economic power.  Nine years later, in "The Managerial Revolution," James Burnham attacked from the opposite direction.  He asserted that capitalism itself, not government, had the most to fear from the new professionals.  They offer little resistance to socialism, he argued, because they have no deep philosophical commitment to private property and could as happily manage state corporations as private ones.  Professionally managed corporations grew and prospered despite such attacks.  The professionals were good at their jobs.  Alfred P. Sloan Jr. decentralized General Motors, showing how to manage efficiently vast enterprises with many production and sales units and many thousands of employees.  Pearl Harbor touched off amazing managerial feats as consumer-goods plants were retooled in months to produce weapons.  Postwar, CEOs made use of strong dollars and American political hegemony to internationalize.  In response to political and social pressures in the 1960s and 1970s, they turned corporations into miniwelfare states, with wide-ranging benefits and protections for employees.  Now, another challenge looms.  Professional managers are confronted with "the market for corporate control" as raiders seek their assets and power.  LBOs, management buy-outs, division spinoffs and stock repurchases are restoring narrow private ownership.  As owners increasingly take a direct hand in management, and vice versa, corporations look more and more like those created early in the century by the likes of J.P. Morgan, Henry Ford, Thomas Edison, Harvey Firestone and other rugged individualists.  A new debate rages: Is this bad or good?  Do the raiders mostly milk the corporations?  Is the heavy use of leverage dangerous?  Is there insufficient regard for employee welfare?  Does the risk of hostile takeovers force corporate officers to focus on the short term and ignore the corporation's long-range interests?  An excellent discussion of these issues is offered in the September-October Harvard Business Review by two Harvard Business School professors, Michael C. Jensen and Jay O. Light.  Prof.  Jensen argues that what he calls the "Eclipse of the Public Corporation" is, on balance, good.  For one thing, it is breaking down the natural reluctance of managers to return surpluses to the capital markets through dividends, where they will be subject to market judgments in their reinvestment.  It has subjected managers not only to capital-market disciplines but also to the direct scrutiny of new owners with very large stakes in performance.  Managers are no longer as able as in the past to apply their own tests to investment decisions.  Those tests might be no more beneficial to shareholders or the economy than their desire to make the company larger, giving themselves more prestige and middle managers more chances for promotion.  Prof.  Jensen asserts, "The publicly held corporation, the main engine of economic progress in the United States for a century, has outlived its usefulness in many sectors of the economy and is being eclipsed."  He believes that a profound change in American capitalism is well under way and thinks it should be encouraged.  "By resolving the central weakness of the public corporation -- the conflict between owners and managers over the control and use of corporate resources -- these new organizations are making remarkable gains in operating efficiency, employee productivity and shareholder value.  Over the long term, they will enhance U.S. economic performance relative to our most formidable international competitor, Japan, whose companies are moving in the opposite direction."  This revolution is not happening because someone decreed a new "industrial policy" from Washington, but rather because of major changes taking place in the capital markets themselves.  Huge supplies of capital are building up in the hands of institutional investors -- pension funds in particular.  Their investment needs are very different from those of individual investors.  In his companion piece, Prof.  Light notes that pension funds don't really need the liquidity the individual wants, since they "can project their cash needs well into the future based on predictable factors such as employee demographics, life expectancies and health trends.  So they can take a long-term view of investment returns and keep their holdings in illiquid assets."  Stock trading is essentially a zero-sum game for big funds since, on average, their managers can never beat the market itself.  So it is an attractive alternative to take large positions in companies, through private placements or LBO syndicates, and exercise a direct hand in improving the company's investment performance.  Prof.  Jensen notes that private placements of debt and equity have risen more than tenfold since 1980 and now account for more than 40% of annual corporate financings.  "In every year since 1983, at least 5% of the outstanding value of corporate equity has disappeared through stock repurchases, takeovers, and going-private transactions."  Indeed, Prof.  Light observes, fancifully he admits, that if the current trend should continue, "the last share of a publicly traded common stock owned by an individual will be sold in the year 2003."  There is a certain plausibility in the argument that greater owner involvement in corporate management is a good thing.  Indeed, some corporate CEOs take that view themselves, saying that operating a company in a kind of ownership limbo makes them uncomfortable.  On the other hand, very few CEOs want to be victims of hostile takeovers.  And their fears that some of the raiders are merely looking for a short-term gain, not real ownership, have justification in recent experience.  Then, of course, there is the question of what role stock exchanges will play in this future world of narrow ownership and less interest in liquidity.  Will they become less important?  Prof.  Jensen doesn't think that the privatization trend will be universal.  The conventional 20th-century model of corporate governance, with widely dispersed owners and professional managers, will remain viable for growth industries, where attractive opportunities for investment continue to exceed cash generation, he believes.  Such firms will continue to need capitalmarket liquidity.  Computers, electronics, biotechnology and financial services are examples.  Privatization is most appealing for industries with large cash flows and limited opportunities.  In short, American industry and capital markets can, in the absence of political interference, adapt to changing circumstances quite effectively.  That early debate about the consequences of the gap between ownership and control has taken a long time to bear fruit.  But now the market is setting about to resolve it.  In the race for stock-market profits, some financial advisers say it may be time for mutual-fund investors to bet on the "tortoises."  The tortoises in question are funds run by portfolio managers who follow the so-called value-investing approach.  They are bargain hunters, who buy stock in companies that are undervalued based on various measures of what the companies are worth today.  Unlike growth-fund managers, who are willing to pay high prices for stocks on the basis of expectations about future earnings power, value managers refuse to pay for what might happen tomorrow.  When the market is soaring, value funds are tortoises, failing to match the streaking performance of the growth-fund "hares."  But the market has already risen so much, some investment advisers doubt there's that much more to gain.  And if the market should take a plunge, they say, value funds should cushion the fall.  "Buying value mutual funds makes sense now if you are nervous about the market," says Donald Phillips, editor of Mutual Fund Values, a Chicago publication that tracks mutual funds.  Kurt Brouwer, a San Francisco investment adviser, agrees.  "If you want to get into the stock market now, the best way is to buy good value mutual funds," he says.  "They have cash positions ranging from 15% to 25% {of their total investment portfolios}, and they are still looking for undervalued companies."  It's this cash position, plus the cheap stocks they have purchased, that protects investors in a downdraft.  So far this year, growth funds have clearly outrun the value funds, by investing in hot sectors like telecommunications and cable TV, or in takeover stocks.  While value funds have cashed in on some of the takeover action, their large cash positions have held them back.  "Like your grandmother, they have refused to pay high prices," says Mr. Brouwer.  For example, Delaware Group Trend Fund and Twentieth Century Growth Fund, two popular growth funds, were up 49.7% and 43.6%, respectively, through Aug. 31, according to Lipper Analytical Services.  In contrast, Mutual Shares and Lindner Fund, two big value funds, were up 18.8% and 19.6%, respectively.  But during the fourth quarter of 1987, the quarter of the October stock-market crash, value funds clearly outperformed growth funds.  Delaware Group Trend Fund plunged 31.2% and Twentieth Century Growth tumbled 27.3%, according to Lipper.  Meanwhile, Lindner Fund and Mutual Shares both fell about 16%.  Ken Gregory, partner in Litman/Gregory & Co., a San Francisco money manager, says value funds tend to have fewer bad years than growth funds.  Looking at a group of top-performing no-load mutual funds over the past 10 years, he says, the growth funds in the group had a negative year 22% of the time.  But the value funds ended up in the red in only 9% of the years.  Moreover, in the loss years, the growth funds lost more than twice as much as the value funds, Mr. Gregory says.  Value funds can make it easier, psychologically, to stick with an investment program because they keep investors from getting so discouraged in down markets.  "I keep very little of my clients' money in aggressive growth funds," says Laura Adams, a Princeton, N.J., financial planner.  "They are so volatile that many people have trouble dealing with them."  Identifying funds that are truly value funds can be tricky.  For one thing, they don't fit into any of the handy categories used by mutual-fund analysts.  Some are classified as growth or growth-and-income funds, while others fall in the capital-appreciation and, even, small-company-stock categories.  In addition, investors can't always judge by a fund's name.  Some value funds -- like Royce Value, Bartlett Basic Value and Merrill Lynch Basic Value A -- use the word "value" in their names, says Mr. Phillips of Mutual Fund Values.  But others don't.  As a result, investors need to look at the kind of stocks a fund holds.  Value funds own stocks with low price-to-book ratios and low price-earnings ratios, two indicators of value.  The price-to-book ratio is the relationship of a company's stock price to its book value (assets minus liabilities) per share.  The price-earnings ratio is calculated by dividing a stock's price by earnings per share.  Value funds like Windsor Fund, Bartlett Basic Value and Babson Value have price-to-book ratios that are 50% of the general market's price-to-book ratio, Mr. Phillips says.  So which value funds do investment advisers like these days?  Mr. Phillips chooses Clipper Fund, Merrill Lynch Basic Value A, Babson Value Fund and FPA Perennial Fund.  Mr. Brouwer, the San Francisco investment adviser, suggests Vanguard Equity Income Fund, Nicholas Fund and Nicholas II, Linder Fund, Gabelli Asset Trust, Evergreen Fund and Evergreen Total Return Fund.  Mr. Gregory likes Mutual Shares and the Windsor Fund (both closed to new investors), Gabelli Asset Fund, Selected American Shares, Lindner Fund and Lindner Dividend Fund, and Clipper Fund.  Maxwell Communication Corp. moved to increase its growing role in the U.S. textbook market by agreeing to buy Bell & Howell Co.'s Merrill Publishing unit for $260 million.  The purchase of Merrill, an old name in U.S. elementary and secondary school publishing, would further strengthen Maxwell's position in U.S. textbook publishing through its U.S. unit, Macmillan Inc.  A recently formed Macmillan joint venture with McGraw-Hill Inc. is already the second-biggest publisher of U.S. textbooks, after New York-based Harcourt Brace Jovanovich Inc.  The purchase price, at least twice Merrill's expected sales this year, reflects the continuing allure of U.S. educational publishers, analysts said.  Since about 1985, U.S. elementary school enrollment has been rising.  That demographic trend, expected to continue into the late 1990s, is increasing school book sales across the U.S. and perking up a once-dull niche of publishing.  This year, publishers' sales to elementary and secondary schools are expected to rise at least 11% from last year's $1.78 billion, said New York-based industry analyst Kendrick Noble of PaineWebber Securities Inc.  "The schools area {of publishing} is assured good growth into the 1990s," Mr. Noble said.  Such expectations have already prompted a series of industry mergers, as publishers jockey for position.  Besides the Macmillan/McGraw venture, announced last May, other industry mergers have included Time Inc.'s 1986 purchase of Scott Foresman and Harcourt's purchase of CBS Inc.'s textbook unit.  Since 1986, analysts say, the sales prices for these and other educational publishers have ranged from 2.2 to 2.9 times revenue -- a figure comparable to Merrill's sales multiple.  William Reilly, president of Maxwell's Macmillan, called the $260 million purchase "reasonable for a company" with Merrill's strengths in science, health, and mathematics texts -- three areas of "weakness" for the Macmillan/McGraw-Hill venture.  Mr. Reilly said he expects Merrill's sales to exceed $125 million in the fiscal year ending March 31.  About 70% of that, he said, represents sales to elementary and secondary schools, while the remainder stems from college text sales.  Mr. Reilly said Merrill's elementary and secondary school business would be merged into the Macmillan/McGraw-Hill venture.  Merrill's college text business is to be consolidated into Macmillan's own college unit, he said.  Mr. Reilly added that he believes the purchase would make Macmillan/McGraw-Hill the biggest U.S. textbook publisher, with combined sales of $550 million.  But some industry analysts disputed that claim.  BP Report, a White Plains, N.Y., trade publication, estimated Harcourt's educational book sales last year at $643 million.  Bell & Howell, a publishing and information services concern based in Skokie, Ill., was acquired last year for $678.4 million by an investor group led by Texas financier Robert M. Bass.  In Dallas, Bass spokesmen declined to discuss details of the Merrill sale.  Jerry Herb, corporate vice president for administration at Bell & Howell, said Columbus, Ohio-based Merrill posted revenue last year of about $100 million.  Though profitable, Mr. Herb said, with the overall consolidation going on in the publishing industry a $100 million company would find it more and more difficult to compete and be cost effective.  Bell & Howell has tried unsuccessfully for several years to expand Merrill by acquiring other companies.  When that proved unsuccessful, it decided to sell.  "It just came down to a numbers game," said Mr. Herb.  He said Bell & Howell has owned Merrill for more than 20 years.  ---  Robert Tomsho in Dallas contributed to this article.  If there is a "Gold Coast" in the Midwest outside Chicago's North Shore, it is Michigan's Oakland County.  Encompassing more than 50 bedroom communities north of Detroit, Oakland County has one of the highest per-capita incomes in the Midwest, according to the 1980 U.S. census.  The city of Troy, whose gleaming highrises symbolize the county's rapid economic growth in this decade, recently was named one of the nation's three largest "boom towns of the 1990s" by this newspaper.  Bloomfield Hills, whose 1980 per-capita income was $37,808, is one of the wealthiest communities in the U.S.  Oakland County has more than private wealth -- it also receives Community Development Block Grant funds from the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development.  Public records show that Oakland County (excluding Pontiac, the county's least prosperous area) has received more than $62 million in HUD block grants since 1975 (about two-thirds -- $40,602,915 -- between 1981 and 1989).  In the current fiscal year, Oakland County (again, excluding Pontiac) received $4,319,313.  HUD's block grant program, established to assist the nation's poor, also helps Oakland County's wealthy.  HUD is engulfed in scandal; a series of revelations in recent months has linked agency officials to influence-peddling and the misuse of taxpayer funds, often at the behest of members of Congress.  Though it has been overlooked in the scandal, the block grant program is a classic example of HUD's misuse of taxpayer money.  Except for the philosophical opposition of a few free-market-oriented think tanks (Heritage, Cato, the Mises Institute), the block grant program has escaped scrutiny.  That should come as little surprise.  Any member of Congress who opposes the program risks the ire of local officials receiving block grants back in the district.  Reporters and editors have spent more time chasing headlines than critically examining the "raison d'etre" of HUD spending.  Block grants differ from HUD's Urban Development Action Grant (UDAG) program, established during the Carter administration.  Congress has defunded the UDAG program, effective this month, while block grants are still being dispensed to local officials.  Since its creation by President Nixon, the block grant program has been popular among Republicans.  GOP Rep. William Broomfield's district includes part of Oakland County.  Ending the HUD program, Mr. Broomfield contends, is unrealistic because "there would be too much opposition at the local level.  With this type of program there has been a considerable amount of support for it among local officials."  A Broomfield aide explains, "He's being pragmatic.  They're tremendously popular with local communities."  Oakland Township is one of the communities in Mr. Broomfield's district where block grants have proved popular.  Hidden within HUD's $3 billion block-grant program is a $14,775 block grant to Oakland Township for "Downtown Revitalization."  Trouble is, there is no downtown in Oakland Township, one of the county's newest bedroom communities.  "Downtown" is a parking lot at the Oakland Township hall.  Records show the HUD grant is to "purchase and improve" the lot, located in a section known as Goodison.  Goodison is so small that it does not even have a traffic light.  "It {Goodison} is strange because it really doesn't exist," said Joan Buser, Oakland Township's Republican supervisor.  "If you had to define Goodison, what would you call it?  It's not a village.  It's not a city.  It's not a street.  It's an enigma."  Goodison may be an enigma, but HUD has also given Oakland Township an $11,810 block grant to "reduce interest charges for business owners in the 'Goodison Historical Area'" and a $13,543 grant to construct "barrier free improvements" at the township hall, records show.  HUD block grant funds pay for more than government parking lots and commercial revitalization in the county.  Overall, one in every eight dollars received by Oakland County communities under the block grant program -- $1 million -- is spent on administration, records show.  Many of the projects funded by HUD block grants in the county could be paid for at the local level through millages.  Boom-city Troy will receive $161,649 in block grants in the current fiscal year for "water system and street improvements."  Mayor Richard Doyle says abolishing the block grant program "wouldn't have a major impact," although it does not make sense for the city to turn down HUD funds while they are available.  "A growth area has the ability to tax itself and finance the solution to some of those problems," says Rep. Bob Carr, a Democrat whose district includes part of the county.  Rep. Carr favors tightening eligibility requirements for the program.  He supports continued funding for depressed areas such as Pontiac, which is in his district.  "For an area of economic decline and a dwindling tax base, the chances of digging yourself out of a hole are slim or none," Mr. Carr said.  Rep. Broomfield supports funding for upscale communities in his district and Pontiac: "Pontiac is a community in need of assistance."  During a July 10 speech in Detroit, HUD Secretary Jack Kemp said, "There are a lot of {HUD} programs that need to be reformed -- every one.  We should have the courage to close programs that don't work."  Mr. Kemp should start with HUD's block grant program, which enriches wealthy areas at the poor's expense.  ---  Mr. Kaza, an Oakland County resident, is vice president for policy research at the Makinac Center, of Midland, Mich.  Monsanto Co.'s G.D. Searle & Co. unit said it acquired Heumann Pharma G.m.b.H. & Co., a West German pharmaceutical concern.  Searle didn't disclose terms of the acquisition.  Heumann Pharma has about 500 employees, and a Searle spokeswoman said the European concern had 1988 sales of about $55 million.  Searle is the pharmaceutical subsidiary of Monsanto, a St. Louis maker of drugs and farm chemicals.  NBC News is trying to lure the executive producer of "Entertainment Tonight," to work on the morning "Today" show and develop a variety of programs for the network, people close to the talks said.  The executive producer, Dave Nuell, has reportedly been offered in excess of $2 million over three years, an unusually high sum for a producer.  Mr. Nuell, a former news director at the NBC-owned station in Washington, D.C., prior to joining "Entertainment Tonight" in 1987, is credited with the ratings and editorial resurgence of the daily program, produced by Paramount Television, a unit of Paramount Communications Inc.  The deal does not only include NBC News, however, an NBC spokeswoman said.  Mr. Nuell would also work with NBC Sports and NBC Entertainment in a unique relationship to develop programs for three divisions of one network.  The negotiations involved NBC Entertainment President Brandon Tartikoff as well as the presidents of NBC News and Sports.  Mr. Nuell didn't return phone calls to his office.  NBC News, a unit of General Electric Co.'s National Broadcasting Co., is the only one of the three major U.S. network news divisions not to have a regularly scheduled program in prime time.  NBC News' most recent attempt, "Yesterday, Today, Tomorrow," has had three airings.  The program has done well in the ratings, but has been drubbed by critics.  The "Today" show has undergone a number of changes since last month, when NBC asked NBC Sports President Dick Ebersol to assume the additional responsibility of overseeing "Today."  Mr. Ebersol, who has been an executive producer of the network's "Saturday Night Live" and "Friday Night Videos," replaced on-air correspondent/news reader John Palmer with Deborah Norville.  Ms. Norville also has served as a substitute for co-anchor Jane Pauley.  Mr. Ebersol also couldn't be reached to comment.  The "Today" show is in a battle for the top-rated morning show with Capital Cities/ABC Inc.'s "Good Morning America."  The ABC show is produced by ABC's entertainment division.  Lone Star Technologies Inc. said one of its subsidiaries entered into a definitive agreement to sell essentially all of its assets to Koch Engineering Co.  The subsidiary is John Zink Co., an environmental systems and services unit.  Koch Engineering makes chemical and petroleum processing equipment and is a subsidiary of Koch Industries Inc., based in Wichita, Kan.  Terms of the transaction, which is expected to close within two weeks, weren't disclosed.  VWR Corp. said its VWR Scientific unit acquired most of Sargent Welch Scientific Co.'s laboratory and science-education distribution business for about $21 million.  Sargent Welch is a unit of Artra Group Inc. VWR said the acquisition is in keeping with its previously reported plan to focus on its laboratory-supply distribution operations, which had sales of about $330 million in the year ended Feb. 28.  As reported, VWR plans to spin off to shareholders its graphics supplies and textile-related operations.  VWR said the acquired Sargent Welch businesses have annual sales of about $50 million.  Ollie Coleman lives in fear of the ultimate disgrace: "Dying in the pen."  It may be an ignominious end, but it is a common one for the likes of Mr. Coleman, a 74-year-old inmate in the State Park Correctional Center here.  Old convicts don't just fade away, it seems, they just move to State Park.  The pink, green and mauve buildings of this former tuberculosis hospital have been transformed into what may be the wave of the future in American corrections -- specially-designated prisons for the elderly.  As the nation's prison population ages, other facilities are expected to go the way of this one, providing ramps, rails and 24-hour medical surveillance in place of bars and razor-edged wire.  Security is evidently not a big problem in such institutions, although there was one attempted escape -- by-wheelchair at State Park.  The staff can easily outrun most of the inmates.  Moreover, there are more people on waiting lists trying to get in than there are prisoners trying to get out.  In fact, a 66-year-old inmate once escaped by running off with a worker in her 30s, only to change his mind.  After a few days, he knocked on the warden's door asking to be reincarcerated, explaining that he missed the prison's medical attention.  With the so-called graying of America, more elderly than ever are behind bars.  A recent study by the American Correctional Association showed a 50% increase during the past four years in the number of inmates over the age of 55 (the usual minimum age at State Park is 55 except for convicts with special medical needs).  At the same time, prisons are starting to feel the impact of longer sentences.  More ominously, a geriatric crime wave appears to be sweeping the nation.  Criminologists attribute the apparent crime spree to the frustrations of old age in this country, among them poverty and feelings of uselessness.  Murder, sex offenses and arson are the crimes most often committed by the elderly, says Braden L. Walter, a prison consultant.  "A grandfather living with his daughter will murder his son-in-law or a long-simmering dispute over a property line will erupt into a neighbor being murdered," he says.  Drug dealing is also growing, especially among grandmothers who must raise their grandchildren because their daughters have problems with crime or drugs.  Here at State Park, a hundred or so such male offenders, and 15 such females, are living out their days.  While hardly idyllic, as prisons go this is a relatively cheery place.  The grounds are meticulously tended, largely by the inmates.  The rose gardens are the particular province of a 70-year-old convicted murderer who sculpts rows of cedar hedges into geometric shapes.  The work programs are much less taxing than those in a general prison.  Jobs for those under 65 include making fishing tackle and maintaining the facility's greenhouse.  At 65, inmates are allowed to retire from prison labor.  In most ordinary prisons, this means the elderly have nothing to do.  But Warden Judith Anderson believes activity is important.  "We want their lives to have some meaning.  Our most enthusiastic workers are over 65," she says.  Mr. Coleman is one.  Despite his high blood pressure and a recent heart attack, he delivers mail two or three times a day throughout the sprawling complex.  The younger inmates typically have a more structured day.  Each morning "Miss Sara," a 61-year-old woman serving a 30-year sentence for manslaughter, reports to the greenhouse for work, and three days a week she joins several others for a supervised morning walk around the grounds.  After lunch, she and three others make fishing tackle for a local company.  In the hour or so before dinner, she has group therapy, which she calls "my harness-emotions meeting," since this is where she has been told she must learn self-control.  On two Friday nights each month, the height of the social calendar, there's bingo.  But some six months ago at State Park, this was eclipsed as the favorite activity by a new pastime -- singing in the church choir under the conductorship of 56-year-old celebrity inmate James Brown, the self-proclaimed "Godfather of Soul."  Mr. Brown is in prison for assault and other offenses.  Generally, there isn't much in the way of physical violence here, but the officers are often called upon to break up abusive verbal battles.  These usually take place on the front porch, where male inmates swap tales in competition for toughest-guy-in-the-old-days status.  But the main bone of contention, say officers, is the temperature level of the air-conditioners, installed in each dorm room and usually shared by four residents.  Also, say officers, it isn't uncommon for one or two residents to steal each other's tomato plants.  As at most prisons, drugs are a problem.  One elderly man complains that his three roommates "do the stuff {marijuana mostly} at night."  He worries that he will be implicated when they get caught.  "If the stuff is shoved across the room and lands under your bunk, it's yours even if you don't know it," he says.  Still, it's possible at times to forget that State Park is a prison.  Warden Anderson, an upbeat 46-year-old who has been working in prisons for 21 years, insists that the inmates be called residents "for the sake of human dignity."  And there are no guards, she insists.  "They are correctional officers."  Periodically, of course, there are reminders that the inmates don't run their own lives.  Loudspeakers, mounted on tall poles every several feet, blurt out the names of officers and inmates, requesting their presence at headquarters.  Officers go about their business in uniform.  And prisoners' doors are locked at night.  Yet State Park inmates are far luckier than most convicts their age.  With the exception of a few states such as South Carolina, North Carolina and Florida, most of the nation's elderly prisoners, often called "old Joes," live among the general prison population.  There, the elderly become easy targets for abusive or violent younger inmates.  Some need special diets that most prisons aren't equipped to prepare.  Those who aren't sick enough to be hospitalized often need daily access to medical personnel.  Also, at most prisons, counseling is geared to rehabilitating younger inmates, not to coping with issues such as chronic illness and death.  Amidst all the other pressing problems facing prisons, "elderly inmates seem to fall through the institutional cracks," says Richard Franklin, a program specialist at the National Institue of Corrections in Washington, D.C.  But back in 1970, South Carolina's prison officials began providing special facilities for the elderly -- long before most states pondered the issue.  The state, which usually ranks first or second nationally in the number of inmates per capita, is renowned for its harsh sentencing practices.  Consequently, it has always had its share of long-termers growing old behind bars.  Needing more space, the state's prison for the elderly moved into this former tuberculosis hospital in 1983.  The medical set-up comes in handy.  The litany of medical problems facing the prison population mirrors that of any group of the elderly.  Severe high blood pressure and arthritis top the list.  Those on dialysis and chemotherapy are bused daily by State Park staff to a nearby hospital.  At the prison itself, a full-time doctor writes an average of 925 prescriptions a month.  Thirteen nurses are on duty around the clock.  Such care is costly.  In most prisons, the high cost of medical care makes elderly inmates up to three times as expensive to warehouse as younger ones.  For state prisons the burden is especially onerous because inmates are not eligible for Medicare, veterans' benefits or Social Security.  Consequently, the states end up paying bills the federal government would normally pay.  Here at State Park, on a hot September day, Mr. Coleman sits in the shade of an old cherry tree and reflects on all this.  Except for three escapes from a chain gang, he's spent most of 40 years in prison, for a murder in 1948 and another, 20 years later.  In some ways, he believes he has lived longer because he has been behind bars.  "On the outside, women and whiskey are gonna shorten your days.  For one thing, you eat here on a regular basis."  Waving his long thin arm across a courtyard where two other old cons fan themselves with folded magazines, he acknowledges, "It's a strange thing, but I'm still living by being here."  Just the same, says Mr. Coleman, who is up for parole next year and hopes to die a free man, "I'd rather be out there taking my chances."  First Bank System Inc. said it is weighing a possible restructuring that could result in as much as $40 million in charges by year end, as well as the cutback of its work force by one-fifth and a reduction of about $2 billion in assets.  The Minneapolis-based regional bank-holding company, which has been successfully rebounding from a $310 million loss last year, said it undertook the "strategic review of its major business segments" in a bid to improve the company's operating performance and "to continue to lower its risk profiles."  First Bank disclosed the review at an early stage, it said, to put an end to what it termed rumors circulating about its intentions.  But the company steadfastly refused to elaborate on what options it is considering.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange yesterday, First Bank System shares slipped $1.25 to close at $22.875.  Additionally, the company said it expects its provision for nonperforming loans to substantially increase in the current quarter, because of some troubled leveraged buy-out investments with which it is involved.  In a prepared release, D.H. Ankeny, Jr., the company's chairman, president and chief executive officer, said First Bank "must seriously consider eliminating or downsizing some of our businesses that have risk characteristics that exceed their reward potential or that no longer provide the return our shareholders expect."  The move may involve reducing total assets by about $2 billion from the current $22.4 billion, he said.  Piper Jaffray & Hopwood analyst Steven R. Schroll said, "My guess is they're trying to get rid of the more unpredictable banking businesses," such as volatile merchant bank operations, or the highly competitive mortgage banking and corporate-lending fields.  The company's comments also suggest that they will re-emphasize consumer and small-business loans, which Mr. Schroll said "makes a lot of sense."  While the company said it is "premature" to try to fix the potential restructuring charge at this point, it said it may be "in the range of" $25 million to $40 million during the third or fourth quarter.  The company's current work force of about 10,500 employees may be cut by about 15% to 20% as part of the changes under consideration.  First Bank said it expects domestic nonperforming loans and associated charge-offs to increase in the third quarter, "primarily as a result of recent events involving a few loans in the company's portfolio of highly leveraged transactions."  In banking jargon, "highly leveraged transactions" means LBO lending; a spokeswoman declined to identify the leveraged deals First Bank has backed that are in trouble.  Third-quarter domestic nonperforming assets will be about $330 million, compared with $294 million a year ago and $247 million at the end of the second quarter of 1989, the company said.  The company will boost its reserve for such potential losses by about $35 million, up from $20.5 million in the second quarter.  In the first six months of this year, the company had net income of $103.3 million, or $1.54 a share.  Analysts said the company appears to have largely put behind it the effects of an extremely expensive bond-market misreading, under which the company last year finally sold off its huge government-bond position for a $506 million loss.  President Bush, responding to spreading political liberalization in Eastern Europe, said Hungary will receive permanent most-favored-nation trade status and cited "encouraging signs" that eventually might help the Soviet Union win similar status.  Mr. Bush, speaking at a news conference here, said the trade liberalization for Hungary was in the works before the Hungarian government made its recent landmark decision to allow East Germans to emigrate to the West from Hungarian soil.  But he also indicated that Hungary's role in helping East Germans flee from Communist rule encouraged his administration to push the decision along.  Mr. Bush said Hungary is expected next month to get the new trade status, which ensures that its exports to the U.S. won't face any discriminatory tariffs.  By then, Hungary is expected to have passed a law solidifying free emigration policies.  The White House also said Hungary will be granted beneficiary status under the Generalized System of Preferences, which will give duty-free treatment to some Hungarian exports to the U.S. Mr. Bush indicated that those steps are designed partly to encourage political liberalization elsewhere in Eastern Europe, saying the moves underscore "our willingness to help those countries."  On other issues, Mr. Bush:  -- Said he feels "no rush" to hold a summit meeting with Soviet leader Mikhail Gorbachev.  He acknowledged that the Soviets may raise the subject when Foreign Minister Eduard Shevardnadze meets this week with Secretary of State James Baker, and said "we'll have to see what message Mr. Shevardnadze brings with him."  Privately, White House officials said the administration might be ready to show flexibility if the Soviets strongly appeal for a summit.  -- Indicated he doesn't oppose the eventual reunification of East and West Germany, which some analysts fear could disrupt European stability by creating too powerful a state in the heart of the continent.  "I don't think we should view that as bad for Western interests," Mr. Bush said.  -- Said there isn't any "hard intelligence" that Colombian drug traffickers have targeted him or members of his family for assassination, as some reports have suggested.  On trade with the Soviet bloc, Mr. Bush said the possibility of granting most-favored-nation status to the Soviet Union might be discussed in the Baker-Shevardnadze meetings, as part of a discussion of the "whole economic front."  He added: "There are encouraging signs coming out of the Soviet Union, and we're going to continue to look at them closely."  The Soviet government has allowed an increasing number of Soviet Jews to emigrate, which has been one of the principal U.S. prerequisites for normalizing trade relations with Moscow.  But Mr. Bush also argued that some barriers remain, saying that some Jews still are punished for seeking to leave the Soviet Union.  Hungary has been receiving most-favored-nation status on a temporary, year-to-year basis, as have some other East European nations.  The Commerce Department said Hungary will become the first East European nation to get permanent most-favored-nation status since 1974.  The Generalized System of Preferences gives duty-free tariff treatment to a wide range of exports.  About $110 million -- or about one-third of Hungary's total $321 million exports to the U.S. in 1988 -- would benefit from GSP status, a Commerce Department official said.  The official added that granting of GSP status generally leads to a 10% increase in exports.  Meanwhile, while meeting with Hungarian leaders in Budapest, European Community Commissioner Frans Andriessen promised to push for measures to expand trade between the East bloc country and Western developed countries.  His promises stopped short of the more far-reaching help sought by the country's economic reformers.  The Hungarians want quick changes in tariff levels and other trade restrictions maintained by most developed countries.  Mr. Andriessen, EC commissioner for external affairs, was acting as a representative not only of the community, but also the group of 24 industrialized countries that earlier this year put the EC in charge of coordinating Western aid to Hungary and Poland.  He was to meet Polish leaders today in Warsaw to conclude a trade and cooperation agreement with the EC.  Mr. Andriessen said at a news conference that he believed the EC would be willing to "go further" than a December trade agreement between the EC and Hungary.  He said he would urge EC leaders to act faster in removing quantitative restrictions against Hungarian exports and to import more Hungarian farm products.  ---  Mark M. Nelson in Budapest contributed to this article.  Viktor Goncharov breaks the bad news as gently as he can.  "If you put your name on the waiting list for housing it can take 10 or 12 years before you get a place," he says.  The shy, disabled woman he is talking to, a blond 17-year-old named Lyubov, slumps in her chair, tears welling up in her eyes.  She is desperate to find a small apartment to escape turmoil at home with her parents.  But it seems hopeless.  "There are so many questions I just can't answer," Mr. Goncharov sighs.  Walking over to comfort her, he gives her the phone number of a new support group for invalids.  "Perhaps they can do something," he says.  Mr. Goncharov is a foot soldier in the newly "democratic" Soviet Union -- the man this Ukrainian coal-mining town elected last spring to be its deputy in the national parliament, and solve its many local problems.  That election marked the first time the Soviet people freely chose its own legislature and was a milestone for Mikhail Gorbachev's reform movement.  Mr. Gorbachev had promised a freer press and economy and greater political representation when he took office in 1985.  Many ordinary people had taken heart.  They hoped for better housing, more food and fewer fights with the paper-pushing bureaucrats who run their lives.  But so far, as Lyubov can attest, little has changed.  To watch Mr. Goncharov at work today is to catch a glimpse of the unrelenting hardship of everyday life in the Soviet Union, one that "perestroika" has failed to ease.  The "new" Soviet Union is still hobbled by the indomitable problems of the old Soviet Union.  Instead of grappling with pressing issues of state, such as ethnic unrest, Mr. Goncharov, like most of his reform-minded colleagues, spends 90% of his time trying to sort out the mundane and often nightmarish problems of his 275,000 constituents: chronic housing shortages, bad sanitation, petty corruption.  Sometimes he can help.  Often he can do little.  Most of the time, he is so overburdened, he barely has time to read the piles of draft laws sent from Moscow.  Instead, aside from the few weeks a year he spends in the capital, he labors in Yenakiyevo over problems that should have been dealt with long ago by local officials.  "This shouldn't be the job of a people's deputy," says Mr. Goncharov's wife, Olga, who helps him in the office.  "But the system just doesn't work.  The authorities do nothing."  The result is a growing mood of frustration in the nation that poses a grave risk to perestroika.  Millions of people are disillusioned by the empty official talk of change.  Reflecting that mood, Yenakiyevo's 33,000 coal miners joined a nationwide strike this summer to push for more radical action.  The government caved in to all their demands, granting higher wages and greater economic independence for individual mines.  But, as Valery Yemelyanenko, a member of the strike committee, concedes, "The strike was easy.  Trying to change things is very difficult."  Mr. Goncharov, a boyish-looking 31-year-old whose father was a miner, confronts those difficulties every day.  He keeps a toy pistol in his office that he says was a present from a youngster who told him to use it "in my fight against the bureaucrats."  At his most irritated moments, especially when arguing on the telephone, he reaches over his desk and theatrically brandishes the gun.  For three days this month, in an unusual gesture of openness, he allowed a correspondent to attend his meetings, read his mail and follow him through the streets of Yenakiyevo, where a huge statue of Lenin dominates the town square and looks out toward the spewing chimneys of a steel plant.  The written requests for help come piling into his office every day and are stacked on a long table opposite his desk.  He usually passes them on to the relevant authorities, demanding a speedy reply.  His status as a people's deputy means they can't simply ignore him.  One afternoon he and his wife discuss the plight of the 13 families who live at 99 Lenin Ave.  Their water was turned off weeks ago without explanation, and they can't get it turned back on despite urgent pleas to the water authorities.  Mr. Goncharov skims through a noncommittal answer sent by the water department, which says the building will remain without water because there is trouble with a pipe.  He fumes.  "Tell them to provide exact details about what is wrong with the pipe," he shouts across the room to his wife.  "I want to know when they can fix it.  At the very least, they should take the trouble to go and inspect it."  Although a member of the Communist Party, Mr. Goncharov, who tends to keep most conversation on a serious footing, doesn't hide his disdain for the uncaring system built up over 72 years of communist rule.  He tries to help people with problems, but firmly believes they should do more to help themselves and each other, too.  "I want to build a new communist society," one based on social justice, he says.  The bookshelf in his office is filled with Lenin's works.  But at home, he keeps a bible by his bed and discloses that he has been baptized.  One of his two young sons is called Nazar, the Russian variant of a Jewish name that means devoted to God.  He is not always consistent.  Although professing to abhor privilege, he enjoys many perks as leader of the town's young communist league, the Komsomol.  He has a spacious apartment in a new building.  For breakfast, he eats cheese sandwiches and drinks coffee -- goods unavailable in the local stores.  Still, without his official position, his mission would be even harder.  The Komsomol provides him with an office, a car, a driver and a secretary.  It pays his phone bills and gives him easy access to a print shop and supplies of paper that would otherwise be hard to find.  It also is a useful source of funds for projects.  The college-educated Mr. Goncharov enjoys enormous popularity.  Walking down the street, people nod at him in recognition or stop to shake hands, often recounting their latest problem.  It is a sign of his standing that the town's miners immediately elected him a member of their strike committee.  "People come to him because he gets things done," says Valentin Tutunik, a retired worker.  Mr. Tutunik has stopped in at Mr. Goncharov's office in the red-brick town hall to get a few worries off his chest, one of about a dozen people who drop by every day.  He grumbles about a local factory director and tells Mr. Goncharov about a school that is in bad physical condition.  "It should be closed," he says.  Mr. Goncharov scribbles down details in a notebook.  The visitor then lowers his voice as he talks about his last worry.  Corruption is rife among the security guards at factories, Mr. Tutunik says.  Instead of protecting the premises, they often steal things themselves.  The job is so attractive that people pay bribes to be hired, he adds.  Mr. Goncharov stops writing and looks at him earnestly.  "We'll need a revolution before we can solve that problem," he says.  One afternoon, four men and two women troop into the office for a regular meeting of the town's Komsomol executive committee.  After listening to a long budget report, the discussion turns to a proposal to set up a special chapter of Komsomol for the town's schools.  Mr. Goncharov listens skeptically.  "Why do we need it?" he asks in his deep voice.  "What difference will it make in the schools?"  The official who proposed the plan sputters and starts to give a vague answer.  Mr. Goncharov interrupts.  "The only reason to change the structure is to improve the work," he says.  "I don't believe in change for its own sake."  After the session, he walks to a nearby house to attend the inaugural meeting of the Society for Public Opinion, one of several civic groups he helped establish.  The society will poll local residents on a range of issues and publish the results.  Mr. Goncharov hopes it will provide him with information he can use in parliament -- and ammunition he can fire at Yenakiyevo's town hall.  A fierce argument is under way as he walks into the room.  Some of the society's members want to publish their own newspaper as an alternative to the town's drab Yenakiyevo Worker.  "It's useless," shouts a woman in a red dress, referring to the Worker.  Mr. Goncharov explains that, unfortunately, only official communist organizations can publish a paper.  But he does have some good news: He hopes to persuade Komsomol to allocate some funds for the new society.  As the discussion bogs down in questions about voting procedures, some of the participants come to Mr. Goncharov's chair and confide into his ear.  "I'm very worried about the Komsomol branch at the factory," says one elderly woman in a black-and-white striped dress.  "So am I," Mr. Goncharov whispers back.  "Come and see me and we'll talk about it."  On the way home, at 9 p.m., he drops by a decrepit two-story building that is filled with bricks and scaffolding.  This is another pet project, a meeting place for the town's youngsters who now have nowhere to go in the evenings.  "In the past, any youth activity was linked to {communist} dogma," Mr. Goncharov says.  "We want to make this a place where young people can come and do their own thing."  But refurbishing the building poses big problems.  Apart from the difficulty of finding funds, there is a nationwide shortage of construction materials such as bricks and cement.  Vitaly Arkhipov, a burly foreman, says he doesn't know when the building will be finished.  Even when the materals do arrive, the workers often make mistakes, such as putting up walls in the wrong place.  Mr. Goncharov therefore regularly makes spotchecks.  On the way to work one morning, he stops at the building to tell Mr. Arkhipov: "Don't forget the drains today."  Back in his office, the line of people waiting to see him has dwindled, so Mr. Goncharov stops in to see the mayor, Yuri Khivrich.  As he enters, Mr. Khivrich is on the phone to a nearby farm.  "I need 240 tons of tomatoes," he shouts impatiently.  The visit is brief: Mr. Goncharov wants permission to change a sewer by the youth center.  Mr. Khivrich won't say yes or no.  He apparently has other things on his mind, perhaps his tomatoes.  The next stop is a union meeting at an auto parts plant.  The Soviet labor movement, which played almost no part in the miners' strike, is under fire for doing little for its members.  The meeting shows why.  After an hour-long speech by the plant's union chief that is filled with production figures and little else, a few officials stand up to complain about working conditions.  The factory director, who is sitting on the podium in front of a huge color picture of Lenin, gets up to answer.  "Comrades, I've heard a lot of criticism," he shouts.  "But I don't understand it.  We've already fulfilled all your demands."  The labor officials listen in silence, not daring to disagree.  Mr. Goncharov, who has been reading a newspaper to relieve his boredom, walks out.  Next morning, a burly miner with his right arm in plaster storms into the office.  "During the strike, we were promised higher pay.  But my wages this month are half the usual amount," he rages.  "You're my elected deputy -- do something."  Mr. Goncharov remains calm and jots down the details.  "What do the mine bosses say?" he asks.  They won't give an explanation, the miner answers.  "You can't expect Goncharov and Gorbachev to do everything for you," Mr. Goncharov replies, irritated.  "This is a matter for your work collective.  Demand an explanation."  After a day of dealing with Yenakiyevo's problems and hopes, Mr. Goncharov is reflective about his new duties.  Bigger affairs of state will have to wait.  "Perhaps in the future" there will be more time for work in Moscow, he says.  "But people here trust me.  If I were away, a lot of things wouldn't get done."  Horst W. Schroeder, Kellogg Co.'s president and heir-apparent to its chief executive officer, resigned unexpectedly, citing "personal reasons."  Kellogg had no further explanation for the 48-year-old executive's sudden departure, which comes as the world's largest cereal company fights to regain market share.  The company issued its three-sentence announcement yesterday at the same hour that rival General Mills Inc. reported nearly a three percentage-point increase in its share of the U.S. ready-to-eat cereal market -- a gain made largely at Kellogg's expense.  Mr. Schroeder, who was named president and chief operating officer only last December, couldn't be reached for comment.  A company spokesman said Mr. Schroeder hadn't come to work, indicating that his letter of resignation apparently was submitted to the chairman and chief executive, William E. LaMothe, over the weekend.  The spokesman said that Mr. LaMothe had neither sought nor anticipated the resignation.  But, the spokesman added, "in his 40 years he's seen other things like this and he's not alarmed."  Mr. LaMothe couldn't be reached.  Mr. Schroeder's appointment as president and chief operating officer -- positions that were vacant for two years -- had been interpreted as a prelude to Kellogg's chairmanship for Mr. Schroeder.  The current chairman is 62, and traditionally company officers retire at age 65.  Moreover, because Messrs.  LaMothe and Schroeder had appeared at a major news conference together just last month -- they announced proposed industry standards on the touchy issue of health claims for food -- analysts suggested that some recent event had altered Mr. LaMothe's view of the West German as his successor.  Several mentioned reports that Mr. Schroeder's direct, no-nonsense manner had upset subordinates, who may have made their feelings known to the chairman.  "He wasn't getting the right relationship with people below him, with those ultimately responsible for market share and for beating General Mills," said William Maguire of Merrill Lynch & Co. Another analyst, John McMillin of Prudential-Bache Securities, said that Mr. Schroeder "wouldn't have left unless he thought he was in jeopardy of losing the CEO's job."  Kellogg's board is to meet later this week, and some on Wall Street expect that Mr. LaMothe will use that occasion to elaborate on his chief lieutenant's departure -- and perhaps name a successor.  Among those prominently named for the presidency are two executive vice presidents: Gary E. Costley, who is in charge of the U.S. Food Products division, and Arnold G. Langbo, head of Kellogg International.  Until a successor is named, Mr. LaMothe will assume the responsibilities of the president's office, Kellogg said.  Part of Mr. Schroeder's tasks was to oversee marketing strategy for the $4.3 billion company, which, with a market share of nearly 39%, continues to dominate the domestic cold-cereal market.  But while Kellogg was at the forefront in promoting cereals as healthy foods, General Mills has done better at cashing in on that belief -- particularly in feeding the nation's oat-bran craze with its war horse Cheerios.  Yesterday, General Mills announced it had achieved a 27% market share during its first quarter ended Aug. 27, up from a 24.6% in fiscal 1989.  "Much of this gain reflects growth of the three Cheerios brand products," General Mills said.  Cheerios and the spinoff Honey Nut and Apple Cinnamon varieties, with a combined 10% market share, recently knocked off Kellogg's Frosted Flakes as the biggest selling brand in the country.  Kellogg has been scrambling to recover, and in addition to several oat-based cereals recently announced Heartwise, a cereal containing psyllium fiber.  But on that score as well, General Mills was out in front, with its Benefit flakes introduced last April.  Psyllium is said by the cereal makers to be instrumental in reducing levels of blood cholesterol.  While such health-oriented cereals as Common Sense oat bran have been doing well for Kellogg, stalwarts such as Corn Flakes, Rice Krispies and Frosted Flakes have been giving up share.  "The poor performance of the company recently in terms of market share . . . may have disrupted relations between Mr. LaMothe and Mr. Schroeder," said Nomi Ghez, food analyst at Goldman, Sachs & Co.  Although he came from a financial background, Mr. Schroeder made points at Kellogg by pushing the Mueslix brand cereal concept several years ago -- despite a chorus of doubters within the company.  An adaptation of an old-line European cereal, Mueslix is a mix of dense flakes mixed with dried fruits and nuts.  Mr. Schroeder joined Kellogg in 1970 after working as an accountant in Hamburg, West Germany.  He spent most of his 19 years with Kellogg on the international side.  Because of solid sales gains in that division, Mr. Schroeder was promoted to president of Kellogg North America in 1986.  He was elected a director of Kellogg this past April.  A West German by birth, Mr. Schroeder remains a citizen of that country.  Immigration and Naturalization Service records show that Mr. Schroeder has lived and worked in the U.S. under a so-called green card since 1985 and that he has not applied for American citizenship.  Cooker Restaurant Corp. said Philip J. Hickey Jr. has been replaced as president, following his unsuccessful bid to gain control of the company.  G. Arthur Seelbinder, chairman and chief executive officer, has assumed the additional post of president.  He said there were "differences over control of the company" and the long-term strategy.  Officials at the restaurant concern said Mr. Hickey's resignation follows his plan to lead an outside group's buy-out of Mr. Seelbinder's 16% stake in the company.  Mr. Seelbinder rejected the bid.  A spokesman for the company declined to comment on the price of the bid or to name those involved in the buy-out group.  Cooker has about 10.9 million shares outstanding.  Mr. Hickey owns a 5% stake in the company, according to the spokesman.  Mr. Hickey wasn't available for comment.  Terms of the buy-out proposal called for the resignations of Mr. Seelbinder and all other company directors, except Mr. Hickey.  The company said it has retained J.C. Bradford & Co. as its financial adviser, but officials didn't elaborate on plans for the restaurant concern.  Earlier this year, when Israeli Prime Minister Yitzhak Shamir unveiled his proposal for Palestinian elections in the occupied West Bank and Gaza Strip, some Israelis likened the event to an elephant sticking its trunk through the eye of a needle.  Mr. Shamir had taken the first step toward peace, but to get him all the way from his proposal to the negotiating table still would take a lot of pulling.  Now, Egypt's President Hosni Mubarak has grabbed the trunk and given it a powerful tug.  In an unusually bold move for the cautious Egyptian leader, Mr. Mubarak has stepped forward as a would-be go-between for the Palestinians and Israelis by offering a 10-point elaboration of Mr. Shamir's election proposal that attempts to make it acceptable to Palestinians without altering its basic thrust.  Mr. Mubarak's move signals the unease of moderate Arabs over the lack of progress toward peace since Yasser Arafat, the chairman of the Palestine Liberation Organization, renounced terrorism and recognized Israel last December.  Mr. Arafat's lack of political gain in return for his concessions has left him exposed to criticism from Palestinian radicals, with the risk that his position will be undermined or that he will, to save his job, revert to a hardline stance.  Signs that PLO moderates are losing control also are apparent in the occupied territories, where the violence of the 21-month uprising has turned inward.  In recent months, Palestinians have murdered alleged collaborators and, in apparent actions by Islamic fundamentalists, those Palestinians thought to be engaged in immoral activities.  Mr. Mubarak's 10 points aren't at odds with Mr. Shamir's plan as it was approved by the Israeli Knesset, or parliament, in March.  But since then the Labor Party and Mr. Shamir's Likud Party have come to interpret the plan quite differently.  While there is a gulf between the Egyptian position and that of Likud on several key issues, Mr. Mubarak's points are in line with the interpretation of the Labor Party, which holds 39 seats to Likud's 40 seats in the 120-member Knesset, and governs with Likud in a coalition.  The Israeli defense minister, Labor's Yitzhak Rabin, flew to Cairo yesterday for a meeting with Mr. Mubarak to discuss the 10 points.  After the session, Mr. Rabin said he strongly supported Egypt's role.  The 10 points are: an open campaign; immunity for those elected; withdrawal of Israeli troops from polling stations on election day; presence of foreign observers; a one-day ban on Israelis entering the territories; Israeli commitment to accept the election's results; setting a date for the beginning of negotiations on the final status of the occupied lands; participation of voters in Arab East Jerusalem, and a freeze on Jewish settlements.  The 10th point calls on Israel to "accept the four principles of the American policy in the Middle East {including} . . . trading land for peace."  The wording of the final point almost compels U.S. support and puts the Bush administration in a ticklish spot.  The Likud, especially its right wing, finds many of the points unacceptable, particularly any talk of land for peace.  The Bush administration has been unwilling to push the Israeli government.  With Labor leader Shimon Peres and Mr. Shamir more than ever at odds, the risk of the government crumbling is ever-present.  Yet for the U.S. to be less than wholehearted in its support for Mr. Mubarak, who is soon due in Washington, would be inconsistent with its own proclaimed Middle East policies.  Mr. Mubarak wants to host a Cairo meeting of Israelis and Palestinians to discuss election arrangements.  On the face of it, this is what Mr. Shamir has long wanted: direct negotiations with the Palestinians without pressure from an array of hostile parties such as the Soviet Union and China, who would have been present at any international peace conference.  The Egyptians have proposed that the Palestinian delegation be made up of residents of the occupied territories plus Palestinians deported from Israel.  This gets around the PLO's insistence that the fate of the territories concerns the 2.5 million Palestinians who don't now live there, as well as the 1.5 million who do.  Yet it spares Mr. Shamir from talking directly with PLO officials, which he has sworn never to do.  While Mr. Shamir is unlikely to give as much ground as the Egyptians want, he can't afford to dismiss the initiative out of hand because he would risk fracturing the fragile coalition government and probably sparking further U.S. disapprobation.  Mr. Shamir probably will search for some maneuvering room in the proposal and use the frenetic shuttle diplomacy it engenders to buy himself time.  Dear Milton:  There was little, if anything, new in your open letter to me calling for the legalization of drugs (The Wall Street Journal, Sept. 7).  As the excerpt from your 1972 article made clear, the legalization argument is an old and familiar one, which has recently been revived by a small number of journalists and academics who insist that the only solution to the drug problem is no solution at all.  What surprises me is that you would continue to advocate so unrealistic a proposal without pausing to consider seriously its consequences.  If the argument for drug legalization has one virtue it is its sheer simplicity.  Eliminate laws against drugs, and street crime will disappear.  Take the profit out of the black market through decriminalization and regulation, and poor neighborhoods will no longer be victimized by drug dealers.  Cut back on drug enforcement, and use the money to wage a public health campaign against drugs, as we do with tobacco and alcohol.  The basic premise of all these propositions is that using our nation's laws to fight drugs is too costly.  To be sure, our attempts to reduce drug use do carry with them enormous costs.  But the question that must be asked -- and which is totally ignored by the legalization advocates -- is, what are the costs of not enforcing laws against drugs?  In my judgment, and in the judgment of virtually every serious scholar in this field, the potential costs of legalizing drugs would be so large as to make it a public policy disaster.  Of course, no one, including you, can say with certainty what would happen in the U.S. if drugs were suddenly to become a readily purchased product.  We do know, however, that wherever drugs have been cheaper and more easily obtained, drug use -- and addiction -- has skyrocketed.  In opium and cocaine producing countries, addiction is rampant among the peasants involved in drug production.  Professor James Q. Wilson tells us that during the years in which heroin could be legally prescribed by doctors in Britain, the number of addicts increased forty-fold.  And after the repeal of Prohibition -- an analogy favored but misunderstood by legalization advocates -- consumption of alcohol soared by 350%.  Could we afford such dramatic increases in drug use?  I doubt it.  Already the toll of drug use on American society-measured in lost productivity, in rising health insurance costs, in hospitals flooded with drug overdose emergencies, in drug caused accidents, and in premature death -- is surely more than we would like to bear.  You seem to believe that by spending just a little more money on treatment and rehabilitation, the costs of increased addiction can be avoided.  That hope betrays a basic misunderstanding of the problems facing drug treatment.  Most addicts don't suddenly decide to get help.  They remain addicts either because treatment isn't available or because they don't seek it out.  The National Drug Control Strategy announced by President Bush on Sept. 5 goes a long way in making sure that more treatment slots are available.  But the simple fact remains that many drug users won't enter treatment until they are forced to -- often by the very criminal justice system you think is the source of the problem.  As for the connection between drugs and crime, your unswerving commitment to a legalization solution prevents you from appreciating the complexity of the drug market.  Contrary to your claim, most addicts do not turn to crime to support their habit.  Research shows that many of them were involved in criminal activity before they turned to drugs.  Many former addicts who have received treatment continue to commit crimes during their recovery.  And even if drugs were legal, what evidence do you have that the habitual drug user wouldn't continue to rob and steal to get money for clothes, food or shelter?  Drug addicts always want more drugs than they can afford, and no legalization scheme has yet come up with a way of satisfying that appetite.  The National Drug Control Strategy emphasizes the importance of reclaiming the streets and neighborhoods where drugs have wrought havoc because, I admit, the price of having drug laws is having criminals who will try to subvert them.  Your proposal might conceivably reduce the amount of gang- and dealer-related crime, but it is fanciful to suggest that it would make crime vanish.  Unless you are willing to distribute drugs freely and widely, there will always be a black market to undercut the regulated one.  And as for the potential addicts, for the school children and for the pregnant mothers, all of whom would find drugs more accessible and legally condoned, your proposal would offer nothing at all.  So I advocate a larger criminal justice system to take drug users off the streets and deter new users from becoming more deeply involved in so hazardous an activity.  You suggest that such policies would turn the country "into an armed camp."  Try telling that to the public housing tenants who enthusiastically support plans to enhance security in their buildings, or to the residents who applaud police when a local crack house is razed.  They recognize that drug use is a threat to the individual liberty and domestic tranquility guaranteed by the Constitution.  I remain an ardent defender of our nation's laws against illegal drug use and our attempts to enforce them because I believe drug use is wrong.  A true friend of freedom understands that government has a responsibility to craft and uphold laws that help educate citizens about right and wrong.  That, at any rate, was the Founders' view of our system of government.  Today this view is much ridiculed by liberal elites and entirely neglected by you.  So while I cannot doubt the sincerity of your opinion on drug legalization, I find it difficult to respect.  The moral cost of legalizing drugs is great, but it is a cost that apparently lies outside the narrow scope of libertarian policy prescriptions.  I do not have a simple solution to the drug problem.  I doubt that one exists.  But I am committed to fighting the problem on several fronts through imaginative policies and hard work over a long period of time.  As in the past, some of these efforts will work and some won't.  Your response, however, is to surrender and see what happens.  To my mind that is irresponsible and reckless public policy.  At a time when national intolerance for drug use is rapidly increasing, the legalization argument is a political anachronism.  Its recent resurgence is, I trust, only a temporary distraction from the genuine debate on national drug policy.  William J. Bennett  Director  Office of National Drug Control Policy  A powerful corn farmers group and an agricultural science organization are moving to call for stronger surveillance of the nation's food supply for cancer-causing aflatoxin.  The actions by the National Corn Growers Association and the Council for Agricultural Science and Technology signal a shift in the farm industry's position on aflatoxin, and it is significant that they come from groups representing the agriculture industry instead of consumer activists.  This development is expected to put pressure on Congress and Farm Belt states to adopt measures to keep the fungus-produced poison, which contaminated much of the Midwest corn crop last year, out of food for humans and livestock.  The moves also reflect a growing feeling in the scientific community that aflatoxin might cause more health problems in the U.S. than previously thought.  Aflatoxin, a potent carcinogen in laboratory animals, is excreted by a fungus that thrives in hot and dry climates.  Although it often plagues the corn and peanut industry in the Southeast, and has been linked to several deaths there, it didn't become a political issue until the 1988 drought sparked an outbreak in the two biggest corn-producing states, Iowa and Illinois, from which flow much of the crop consumed here and abroad.  Several nations complained of finding aflatoxin in U.S. corn and corn byproducts.  The amount of aflatoxin that seeped into the U.S. food chain isn't clear, but spot-checking by state and federal officials found unsafe levels in milled corn and milk, and smaller amounts in popcorn, cereal and chips.  Although the Food and Drug Administration prohibits the interstate transport of corn with more than a tiny amount of aflatoxin, federal and state regulators were ill-prepared for the outbreak.  The National Corn Growers Association is widely expected to adopt recommendations by its influential Iowa chapter that the U.S. Agriculture Department look for aflatoxin during its monthly surveys of crop conditions and that Midwest states routinely screen food and milk for residues of the poison.  Last year, Iowa authorities were hamstrung in part because they didn't gauge the severity of the outbreak until October, when the corn harvest was nearly complete and some of the crop had already been sold to processors.  The corn group's recommendations are modest.  It doesn't, for example, call for the mandatory inspection of corn before processing -- something that is required of the peanut industry.  Yet even these measures are a significant change in the farm industry.  Earlier, farm and government officials had reasoned that outbreaks of aflatoxin in the Midwest Corn Belt were too rare to justify tight regulation.  But the 1988 outbreak was the third in twelve years.  "We have to realize that there is a potential for a problem in the Midwest," said Ron Swanson, a Galt, Iowa, farmer who headed the task force.  The authors of the report also blame unreliable test results for the "cynical attitude" of some farmers and grain handlers about the seriousness of the poison.  Because aflatoxin is difficult to detect even under the best of laboratory conditions, some farmers whose corn had been rejected at one elevator were able to have it accepted at another.  Among other things, the report suggests the government could compensate farmers for their contaminated corn so they don't try to evade detection.  Many farm-state lawmakers wouldn't support tougher regulation without the direction of the National Corn Growers Association.  Because it represents farmers of the nation's biggest crop, the association plays a major role in shaping U.S. agricultural policy.  As a result, some farm lobbyists are speculating that an aflatoxin measure will be tacked onto 1990 farm legislation, which will probably dictate farm policy for the next five years.  Hearings are expected in the next several months on a bill in the House that would, among other things, require federal grain inspectors to screen export-bound corn for aflatoxin.  Meanwhile, a report slated for release next month by the Council for Agricultural Science and Technology, an umbrella organization of industry and academic groups, could ignite a debate over whether aflatoxin is a hidden cause of many illnesses in the U.S.  In addition to a request for more research money, the authors of the report, which is subject to approval by the council, proposes a survey of people in the U.S. for residues of aflatoxin.  Much of the scientific community has long reasoned that aflatoxin isn't a major health problem in the U.S. because the country's rate of liver cancer isn't high.  Aflatoxin is a potent liver carcinogen in laboratory rats and has been linked in surveys to human liver cancer in Asia and Africa.  But for more than a decade, doctors have detected aflatoxin in Southerners.  In 1979, aflatoxin was found in the blood of a 31-year-old black woman from rural Georgia who died of liver cancer.  In 1971, aflatoxin was found in the urine of children from an Albany, Ga., family, one of whom had been hospitalized for bone marrow and liver disease.  At about the same time, a group of researchers found aflatoxin-producing fungus in a south Georgia house frequented by four people who had developed leukemia.  The most puzzling case occurred in Jackson, Miss., where doctors at the University of Mississippi Medical Center detected aflatoxin in the blood or liver of seven children who died of Reye's syndrome from 1975 through 1978.  Although the incidence of this brain and liver disorder has fallen since it was linked to aspirin, researchers are still mystified by its presence.  "I'm frustrated that no one pays attention to it," said Dr. Betty B. Wray, vice chairwoman of the pediatrics department at the Medical College of Georgia, who has worked on aflatoxin-related cases.  Some scientists are dubious about the reports from the South.  Because of recent advances in the laboratory, however, a U.S. survey might indicate whether aflatoxin is a health hazard.  Japan and the U.S. plan to join in developing technology to improve cars that run on methanol, a fuel that causes less air pollution than gasoline, a Japanese government official said.  Under a four-year program starting April 1, the Industrial Science and Technology Agency will cooperate with the U.S. Environmental Protection Ageny in improving the performance of methanol cars already being tested, said Mitsuo Aikawa of the Japanese agency.  Mr. Aikawa said the problem is to make methanol-powered cars start in cold weather or thin air.  An unspecified number of researchers from Japanese companies will work with the EPA to develop a methanol car that will start in temperatures as low as minus 10 degrees Celsius (14 degrees Fahrenheit), Mr. Aikawa said.  He said such cars currently have trouble starting at temperatures below five degrees Celsius (41 degrees Fahrenheit).  Japan plans to spend about 800 million yen ($5.5 million) for the four-year program, according to a major Japanese economic newspaper.  President Bush has called on auto makers to help cut air pollution by producing 500,000 methanol-powered cars in 1995 and one million such cars each year from 1997 through 2004.  Methanol is made from coal or natural gas and emits less carbon monoxide than gasoline.  Gasoline also emits nitrous oxides that contribute to smog.  Delta Air Lines Inc. is talking with NWA Inc. and Trans World Airlines Inc. about forming a joint computer reservation system that could become a significant new competitor for domestic travel-agency bookings.  The move is Delta's second try at improving its standing in the computer reservation business.  Earlier this summer, the government effectively quashed on antitrust grounds a plan under which Delta would have merged its existing system with the Sabre reservation system of AMR Corp., No. 1 in the business.  AMR is the parent of American Airlines.  The control of computer reservation systems is considered a big advantage in the airline industry.  The systems, which travel agents use to book airline, car-rental, hotel and other reservations, can generate substantial fees.  Industry experts say the systems also tend to create more bookings for the airlines owning them.  The latest venture proposed by Delta would operate autonomously with its own management, according to Delta's brief announcement.  Beyond that, none of the companies would discuss what form the transaction would take.  Currently, TWA and NWA, parent of Northwest Airlines, jointly operate PARS, the industry's fourth-largest reservation system.  Delta's system, Datas II, is in fifth place.  "What we see is a combination of Datas II and PARS, resulting in a strong third company that's a more effective competitor for the two big systems, Covia and Sabre," said a Delta spokesman.  Covia, owned by UAL Inc. and several other carriers, is the second-largest system.  A combined PARS-Datas II system would place it neck-and-neck with third-place SystemOne, a unit of Texas Air Corp.  Delta was forced to give up its effort to combine its system with Sabre last June after the Justice Department said it would fight any merger of the systems.  A merger of Sabre with Delta's system would have given the two about 46% of the domestic travel-agency market.  The Department of Transportation, which can make recommendations on airline mergers, also raised objections in May to the proposed AMR-Delta transaction.  It said the two airlines should include other partners in the new company.  Although at least three smaller airlines said they were interested, the Justice Department still said it would sue.  Delta was to have paid $650 million to AMR for the right to buy half of Sabre.  An interest in PARS isn't as valuable.  NWA paid TWA $140 million for a 50% share in 1986.  Today, Delta would have to pay roughly $125 million for a one-third share of PARS, analysts estimate.  "Delta's bringing something to the table," said analyst Timothy Pettee of Merrill Lynch.  "It's not like they don't have anything to contribute.  It's Datas II system and not just cash."  In addition to providing travel agents with back-office assistance, computer reservations systems enable them to make reservations on any major carrier.  But the airlines operating the systems possess an edge, industry experts contend, because of so-called architectural biases in the software.  Although Delta's Datas II system is considered technologically competitive with other computer reservation systems, Delta's late start in designing and marketing the system put it at a disadvantage.  Delta, unable to increase its base of 3,500 travel agents by winning them from rival systems, finally turned to the merger route last January with the unsuccessful AMR proposal.  In early June, Rep. Dan Rostenkowski stole away from the Capitol in his chauffeured Lincoln for a secret meeting at the White House with his old buddy George Bush.  The two had been commiserating quietly for weeks about a common problem: how to achieve steep deficit-reduction goals without violating the president's no-tax-increase pledge.  And this time, they hit upon a solution that only a politician can fully appreciate.  They decided to try to reduce a tax in order to raise revenue.  "I'll try to put together a bill that won't attract a veto," Rep. Rostenkowski promised the president.  They then went on to talk about capital gains.  So began the bizarre saga that led last week to the House Ways and Means Committee's approval -- over Chairman Rostenkowski's opposition -- of a controversial cut in the capital-gains-tax rate.  It's a story of how the president flattered and feted the burly Illinois Democrat into taking his side.  Then, after Mr. Rostenkowski switched and opposed the tax cut -- he now calls it "a financial disaster for this country" -- Mr. Bush got his way anyway.  In between, the usually shrewd Chicago pol acted like a puppy dog to Mr. Bush, weakening when his pride and vanity were stroked by the president.  At one stage, the chairman even embraced as his own a capital-gains scheme that was shaped by the Treasury and White House budget director Richard Darman.  The consequences of Rep. Rostenkowski's miscalculations are enormous.  His loss of control will have a lasting effect on him and possibly on the new House speaker, Thomas Foley of Washington, who has put his prestige on the line to defeat the capital-gains cut.  The future of relations between the Democratic-controlled Congress and the Republican White House also is at stake.  Even after clearing the Ways and Means Committee, the proposed tax reduction faces a number of hurdles on the House floor.  And in the Senate, Finance Chairman Lloyd Bentsen opposes it.  Still, the odds now appear better than 50-50 that Congress will enact some kind of reduction -- a move that was all but unthinkable just a few months ago.  The Ways and Means vote is a major victory for President Bush, who has made the cut a priority.  And it is proof of the power wielded by Rep. Edgar Jenkins of Georgia, the conservative Democrat who put together the unshakable Ways and Means coalition in favor of Mr. Bush's idea.  Both men advocate the tax change as a boon to the economy and an important investment incentive.  Opponents, though, see it as a boon to the rich with no proven benefits to the economy.  They also say it's the first step toward unraveling the massive tax overhaul completed just three years ago.  "Cutting capital gains is a knife at the heart of tax reform," laments Democratic Sen. Bill Bradley of New Jersey, a father of the Tax Reform Act of 1986.  Adds Rep. Leon Panetta (D., Calif.), chairman of the House Budget Committee: "We're facing the danger of repeating the 1981 fiasco, when we lost control of both budget and tax policy."  Back at the start of the year, there was no greater opponent of cutting the capital-gains tax than Rep. Rostenkowski.  "It's a tax break for the wealthy that will significantly increase the deficit," he said then.  "I can't imagine any member of Congress willing to take such a step."  The chairman's negative reaction was fully in step with his fellow Democrats.  At the same time, though, he was also concerned about fast-approaching budget deadlines that raised the issue of how to increase revenues to help reduce the deficit.  And that concern brought him round again to the issue of capital gains.  The reason: Paradoxically, capital-gains cuts stimulate so many asset sales initially that in the short run federal revenues actually increase.  There was another issue involved as well, of a far more-personal nature.  The chairman never tires of bragging that he and Mr. Bush are old friends; they served together on Ways and Means when Mr. Bush was a congressman in the 1960s, and have kept in contact ever since.  Just before Mr. Bush delivered his inaugural address last January, he acknowledged Mr. Rostenkowski -- to the chairman's delight -- with a "Hi, Danny" audible to the entire nation.  During later talks with the chairman, Mr. Bush helped his cause by pushing all the right buttons.  At one meeting, the chairman invited the president to attend both a lunch and a dinner on the same day to honor the 200th anniversary of the Ways and Means Committee, a celebration of immense importance to Mr. Rostenkowski.  At first, the president resisted attending both affairs.  But Rep. Rostenkowski continued to insist.  "You're going to both of them]" the chairman recalls saying with a smile.  And, in a grand gesture, the president agreed.  But the chairman's fondness for George Bush got him into deep trouble.  Soon after he went public with his new-found interest in capital gains, he closeted himself in a room on the second floor of the Capitol to hear what the Democratic majority on his committee had to say.  It wasn't pretty.  From every corner of the cramped room, he was berated by his usual allies.  They complained that capital gains was a tax break for the rich that Democrats had no business in promoting.  They said it would distort the economy.  "Democrats should not be undoing tax reform," California Rep. Robert Matsui declared, his voice rising.  Some even suggested that the chairman was playing footsy with the president to his own party's detriment.  In the midst of the protests, a lone voice rose in favor of the capital-gains cut.  "I don't want anyone to be under the misapprehension that capital gains won't be offered," said Rep. Jenkins, the soft-spoken Georgian.  Faced with the depth of feeling at the meeting, Rep. Rostenkowski publicly backed away from the capital-gains tax cut.  But Mr. Rostenkowski had unleashed the possibility of such a cut, and it wouldn't just disappear.  Rep. Jenkins quietly began building a pro-cut coalition, carefully consulting administration officials as he crafted his plan.  The chairman didn't interfere, and although he denies it, some say he gave the Georgian his tacit support.  Some lawmakers who were fighting for some tax changes that would cost money were told by those close to the chairman to speak to Rep. Jenkins.  In July, the committee met its basic revenue requirements for deficit cutting, and Mr. Rostenkowski made a plea to stop there.  But a slew of popular, soon-to-expire tax breaks still needed funding, raising again the issue of how to increase revenues -- and adding steam to the capital-gains-cut effort.  As Rep. Jenkins gained backers, worried Democratic leaders counterattacked.  Speaker Foley and House Majority Leader Richard Gephardt of Missouri privately emphasized their opposition, and Mr. Foley persuaded a few wavering lawmakers, including Rep. Frank Guarini of New Jersey, to toe the party line.  But President Bush was busy too, begging support for the Jenkins plan.  Ultimately, Mr. Jenkins put together a bare committee majority made up of six Democrats and all 13 Republicans.  When Rep. Foley appealed to one of this number, Democratic Rep. J.J. Pickle, the crusty Texan told him the request was "like waiting outside the delivery room and having your mother say, 'Son, you ought not to have kissed that girl.'"  Rep. Rostenkowski argued that the tax cut was ill-timed, warning Mr. Bush that it would sour relations with Congress.  To the Jenkins Democrats, he predicted that a gains-tax cut would be part of a bigger tax bill next year that would also include a higher top tax rate for the wealthiest Americans.  Dealing now with a weak hand, Speaker Foley hastily suggested an alternative plan: indexing capital gains to inflation.  Rep. Rostenkowski was deputized to take the idea to the administration in hopes of working out a compromise.  His conversations with budget chief Darman and Treasury tax experts led to two possible compromise plans, both of them based on the notion of rewarding those who hold assets a long time by giving them a bonus tax break based on the sales price.  The idea won over the Jenkins forces but it alienated the rest of the Democrats, who regarded it as all but indistinguishable from a rate cut.  Ultimately, Mr. Rostenkowski had no choice but to stand aside while Mr. Jenkins prevailed.  Rep. Rostenkowski insists he has no regrets about how things turned out.  His goal, he says, hasn't ever been the elusive one of "tax purity" but of getting things done and writing new law.  "I still view myself as the compromiser," he says.  "Some shots make people happy, and some make people sad."  ---  David Wessel contributed to this article.  ---  @ Cutting the Capital-Gains Tax:  @ The Words of Chairman Rostenkowski  @ Feb. 10 -- After President Bush unveils his capital-gains tax proposal: "It's a tax break for the wealthy that will significantly increase the deficit.  I can't imagine any member of Congress willing to take such a step."  June 7 -- Opening the door to a tax package that includes a cut in capital-gains taxes: "If my Democrats or my Republicans can offer me a way to raise revenue without a capital-gains tax, I'll jump at it.  But so far I haven't seen a way."  June 28 -- After House Democrats resist: "I never anticipated there would be as much resistance to capital gains as there was."  July 26 -- As talks with administration resume: "We're all working toward the same goal.  What's keeping us apart is (cutting capital-gains tax) rates as opposed to indexing."  Sept. 14 -- After committee approves cut in capital-gains taxes over his opposition: "It is going to be a financial disaster for this country."  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Cummins Engine Co., shelf offering of up to $150 million principal amount of debt securities.  Marcor Resorts Inc., offering of 1,050,000 common shares via PaineWebber Inc.  Ratners Group PLC, offering of 1,500 shares of variable term preference shares, via First Boston Corp. and Goldman, Sachs & Co.  REN Corp.-USA, initial offering of 1,950,000 common shares, of which 1.6 million will be offered by the company and 350,000 by holders, via J.C. Bradford & Co. and Equitable Securities Corp.  MCA Inc.'s Universal Pictures said that for only the third time in a decade, one studio commanded the top three positions on the weekend's box office chart.  The studio, of course, was Universal, propelled by "Sea of Love," which grossed more than $10 million in its opening weekend on 1,246 screens.  "Uncle Buck," which had been No. 1 for four weeks, finished in second place; "Parenthood" was third.  None of these films is a blockbuster of "Batman" or "Indiana Jones" proportions, but they typify what Universal has been doing all year: releasing a slate of movies at strategically attractive times when competition is minimal, then doing solid if unspectacular business.  Some of the films, such as "Fletch Lives," "K-9," "The Dream Team" and "The 'burbs," flamed out quickly, but had opened strongly enough to avert disaster.  Others, such as "Field of Dreams," "Do the Right Thing," "Parenthood" and now "Uncle Buck," have had impressive "legs" -- they play week after week with relatively little audience erosion.  When all this is combined, Universal has kept its head above water in the annual battle for market share, after a several-year drought that ended with last Christmas's "Twins."  And for 1989, possible blockbusters like "Back to the Future II" and Steven Spielberg's "Always" are yet to come.  According to Universal, the only times in the past 10 years when one studio released the top three films were in 1987 when Paramount had "Critical Condition," Star Trek IV" and "The Golden Child," and 1983 when Warner Brothers had "National Lampoon's Vacation," "Cujo" and "Risky Business."  The Chicago Mercantile Exchange fined two stock-index-futures traders a total of $55,000 and suspended each trader for one month for allegedly making fraudulent trades last September.  The Merc said it fined Frank Karkazis $30,000 and suspended his trading privileges for one month for allegedly disclosing a customer order in Standard & Poor's 500 stock-index futures last Sept. 28 to fellow trader Joseph Knapek before the order was offered to all traders in the pit.  Mr. Knapek was fined $25,000 and suspended one month for allegedly having the order disclosed to him.  Neither trader could be reached for comment.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. lowered the senior debt rating on the computer maker's unsecured sinking-fund debentures to Ba-1 from Baa-3, citing its "stalled revenue growth and high infrastructure costs" and its continuing losses.  About $60 million of debt is affected.  Alan Gotlieb, former Canadian ambassador to the U.S., writing in the July 31, 1989 edition of the Globe & Mail newspaper, in Toronto:  It is an astounding paradox that the American people return a congressional slate almost totally unchanged from election to election, while clamoring for "renewal" and a break with the past when choosing a president.  Almost all presidential candidates -- Nixon, Carter, Reagan, even John Kennedy -- run against "Washington" or the "system," codewords for an establishment thought to be out of touch with the real America.  Each new campaign is proclaimed a crusade to liberate the land from the foolish policies of the predecessor president.  It is as if the U.S. is in perpetual revolution.  A federal judge ordered the Justice Department to investigate whether the government has leaked confidential information to the press about its case against indicted financier Michael Milken.  But U.S. District Judge Kimba Wood said she wouldn't hold a hearing on the leak allegations made by defense lawyers until after Mr. Milken's trial, so as not to heighten publicity in the racketeering and fraud case.  Mr. Milken's lawyers last week asked Judge Wood to order the government to halt a "constant stream" of press leaks they claimed threatened the right to a fair trial for the former head of Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.'s junk-bond division.  Judge Wood is presiding over the case.  "We're very pleased with the court's decision to direct an investigation into the alleged leaks," Milken attorney Martin Flumenbaum said.  The defense motion cited stories published in The Wall Street Journal, the New York Times, the Washington Post and the Los Angeles Times.  Although I am one of the two Johns Hopkins faculty members quoted by Charles J. Sykes ("Where Liberal Arts Starve Amid Federal Plenty," editorial page, Sept. 6), I have never spoken to him.  The quotation was lifted from a Jan. 25 article in the Chronicle of Higher Education.  I cannot imagine that the Journal would ever use an eight-month-old remark by an executive to characterize the current health of his corporation.  Outlooks can change rapidly in the academic world, too, and I and many of my colleagues are now optimistic about the fiscal and scholarly prospects of the Johns Hopkins School of Arts and Sciences.  The worst is past, and the world looks much brighter than it did a year ago.  The classics department, for example, far from being "beleaguered," has just added a new faculty member and is advertising a prestigious new chair to be filled this year.  It expects to fill another chair next year, and make one other appointment.  The university's commitment to the classics is unwavering.  Jerrold S. Cooper  Chairman, Near Eastern Studies  Acting Chairman, Classics  Johns Hopkins University  Baltimore  ---  As an alumnus of Johns Hopkins (B.A. '81), I read Mr. Sykes's article with great interest.  He is painfully correct in most matters -- with one exception.  Johns Hopkins's academics are unsurpassed.  Even though the school's reputation is that of a science haven, the liberal arts have the highest ranked departments (according to the Gourman Reports, the departments of history, English and art history are ranked in the top 10 in the country -- the basic sciences are a few notches lower).  But the university has done a poor job of promoting its own best qualities.  In fact, the undergraduate application literature takes on an apologetic tone for excelling in the humanities, simply because the incorrect reputation is that of a pre-med colony.  With accessible teachers such as John Barth, Richard Macksey, Hugh Kenner, Kenneth Lynn and Ron Walters, a school should brag about its strength in the liberal arts rather than laugh at the stereotype that prohibits a greater pool of liberal-arts applicants.  The school could be one of the great undergraduate schools, but with the little sense of community spirit offered, Johns Hopkins will remain a first-class university that many students avoid.  Rob Friedman  Short Hills, N.J.  ---  Try some shocking facts:  -- The U.S. has become increasingly less competitive and productive in a global economy.  One reason is our failure to do enough research, especially non-defense-related research.  -- Universities in the U.S. provide the best education available in the world, but they are underfunded for their mission.  They will be unable to support research and students as they have in the past, if federal policies continue to increasingly squeeze their budgets.  Mr. Sykes is concerned about the future of the liberal arts.  More power to him.  But if we listen to his imprecations about universities' efforts to foster graduate education and research, we will convince ourselves that demolition is creation and penury wealth.  Steven S. Manos  Executive Vice President  Tufts University  Medford, Mass.  ---  While Johns Hopkins began at the top, its various programs had their ups and downs with only one exception: classics.  The founding professor, Basil Gildersleeve, was a great scholar.  So were his successors.  Students in the department were devoted to a degree I have never seen in any other department anywhere.  Outstanding graduates and doctors came through it.  In recent years the department repeatedly nominated for promotion its brilliant, young, untenured professors, but the administration did not promote them.  They went away.  When the sky is polluted, stars are hard to see.  Clifford Truesdell  Emeritus Professor of Rational Mechanics  Johns Hopkins University  Baltimore  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Sears Roebuck & Co. -- $200 million of 9% notes priced at par and due Sept. 15, 1996, through underwriters led by Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. Further information wasn't immediately available.  Alco Health Distribution Corp. -- 175,000 units consisting of one 14 1/2% senior subordinated note due Sept. 15, 1999, and 1.43 shares of AHSC Holdings Corp. Class C common, priced through Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. and offered at $1,001.43 each, for a total of $175.2 million.  The notes are non-callable for five years.  A sinking fund to retire 50% of the issue is due to begin in 1998.  The notes are rated single-B-2 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and single-B-minus by Standard & Poor's Corp.  Pitney Bowes Credit Corp. -- $150 million of 8.55% notes, due Sept. 15, 2009, priced at 99.80 to yield 8.58%.  The non-callable issue is puttable back to the company in 10 years.  It was priced at a spread of 50 basis points above the Treasury's 10-year note.  Rated double-A-3 by Moody's and double-A by S&P, the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Goldman Sachs & Co.  @ MORTGAGES  Federal National Mortgage Association -- $325.3 million of Fannie Mae Remic mortgage securities offered in 12 classes by Kidder Peabody & Co.  The offering, Series 1989-69, is backed by Fannie Mae 10% mortgage-backed securities, which are backed by 30-year fixed-rate mortgages with a weighted average remaining term to maturity of 29.6 years.  Among classes for which details were available and prices were set, yields ranged from 9.07%, or 105 basis points above five-year Treasury securities, to 9.66%, or 165 basis points over three-year Treasurys.  Two classes will be priced at market levels to yield 180 basis points over 10-year Treasurys and 200 basis points over 20-year Treasurys.  Fannie Mae said it will purchase a significant portion of Class A, which is scheduled to total $17.3 million and have a coupon rate of 8.95%.  @ EUROBONDS  Credit Local de France (France) -- $250 million of 8 7/8% Eurobonds due Oct. 18, 1999, priced at 101.65 to yield 8.93% less fees, via Banque Paribas Capital Markets.  Fees 2.  Eurofima (agency) -- 300 million Swedish kronor of 11% Eurobonds due Oct. 16, 1992, priced at 101 3/8 to yield 11% less fees via PKbanken.  Fees 1 3/8.  Interfinance Credit National N.V. (French parent) -- 60 million New Zealand dollars of 13% Eurobonds due Oct. 20, 1992, priced at 102 to yield 12.79% less full fees, via Hambros Bank Ltd. Fees 1 1/2.  Kaufhof Finance (West German parent) -- 129 million Swiss francs of bonds due Oct. 16, 1996, with equity-purchase warrants.  Fixed 6% coupon issued at 146% via Union Bank of Switzerland.  Guarantee by Kaufhof Holding AG.  Each 5,000 Swiss franc bond comes with 14 "A" warrants and 15 "B" warrants.  Each warrant entitles the holder to buy one Kaufhof Holding share for 430 marks.  "A" warrants are exercisable from Nov. 16, 1989, to Sept. 16, 1992, and "B" warrants are exercisable from Nov. 16, 1989, to Sept. 16, 1996.  Landmark Graphics Corp. said it will report earnings of about 20 cents a share for its first quarter ending Sept. 30, failing to meet analysts' expectations of 24 cents a share.  In the year-earlier quarter, Landmark had earnings of 21 cents a share.  Gene Ennis, the computer maker's president and chief executive, blamed the disappointing earnings on uncertainty among potential buyers of computer-aided exploration workstations, used by oil companies.  "There is a great deal of real and projected new product activity" among vendors of these workstations, Mr. Ennis said, creating the fear among customers that the equipment they buy may soon be obsolete.  To answer such concerns, Landmark also announced a "perpetual trade-up plan."  According to Mr. Ennis, buyers of Landmark workstations now can trade their new hardware for more-advanced Landmark equipment introduced within a year of delivery of the original equipment.  Landmark has more than 360 workstations installed world-wide.  It posted net income of $5.1 million on sales of $41.4 million for the year ended June 30.  Mesa Limited Partnership, straining under the double burden of low gas prices and hefty debt payments incurred in last year's acquisition of Tenneco Inc. properties, declared lower third-quarter distributions and hinted at additional lower payouts.  The oil and gas producer declared distributions of 37 1/2 cents for each common unit and for each preference A unit, payable Nov. 17 to holders of record Oct. 6.  The distribution in the second quarter had been 50 cents per unit.  A Mesa spokesman said the partnership expects to make fourth-quarter distributions at the same rate, but cautioned that "further developments in industry conditions" could dictate a change.  One of those developments is a Sept. 15 federal court ruling that could result in industrywide refunds of as much as $100 million to natural gas consumers.  Mesa has nearly $400 million in debt from its Tenneco acquisition and finished the second quarter with a net loss of $13.4 million.  In the wake of the Jim Wright and Tony Coelho ethics scandals, bills have been introduced to limit PACs, ban honorariums and restrict lobbying by former Members and congressional staffers.  Status: All are stalled.  But one ethics-related bill is doing very well, this one to place curbs on the outside lobbyists who often compete with Members of Congress to get action from the executive branch.  Its status: Passed in both chambers, with approval last week in the House by a vote of 410 to 3.  Any businessman can see what's going on here: Congress is sticking it to its competition.  The anti-lobbyist bill requires anyone who is seeking a federal contract or grant to disclose the identity of the lobbyist who helped him get it.  West Virginia's Senator Robert Byrd devised the bill after a private lobbyist beat him to the pork barrel for one of his constituents.  Recall that Senator Byrd stepped down as Majority Leader last year to chair the Appropriations Committee, saying then that he'd now be in a better position to funnel money to West Virginia.  Officials at West Virginia University discovered last month how seriously Senator Byrd took his renewed commitment to the pork barrel; he withdrew his support for a federally funded research center on their campus.  The university had sinned against Beltway orthodoxy by hiring a lobbying firm to secure funds for the project.  Mr. Byrd resented this.  "Why," he asked the school's officials, "do you waste your money on a lobbyist when I'm being paid to be your Senator?"  He thereupon introduced his anti-lobbying bill, and his colleagues whooped it through both chambers.  Meanwhile, the Beltway bellows on for yet another month about "influence peddling" at HUD. Ethics aside, one of the most interesting revelations from the HUD scandal is that so many developers felt they had to bypass a largely Democratic Congress and hire professional lobbyists to win contracts from a Republican administration.  In fact, over the past decade the number of lobbyists has gone up by some 50%.  Divided government is fostering competition -- and Congress doesn't like it.  Of course, the Members resent the notion that there's anything analogous between what they call "constituent service" -- the pressure they exert on behalf of special interests or campaign contributors -- and what they call "influence peddling" -- defined as former Republican administration officials lobbying on behalf of paying clients.  This theological distinction was raised directly at one of the recent congressional hearings into the HUD scandal.  Former HUD Regional Administrator Joseph Monticciolo had estimated that at least half of Section 8 HUD contract decisions were politically motivated and went on to say that Members of Congress as well as former Reagan administration officials had improperly lobbied HUD.  Rep. Tom Lantos asked: "Would you like to rephrase your last few sentences, because they didn't strike a very reasonable chord?"  Mr. Monticciolo quickly backed down from his heresy.  We have no real problem with Senator Byrd's attempt to force lobbyists into full disclosure, but why not mandate the same treatment for Congress?  Executive-branch agencies already keep thorough records of their contacts with lobbyists, but not with Members of Congress.  A good way to tell which congressional calls to an executive agency are legitimate business and which are Jim Wright-style arm-twisting would be to have the agencies publicly report all contacts with Members and their staff on specific contracts or cases.  This idea was actually floated on Capitol Hill, and Congress recoiled more or less the way Bela Lugosi did at the sight of a cross.  In fact, Congress has just made such reports illegal: The current Interior Department appropriations bill carries with it a measure that flatly prohibits its employees from logging any contacts with the legislative branch.  What's Congress afraid of?  Perhaps if reporters or even average citizens had access to a record of such congressional interventions it'd become obvious what much of modern Washington is all about.  Voters might see that a Congressman's job today has less to do with forming public policy and more to do with helping special interests get their piece of the $1 trillion federal pie Congress bakes every year.  In turn, grateful PACs underwrite their incumbencies.  It will be hard to take Washington's handling of the ethics issue seriously until it subjects itself to the same commandments it keeps handing down for everyone else to obey.  The Byrd lobbying amendment should include Congress.  Ferranti International Signal PLC confirmed it may have been defrauded on some big weapons contracts, as British government concerns mounted about the defense contractor's future.  In a statement to its 24,000 employees yesterday, Britain's third-biggest defense-electronics concern said, "It appears certain that the company and its advisers have been at least misled, and possibly made victims of serious fraud" in a subsidiary's contracts.  The contracts, including a Pakistani arms sale whose value may have been overstated in Ferranti's books, have been the subject of an intensive company audit since last week.  The statement was Ferranti's first mention of possible fraud in the contracts and underscores the company's deepening problems.  Last week, when it indefinitely halted trading in its shares here, it cited only "significant irregularities" in the contracts.  The Ferranti audit focuses on contracts booked by International Signal & Control Group PLC, headquartered in Lancaster, Pa., an arms merchant with which Ferranti merged last year.  Transactions involving International Signal's former chief executive officer, James Guerin, are being investigated by U.S. government agencies for compliance with U.S. export-license requirements and other laws.  Ferranti continued its weeklong reluctance to discuss any details of its problems, but one company official confirmed reports that auditors are examining whether certain contracts booked by International Signal ever, in fact, existed.  Official concern over Ferranti's problems is growing in Britain, amid market speculation that large contract losses may force a government-orchestrated rescue of the concern.  Yesterday, the British Trade Department and Scotland Yard's Serious Fraud Office confirmed they have had contact with Ferranti over the contracts but are postponing any action until after the company reports its audit results.  British Defense Secretary Tom King said he's "very concerned" about Ferranti's problems and hopes for a speedy resolution.  Ferranti's problems put the British government in a pickle.  Just last month, it blessed a restructuring of its defense-electronics sector by clearing the planned purchase of Plessey Co. by Britain's General Electric Co. and West Germany's Siemens AG.  The Defense Ministry was counting on Ferranti to be the main competitor of that new powerhouse, thereby ensuring competitive tendering on its electronics contracts.  But Ferranti's sudden problems could shred the government's plan and cause it political embarrassment.  Analysts estimate Ferranti's possible loss on the questioned International Signal contracts at #150 million ($235.6 million) to #200 million -- about three to four times its #55.8 million pretax profit for the year ended March 31.  Write-offs of that magnitude, said analyst Simon Gleeson of London stockbrokers Williams De Broe Hill Chaplin & Co., could force Ferranti to seek a rescue by another defense contractor.  In an interview with the British Broadcasting Corp. yesterday, Sir Derek AlunJones, Ferranti's chairman, acknowledged that the scandal is expected to create "a hole in {the company's} assets . . . which we will ultimately have to replace."  He said the options under review include selling assets and entering into a partnership with another firm.  He said "the information we relied on" to merge the firms "has proved to be incorrect."  In Philadelphia, Joseph Tate, Mr. Guerin's lawyer, confirmed that a federal grand jury there is conducting a separate investigation of his client's business transactions.  That investigation began long before the Ferranti scandal became public.  ---  Andy Pasztor in Washington contributed to this article.  Weary of the Third World foibles and capital needs of big U.S. banks?  The investors' antidote may have arrived: Japanese bank stocks.  This week, for the first time, investors will be able to trade American depositary receipts in one of Tokyo's leviathan banks, Mitsubishi Bank Ltd. Other Japanese banks, many of which have been listing their shares on European stock exchanges in the past year, are expected to follow suit in the U.S. soon.  An ADR represents a security that remains in a foreign country.  Mitsubishi Bank's New York Stock Exchange listing is the first by a Japanese company since 1983.  The fourth-largest and one of the most conservative of Japan's banks, Mitsubishi is so financially sound it puts most U.S. banks to shame.  In the Form 20-F the bank had to file with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Mitsubishi Bank became the first Japanese bank to explain its accounts in U.S. terms, but analysts said the filing contained no real surprises.  With total assets of 46.61 trillion yen ($318 billion), Mitsubishi Bank is two-thirds bigger than America's biggest bank, Citicorp.  Moreover, like most Japanese banks, it owns a huge portfolio of Japanese stocks, mainly in the circle of so-called Mistsubishi group companies it lends to; its unrealized securities gains amount to 4.05 trillion yen.  Even without that sum, Mitsubishi's capital-to-assets ratio -- a rough measure of how much cash a bank keeps on hand for every loan it makes -- stands at more than 10%.  That means the bank already clears the 8% hurdle that the world's central bankers have agreed to impose globally starting in 1992.  As a result, analysts say, Mitsubishi isn't likely to be making big capital demands on its stockholders, as some U.S. banks will.  Nor are any ugly clouds looming on the horizon.  Mitsubishi's exposure to the debt-burdened developing world amounts to 0.84% of total assets.  That figure is hardly comparable to the profit-staggering levels many U.S. banks endure.  Besides, the establishment of new loan-loss reserves in Japan is tightly controlled by the powerful Ministry of Finance, which has kept such reserves to 15% of banks' exposure and isn't likely to significantly raise them.  With such strengths, Mitsubishi Bank figured it was time to tap foreign investors, who now own just 1.5% of the bank's 2.55 billion shares.  "We're in an era where Japanese can drive Cadillacs, wear Celine ties and Austin Reed suits," says Hisaya Nara, the bank's deputy president.  "Investors should have choices, too."  Mr. Nara notes that even though Mitsubishi has had an office in the U.S. almost constantly since 1920, and since 1984 has owned Bank of California, it recently has granted its New York-based North American subsidiary wide new autonomy to make loans and raise funds.  By listing its ADRs in New York, he says, the bank hopes it can raise its profile among U.S. corporate borrowers and institutional lenders.  Besides, he adds: "We think we should make an attractive investment."  Analysts generally agree.  In a report comparing the bank's 20-F filing with its annual report, Salomon Brothers' banking analysts praise Mistsubishi's financial conservatism and predict its stock will outperform the broad-based Tokyo Stock Exchange index over the next six to 12 months.  That wouldn't be much of an aberration, though; unlike bank stocks in the U.S. and Britain, the Japanese financial sector has routinely outpaced the market as a whole during the past two years.  Japan's closely regulated banking environment and booming economy have helped.  Most interest rate margins in Japan remain fixed and, while floating-rate loans now make up more than 50% of loans made in Tokyo, banks have a vast, cheap deposit rate thanks to a rigid savings ethic and a national savings-deposit rate of only 0.38%.  "Investors have finally come around to the realization that the cheap source of deposits and rapid growth is showing up in profits," says J. Brian Waterhouse, a banking analyst at James Capel.  In the year ended March 31, 1989, Mitsubishi's net income shot up 50.6% to 60.5 billion yen.  The bank can probably maintain its earnings stream, despite the likelihood of extensive deregulation in the coming decade.  "It's pretty much guaranteed," says Robert Zielinski, a banking analyst at Jardine Fleming Securities.  "They can just sell some of their securities holdings."  He notes that the constant growth of profits at Mitsubishi Bank has helped the bank's share price to grow 1,631 times since 1953.  Still, Mr. Zielinski cautions that Mitsubishi's high price -- it stands at more than 40 times prospective per-share earnings -- doesn't offer the spectacular gains other financial stocks might.  "With some cheap U.S. banking stocks, you could get a great recovery story," Mr. Zielinski says.  Or he suggests cross-border investors buy stock in Tokio Marine & Fire Insurance Co., a company that's closely aligned with Mitsubishi Bank but carries a price-earnings ratio of closer to 30.  "Mitsubishi Bank may be hard to justify if you're a value-oriented investor," Mr. Zielinski says.  But, he adds: "You can be sure it will gain as long as earnings keep going up."  Disappointing earnings news from Stratus Computer and Landmark Graphics sent those technology issues tumbling and contributed to the Nasdaq over-the-counter market's fifth decline in six sessions.  The Nasdaq Composite Index eased 0.68 to 466.89 in what traders said was light trading.  Decliners beat advancers, 1,047 to 872.  But some traders remained upbeat.  Richard Bruno, head of OTC trading at PaineWebber, was encouraged that volume totaled only 105 million shares.  He said it proves that investor sentiment isn't overwhelmingly negative.  "There are more buyers on the upside than there are sellers on the downside," he asserted.  The OTC's biggest stocks were mixed, with the Nasdaq 100 Index declining 0.42 to 443.50 and the Nasdaq Financial Index rising 0.57 to 464.11.  Shares of Stratus Computer plummeted 22%, or 7 1/2, to 26, after the maker of fault-tolerant computer systems said revenue and earnings for the third quarter would be below expectations because of weakness in the domestic market.  Fault-tolerant computer systems keep running even if some parts fail.  Stratus's turnover of 3.2 million shares made it Nasdaq's most-active stock; the stock's trading volume was 14 times its normal daily average.  The Marlboro, Mass., company said it expects third-quarter net income of 35 cents a share to 38 cents a share on revenue of about $82 million.  That would compare with earnings of 37 cents a share on revenue of $68.9 million in the year-earlier period.  The company's president said he doesn't foresee "enough business developing during the last two weeks of the quarter" to allow the company to achieve its original revenue target of $88 million.  Stratus has been a Wall Street favorite recently.  In a page-one article in this newspaper, securities analysts predicted that Stratus will be a Fortune 500 company someday.  Just last Sunday, Stratus was the subject of a complimentary article in the New York Times.  The article quoted several analysts who recommended buying the stock, praising it as grossly underpriced and worthy of serious attention from investors.  But most of the attention yesterday was from investors who wanted to dump their shares.  "It's another case of disappointing earnings," said Gary Rosenbach, manager of equity trading at Needham & Co. "People are so nervous that when they see {indications of} bad earnings they don't think it's a one-time occurrence.  They just want it off the books."  James Tarantino, head of OTC trading at Hambrecht & Quist in San Francisco, said he and other traders and investors were "caught off guard" by Stratus's announcement.  Also, he speculated that with less than two weeks left in the third quarter, mutual-fund managers who held the stock in their portfolios "were eager to blow it out, and others were reluctant to buy it."  Landmark Graphics plunged 3 3/8, or 16%, to 18 1/4 on 1.6 million shares, 12 times its daily average.  The maker of computer systems for oil and natural gas exploration said it expects revenue for its fiscal first quarter, ending Sept. 30, to be slightly lower than analysts' expectations.  The company said it anticipates earnings of 19 cents to 21 cents a share, rather than the 24 cents predicted earlier.  Landmark said its order backlog at the end of September will be down, adding uncertainty to the results for the fiscal second quarter.  For the year-earlier first quarter, Landmark reported net income of $1.2 million, or 21 cents a share, after an extraordinary credit of $314,000, on revenue of $9.2 million.  Campeau's shares didn't trade for a third consecutive session.  The retailing conglomerate has continued the trading suspension pending more news.  Thus far, most of the news about the debt-laden company hasn't been encouraging for investors.  Olympia & York Developments, which agreed to loan Campeau $250 million to meet pressing debt obligations and cash needs, will have greater influence over Campeau's management under terms of the loan pact, according to executives close to the two companies.  Campeau's financial problems also have prompted more factoring companies to tell manufacturers to stop shipping merchandise to Campeau's Federated Stores and Allied Stores units.  Factoring companies buy retail receivables from apparel makers and, in many cases, act as their credit managers.  In a related development, some off-price retailers said they have been approached by apparel makers trying to unload merchandise originally intended for sale to Federated and Allied.  MicroBilt tumbled 2 3/4 to 14 3/4 on 143,000 shares.  H&R Block and MicroBilt agreed in principle to revise the terms of the proposed acquisition of the communications systems developer by Block.  The revised terms make a portion of the payment contingent on MicroBilt's future performance, reflecting its previously announced financial results for the six months ended July 31, which were lower than expected.  The original terms of the proposed transaction called for the issuance of $18 of Block common stock for each MicroBilt common share.  First Interstate of Wisconsin jumped 5 1/2, or 31%, to 23 on 168,300 shares.  Norwest and First Interstate said they signed a definitive agreement calling for the exchange of First Interstate shares for shares of Norwest.  Lawrence Walsh & Co., Washington's permanent-looking Independent Counsel, is still racking up taxpayers' dollars, but the final tally is in on another of these prosecutorial pyramids.  For three years, taxpayers paid to have Independent Counsel Alexia Morrison harass former Reagan Justice Department official Theodore Olson.  Final tab: Morrison $1,494,120-Olson $861,589, for a total outlay of $2,355,709.  But we note some discrepancies.  Mr. Olson's reimbursement is just two-thirds of what his lawyers spent and about half what Ms. Morrison spent.  Ms. Morrison, however, got paid in full.  The story of how the defendant gets shorted and the prosecutor rewarded is instructive.  The special panel of judges that oversees Independent Counsel cases decides how much a defendant such as Mr. Olson will be allowed to pay his lawyers.  Before reaching Mr. Olson's bottom line, the panel offered a neat synopsis of the case, which was another criminalization of policy differences by Congress: "Theodore B. Olson, as Assistant Attorney General, Office of Legal Counsel, was caught up in a separation of powers contest between the Congress and the Executive Branch and subjected, by an Independent Counsel . . . to a protracted investigation into the truthfulness of his congressional testimony."  Readers of these columns will recall how Rep. John Dingell agitated a Democratic House "report" in 1985, which charged Mr. Olson with a crime for his testimony defending President Reagan's executive privilege in a 1983 battle over the Environmental Protection Agency.  Mr. Olson, now a Washington constitutional lawyer, lived for years under the shadow cast by Ms. Morrison until in August 1988 she announced he'd done no wrong.  Now, after all this, the compensation judges have refused Mr. Olson's lawyers at the firm of Jenner & Block their full fees and expenses.  The lawyers had sent Mr. Olson a bill for $1,259,072 -- well below what Ms. Morrison and her staff spent.  Under the Ethics in Government Act, an unindicted target such as Mr. Olson is supposed to get all reasonable bills paid, on the assumption that a private citizen's financial resources are limited.  But the judges decided to knock out several categories of charges, including late-payment fees of $200,000, which sounds like a reasonable amount for interest.  The inherent unfairness of the process is especially apparent to us after seeing a copy of the $1.4 million in detailed billings Ms. Morrison submitted, not to the judges, but to the Justice Department, which promptly paid -- no questions asked.  The judges decided not to reimburse Mr. Olson for "librarians, clerical personnel and other support staff," but the records show that Justice paid Ms. Morrison in the tens of thousands of dollars for entries including "administrative services" and "other contractual services not classified."  While the judges forbade reimbursement for the Olson lawyers' "secretarial overtime" or "overtime dinner expense," Justice's bureaucrats reimbursed Ms. Morrison for "overtime pay," "overtime utilities" and "subsistence and per diem allowance."  Despite the supposed temporary nature of Independent Counsel work, Ms. Morrison was even paid for "contributions to Federal Employees' Life and Health Insurance Funds."  The lesson here is clear: Lawyers may well refuse to defend any executive-branch official under Independent Counsel investigation, since they're on notice that they'll lose 20% of their fees off the top, yet face a prosecutor with a virtually blank checkbook.  Stratus Computer Inc. said third-quarter revenue and earnings would be below expectations because of weakness in the domestic market and in its sales to other computer companies that resell the Stratus systems.  The supplier of fault-tolerant computer systems for on-line transaction processing said it expects third-quarter net income of 35 cents to 38 cents a share on revenue of about $82 million, compared with earnings of 37 cents a share on revenue of $68.9 million a year earlier.  "We do not see enough business developing during these last two weeks of the quarter to allow us to achieve our original revenue target," said William Foster, president and chief executive officer of the company, which is based in Marlboro, Mass.  Stratus had previously projected revenue of $88 million for the quarter.  "We are going to manage the company at the 20% to 25% growth level for the near term, unless we see signs of improvement in these market channels," Mr. Foster said.  Pension funds are racing to invest billions more of their dollars in real estate -- even though their returns on properties so far have barely outpaced risk-free Treasury bills.  By 1991, real estate investments by pension and endowment funds will swell to $122 billion from about $72 billion today, predicts Greenwich Associates, a Connecticut pension consultant.  As much as $100 billion in new pension money could land on the real estate market in the next five years, others say.  Yet the average return on real estate was a less-than-dazzling 9.27% annually for the six years through 1988, according to the Frank Russell Co. Property Index.  After subtracting 1.2 percentage points, the typical management fee charged by real estate investment advisers, properties' 8.07% return was little better than the 7.63% average for Treasury bills, says David G. Shulman, director of real estate research at Salomon Brothers Inc.  "You have a tremendous capacity in real estate for self-delusion," Mr. Shulman says, "because you don't have a tickertape" to use in judging property values.  His prediction: "The next couple of years are going to be difficult" for some real estate investors.  Pension funds expanded their real estate investing in the mid-1980s, after office buildings, shopping malls and other properties had posted strong gains from 1978 to 1982.  But many pension funds arrived just in time for the collapse of real estate prices in the oil-patch states and general overbuilding spurred on by eager lenders, including many now-troubled savings and loan associations.  The very presence of so many deep-pocket funds also helped drive up property prices, reducing returns.  "All these {pension fund} supertankers with asset-allocation targets set a few years ago are pouring money into an environment that we think is fundamentally unattractive," says Scott Sperling, head of real estate investing for the Harvard University endowment, which has been trimming its real estate portfolio.  The average pension fund has about 4% of its assets invested in real estate.  Many are shooting to boost that figure to between 10% and 15%, says John S. Lillard, president of JMB Institutional Realty Corp., a Chicago money manager.  Even in bad times, real estate holds many attractions for pension funds.  First, there is so much of it, with the total value of U.S. commercial real estate amounting to almost as much as U.S. common stocks and more than domestic and foreign corporate bonds.  Properties can provide a valuable outlet for funds' excess cash.  American Telephone & Telegraph Co., for example, sharply increased its property buying in 1980 when "$200 million a month was coming in to invest.  We had no place to put the money," according to Ronald R. Roessler, AT&T's head of real estate investing.  Real estate proved the answer, and AT&T has boosted its real estate holdings from 2.3% of its pension fund in 1980 to 13%, or nearly $4 billion, today.  Returns have long since dimmed -- far outstripped by gains in stock and bond prices.  But pension managers say that's no reason to abandon real estate.  "If you're seeking quality assets and a well-diversified {real estate} portfolio, you have to be willing to take the soft markets," says Roger Franz, manager of real estate investments for the $56 billion California Public Employees Retirement System.  "If you don't get in, you don't get to play the ball game."  Calpers, the nation's largest public employee pension system, has been stepping up to the plate in a big way.  The fund has $4.2 billion invested in real estate, after plunking down more than $1 billion so far this year.  Even so, Calpers is still short of its goal of having 10% of its assets, or $5.6 billion at current levels, invested in real estate.  "By the turn of the century," JMB's Mr. Lillard told a recent meeting of real estate investors, 20% of pension fund assets going toward real estate "will be the conventional wisdom."  George Russell of the Tacoma, Wash., consulting firm Frank Russell Co., calls the typical pension fund "seriously underweighted" in real estate.  Sellers of real estate are doing their best to attract money from the funds.  "Pension funds are where the action is," says Paul Saylor, president of Atlanta-based Institutional Property Consultants.  "They are the group of investors one thinks of first -- and that's going to be more and more the case in the future."  Inevitably, some funds have begun battling each other for properties.  Japanese and other foreign buyers have attracted the spotlight for their purchases of high-profile U.S. properties.  Yet "the highest price is not necessarily being paid by the Japanese anymore," says Philip J. Ward, senior vice president for insurer Cigna Corp.  Faced with a dearth of bargains, many pension funds are keeping their real estate allocation targets unchanged but giving themselves more time to reach them.  "Demand is off for our {real estate} products in the last six to nine months," says Mr. Ward.  Mr. Saylor, the Atlanta consultant, says, "Our clients have $19.5 billion allocated to real estate, but they have spent only $8.5 billion.  And the gap grows even as we speak."  For crash-wary pension managers, real estate is enticing because "it will never decline 22% in value one day," says Salomon's Mr. Shulman.  "And if it did, you would never know it anyway."  What pension funds are seeking, says Roger E. Hilkert of consultants Eager & Associates in Louisville, Ky., "is the ability to diversify into an asset that acts differently than stocks and bonds, has much more stability and isn't subject to an Oct. 19 debacle."  Many pension funds, especially longtime investors in real estate, say they are getting their money's worth even if the returns haven't been bell-ringers.  "Real estate has delivered what it promised," says AT&T's Mr. Roessler.  "It has been able to outperform stocks three times in 10 years."  @ Real Estate vs.  Stocks and Bonds  @ Total returns -- price changes plus reinvested dividends and interest, if any -- on selected investments, in percent  @ FRANK RUSSELL CO. SALOMON  @ PROPERTY 3-MONTH BOND  @ INDEX S&P 500 T BILLS INDEX*  @ 1982 9.5% 21.5% 11.2% 31.8%  @ 1983 13.2 22.5 8.9 8.2  @ 1984 13.1 6.2 10.0 15.0  @ 1985 9.9 31.6 7.8 22.3  @ 1986 6.4 18.6 6.2 15.4  @ 1987 5.4 5.2 5.9 2.6  @ 1988 7.1 16.5 6.8 8.0  @ *Investment-grade issues  @ Source: Salomon Brothers Inc.  Monday, September 18, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10.5%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 8 15/16% high, 8 7/8% low, 8 15/16% near closing bid, 9% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.75% 30 to 44 days; 8.625% 45 to 59 days; 8.50% 60 to 89 days; 8.25% 90 to 119 days; 8.125% 120 to 149 days; 8% 150 to 179 days; 7.625% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.80% 30 days; 8.70% 60 days; 8.65% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.27% one month; 8.25% two months; 8.23% three months; 8.16% six months; 8.16% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.75% one month; 8.70% three months; 8.65% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.70% 30 days; 8.59% 60 days; 8.47% 90 days; 8.45% 120 days; 8.33% 150 days; 8.25% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% one month; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% two months; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% three months; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% four months; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% five months; 8 13/16% to 8 11/16% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 8 15/16% one month; 8 7/8% three months; 8 13/16% six months; 8 13/16% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, September 18, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.64%, 13 weeks; 7.64%, 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 9.94%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.25%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 9.90%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.82%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.28%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Playboy Enterprises Inc. said it will record a pretax gain of about $5 million in its fiscal first quarter ending Sept. 30 from the sale of its Boarts International Inc. subsidiary.  The Chicago-based publishing and entertainment concern said it sold the assets of Boarts, which is an international distributor of U.S. periodicals and paperback books, to Worldwide Media Service Inc.  Under the terms of the agreement, Worldwide Media will continue to distribute Playboy magazine and other Playboy publications overseas.  In the year-earlier first quarter, the company earned $445,000, or five cents a share, on revenue of $37.3 million.  Students of Chilean politics just prior to the 1973 overthrow of Salvador Allende should note an exchange between Cuban Judge Julio A. Gonzalez and Cuban General Patricio de la Guardia at the general's recent drug trial.  According to the official transcript, it went like this:  Gonzalez: De la Guardia, you held the rank of brigadier general. . . .  Had you been on other internationalist missions prior to the one in Angola?  De la Guardia: In Chile.  Gonzalez: After that mission did you receive an award?  De la Guardia: I received the Internationalist Medal in the first degree because I was in Chile commanding the troops when the coup d'etat in Chile occurred.  I also carried out other special tasks, other special operations.  Cooper Cos. reported a net loss for the fiscal third quarter, ended July 31, of $11.8 million, sharply narrower than the year-earlier loss of $61 million.  Cooper has been involved in a lengthy process of selling assets that has been complicated in recent months by a dissident shareholder group's battle to win control of the company.  The latest period's results comprise an operating loss of $6.4 million and a $5.4 million charge related to debt restructuring.  In the year-earlier quarter, the maker of health-care products had an operating loss of $53.1 million, $4.6 million of charges related to debt restructuring and a $3.3 million loss from discontinued operations.  Sales for the latest period totaled $10.7 million, a 62% slide from $28.4 million last year.  For the nine months, Cooper had a net loss of $49.8 million, comprising an operating loss of $21.3 million, a $21.2 million loss from discontinued operations and $7.3 milion of charges from debt restructuring.  In the year-earlier nine months, the company had a net loss of $92.4 million, composed of an operating loss of $82.3 million and a $10 million loss from discontinued operations.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Cooper closed at $3, unchanged.  Goldman, Sachs & Co. is known for throwing its weight around in the financial markets, but one of its traders apparently went overboard on the New York Stock Exchange a few months ago.  In one of the most unusual disciplinary actions it has ever meted out, the Big Board yesterday said a Goldman Sachs floor broker was censured and fined $2,500 for allegedly disrupting -- through verbal outbursts and "physically reckless" actions -- the gala opening ceremony on Feb. 14 for a newly listed stock.  Exchange traders identified the stock as Fiat S.p.A.  The broker, 45-year-old Thomas P. Breen, settled the disciplinary proceeding without admitting or denying wrongdoing.  The case was one of 11 announced by the Big Board yesterday, including one against a Swiss Bank Corp. subsidiary, SBCI Swiss Bank Corp. Investment Banking, for alleged capital-reserve violations.  SBCI settled the case, without admitting or denying wrongdoing, by paying a $150,000 fine.  The Goldman Sachs case has been talked about for months on the Big Board trading floor.  Mr. Breen, a floor broker with 21 years experience on Wall Street, is described in the exchange's disciplinary decision No. 89-57 as having "barged" through the opening ceremonies for Fiat so he could place a Goldman Sachs order for Fiat shares.  The Big Board routinely has such opening ceremonies for the 150 or so stocks newly listed on the exchange each year.  The Big Board's chairman, John J. Phelan Jr., and Giovanni Agnelli, chairman of Fiat, the giant Italian auto maker, were smiling for cameras during the morning of Feb. 14, when Mr. Breen took the actions, according to traders who were there.  As the Big Board disciplinary decision describes it, Mr. Breen "felt he was unable to get an order executed due to the group that was assembled for the ceremonies."  A floor supervisor cleared a path for Mr. Breen around the group, "yet Breen failed to use the path" and instead "engaged in inappropriate verbal outbursts, and acting in a physically reckless manner, barged through the participants assembled for the ceremonies," according to the Big Board.  These alleged actions violated Exchange Rule 401 governing good business practices, the exchange said.  Mr. Breen couldn't be reached to comment.  A Big Board trader sympathetic to him called the case "slightly unusual," and said Mr. Breen just got caught up in a crowded, "kind of get-out-of-my-way situation there."  Goldman Sachs and Fiat officials had no comment.  Most Big Board disciplinary cases are for conventional trading or accounting violations.  Yet every so often there is an unusual enforcement action; in July, for example, the exchange censured and handed out a $1,000 fine to a broker who allegedly failed to stay with two guests on the Big Board trading floor, causing them to engage in "disruptive behavior."  In the case concerning SBCI Swiss Bank Corp. Investment Banking, the exchange said that, among other things, the firm erred in computing its reserve requirements and thus failed to maintain minimum net capital.  The exchange also took disciplinary action against nine other individuals for what it called violations of its rules and of federal securities laws.  The decisions the exchange reached "may be subject to further review by the Securities and Exchange Commission," the Big Board said.  SBCI settled the exchange's charges without admitting or denying them.  The case arose from a review of the firm's books conducted by exchange examiners in 1986 and 1987.  The firm formerly was known as Swiss Bank Corp. International Securities.  The 1986 report says the firm didn't comply with minimum-capital requirements "on three dates on which underwriting commitments became effective," according to the exchange.  During March to May 1986, the firm's weekly computation of its reserve requirement for a bank account used for the exclusive benefit of customers "was not prepared as required," the exchange said.  Also, when the exchange conducted its 1986 review, "the firm did not have adequate procedures to supervise and control certain areas of the firm's sales practice activities," the Big Board said.  The exchange said SBCI called the errors "inadvertent and unintentional," and said the firm has taken corrective action, including replacing certain personnel, adopting a more-sophisticated data-processing system, and implementing additional security measures and accounting controls.  A spokesman for SBCI reiterated that the events took place three years ago and that the company corrected its procedures.  He declined further comment.  The exchange also permanently barred four individuals from working for an exchange member because of what it called improper conduct or misappropriation of customer securities.  They are Stephen H. Gorman of Troy, Mich.; Monty Lee Jackson of Mount Morris, Mich.; Daniel Villalobos of Foster City, Calif.; and Thomas Jungho Yu of Houston.  Messrs.  Gorman and Jackson also were censured.  Mr. Yu neither admitted nor denied the exchange's allegations.  Karen Ann Koopman of Phoenix, Ariz., was barred until she complies with an exchange request for data.  Steven Mitchell Podufaly of Waban, Mass., received a censure and a three-year bar for violations including failing to comply with an exchange request for testimony.  Edward Nicholas Zurek of Deerfield, Ill., consented to a censure, a 4 1/4-year bar, and a permanent bar from any supervisory post.  Without admitting or denying wrongdoing, he consented to findings that he, among other things, exercised discretionary power in accounts without first getting written authorization from customers.  The exchange found that Neil Philip Berman of Key Biscayne, Fla., entered trades in two customer accounts and exercised certain discretionary power in two accounts without proper authorization.  Without admitting or denying the findings, Mr. Berman consented to a censure and a three-year bar.  James Alan Schneider, a Fair Haven, N.J., registered competitive market maker, consented to exchange findings that, among other things, he failed to engage in certain transactions that would contribute to a fair and orderly market.  He didn't admit or deny wrongdoing, but he consented to a censure, a $5,000 fine, and a bar from registration as a market maker for three years.  Mr. Berman said, "I'm not in the business any longer.  I didn't do anything wrong, but who cares?"  Mr. Yu declined to comment.  Messrs.  Gorman, Jackson, Villalobos, Podufaly, Zurek and Schneider and Ms. Koopman couldn't be reached for comment.  ---  Robert Daniels contributed to this article.  Magna International Inc. said it postponed plans to offer a minority of shares to the public of its Decoma International Inc. and Cosma International Inc. units.  Magna, a Markham, Ontario, auto parts manufacturer, said it delayed the sale to give it additional time to "more fully develop the operating mandates and related management responsibilities for its proposed public companies."  Magna officials couldn't be reached for comment.  Magna had planned to sell as much as 25% of the equity of each unit to raise a total of about 114 million Canadian dollars (US$96.2 million), which was to be used to reduce debt.  DONORS giving less than $200 to the Democratic Congressional Campaign Committee in the 12 months ended June 30 gave $1.6 million for 1989, down from $2.2 million for 1988, $2.4 million for 1987 and $3 million for 1986.  In Friday's edition, figures for 1989 and 1988 were misstated.  (See: "Politics & Policy: House Democratic Committee Finds Small Donors Are Becoming a Lot Less Liberal in Their Support" -- WSJ Sept. 15, 1989)  An investor group including Heinz C. Prechter, chairman of ASC Inc., Southgate, Mich., said it lowered its stake in HBO & Co. to 4.89% of the common shares outstanding.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, the group said it sold 272,000 common shares of the health-services concern between Aug. 17 and Sept. 7 for $12 to $12.625 a share.  The sales reduce the group's stake to 740,500 shares.  No reason was given in the filing for the sales.  A spokesman at Atlanta-based HBO said the company wasn't surprised by the group's move.  He said HBO's stock "just got to the price they were looking for."  HBO stock closed at $12.125, unchanged, in national over-the-counter trading yesterday.  The top 10 fuel-efficient cars in the 1990 lineup are foreign-made, according to an Environmental Protection Agency report.  But foreigners are also turning out the biggest gas guzzlers.  The 1990 Geo Metro XFI, a subcompact made in Japan by Suzuki for General Motors Corp.'s imported vehicle division, topped the high-mileage list by getting 53 miles per gallon in the city and 58 mpg on the highway.  It is the fourth year the GM import rated first place.  Eight other Japanese-made models and one from West Germany filled out the list of top gas savers.  The worst gas guzzler in the EPA's annual rating isn't for sale in the U.S. -- Chrysler Italian Imports' two-seat Italian-made Lamborghini Countach.  A 1990 model of the $155,000 sports car was tested by the EPA and got 6 mpg in city driving and 10 mpg on the highway, but the manufacturer says a replacement line will be introduced in the U.S. this year.  That means the worst gas guzzler on the road will be the 1990 British-built Rolls-Royce Bentley Continental, a $200,000 handmade convertible that gets 10 mpg in the city and 13 mpg on the highway.  The annual EPA report for the first time touted that fuel-efficient cars will save the global environment as well as gasoline.  The EPA, which has been collecting fuel-efficiency data on pre-production vehicles since 1974 as it tests air-pollution equipment, estimated that each Lamborghini annually would emit 15 tons of carbon dioxide, one of the so-called greenhouse gases that contribute to global warming.  The fuel-efficient Geo Metro would emit only about 2.2 tons a year.  Auto makers for the 1990 model year are required to produce fleets with an average fuel efficiency of 27.5 mpg, stricter than that required over the past four years.  Other high-mileage cars listed by the EPA were two additional models of the Geo Metro, two models of the Honda Civic CRX HF, three models of the Suzuki Swift, the Daihatsu Motor Co. Charade and a Volkswagen Jetta.  The range of mileage was from 37 to 49 mpg in the city, and 39 to 52 mpg on the highway.  HealthVest took a giant step toward independence by terminating, effective Sept. 15, its advisory agreement with a unit of Healthcare International Inc.  The real estate investment trust also relocated its principal office to downtown Austin, Texas, and terminated all construction management agreements with a second Healthcare subsidiary.  HealthVest has also hired several former Healthcare employees to facilitate the self-administration of the trust.  Healthcare International is a cash-strapped health-care concern that has been selling assets to stay afloat.  HealthVest was begun with four properties leased to Healthcare and now owns more than two-dozen health-care related properties, leased to various tenants.  but more for the whole meal.  That's the prospect facing some long-term investors in several stock mutual funds managed by American Capital Management & Research Inc.  The Houston-based fund group, majority owned by Primerica Corp., recently cut its fat up-front sales fee, to 5.75% from 8.5%, for six of its stock funds.  Sounds good.  But here's the hitch: Now it's levying a separate, annual charge that could eat into returns for its buy-and-hold investors.  And that move is drawing criticism from some fund specialists.  "It's like bait and switch," says Kurt Brouwer, a San Francisco investment adviser specializing in low-cost mutual funds.  Calling the lowered load "cosmetic," he says investors could end up shelling out more over time because of the funds' annual so-called 12b-1 fee, which soon will be levied to help market the funds.  (These fees are named after the 1980 rule that first allowed funds to siphon cash annually from fund assets to pay for marketing and distribution costs.)  Several stock funds have lowered their loads since Black Monday in an effort to revive sales.  Others have opted to cut out front-end loads altogether in favor of 12b-1 charges and exit fees.  But American Capital's new strategy is unusual because of its combination of both a steep up-front load and a marketing fee, at a time when investors increasingly are shunning high-cost funds.  The six funds, with total assets of more than $4 billion, are American Capital Pace, Enterprise Fund, Fund of America, Harbor Fund, Venture Fund and American OTC Fund.  Investors will be charged an annual fee of 0.25% of assets, starting Sept. 29, for the life of the funds.  American Capital officials shrug off the gripes.  The new fee strategy will help attract more money into the funds, they contend, which in turn will lower costs for all of their investors.  The new structure, they say, should help brokers who had been having trouble peddling stock funds to wary investors since the October 1987 crash.  "Brokers said, 'Look, it's hard enough to sell equity funds -- much less with an 8.5% load,'" conceded Thomas Goodwin, American Capital's marketing specialist.  But, says Mr. Goodwin, "Investors seem to be able to swallow 5.75%."  At the same time, American Capital officials maintain that the annual 12b-1 charge will give brokers more incentive to provide better service to shareholders.  And they say the new fee is too small to make much of a difference to investors.  "We only have to do a tiny, tiny bit better in terms of investment performance to overcome it," says Don G. Powell, American Capital president and chief executive officer.  U.S. District Judge Kenneth L. Ryskamp ordered the U.S. Customs Service to return some 210 Cuban paintings seized last March from art collector Ramon Cernuda.  The controversial case was the subject of a Wall Street Journal front page article in August.  In finding for Mr. Cernuda, the judge ruled that selling or exhibiting Cuban paintings are activities protected under the First Amendment and are therefore exempt from regulation under the Trading With the Enemy Act, which bars most trade with Cuba.  "It's a home run on all counts," said Mr. Cernuda, who alleged that he had been the subject of a prosecution motivated by conservative and politically influential segments of the Cuban exile community.  The judge said Mr. Cernuda had been a victim of "selective enforcement" since he has been "the only art dealer subjected to government seizure of his collection."  Auction houses such as Sotheby's and Christie's claim they hadn't realized that they had to acquire licenses to auction works by Cuban artists from the U.S. Treasury Department before the Cernuda controversy broke, the judge said.  The judge found that Mr. Cernuda, who bought his paintings from the two auction houses as well as two diplomats, hadn't traded "with the enemy," as had been alleged by the government.  U.S. Attorney Dexter Lehtinen said he hadn't seen the decision and therefore couldn't comment.  Whenever Ann Callahan makes hotel reservations for her boss, Gil Rogin, she must settle several pressing pieces of business before getting around to such trivia as the length of stay and size of room.  First, there's the very basic issue of the swimming pool to resolve.  Does the hotel in question have one?  What shape is it? (Rectangular is best for push-offs and flip turns.) How long is it? (The longer the better.) How deep is it? (Apparently not a major issue, since Mr. Rogin, the corporate editor at Time Warner Inc., once swam in a pool while it was being drained, and completed his requisite mile swim with his knees scraping the concrete at the shallow end.) How crowded is it? (Serious swimmers don't like to share.) Is it indoors or outdoors?  How early does it open? (An important consideration for the business person whose day could well begin with 7:30 breakfast appointments.)  Mr. Rogin, who can't remember when he last missed a day in the water, and who belongs to four swimming clubs in the New York area, has, over the years, mastered the art of compromise and quick thinking.  On the scene during the 1980 Winter Olympics, Mr. Rogin, then managing editor of Sports Illustrated, grudgingly recognized that he couldn't swim in the very frozen Lake Placid.  "So I went into town and snuck into various motels, changed in the men's rooms and went swimming," he says.  "That was a desperate situation."  According to the National Sporting Goods Association, there are 71.1 million recreational swimmers in the U.S.; few take the activity more seriously than Mr. Rogin.  When in Miami, he stays at a particular hotel that has a small pool but is located next to a hotel with a large pool -- and a friendly manager who grants Mr. Rogin entree.  "My biggest fear," he says, "is that for some reason a pool will be drained.  I've had bad dreams about it."  Mr. Rogin, who networks energetically to hear about good pools, would be the very first to admit that swimming is an enormously boring activity, but the feeling of well-being that is left behind with the chlorine residue is more than adequate payoff.  "It's an obsession," says John Jessey, travel manager at Conde Nast Traveler, who carries a pair of swimming trunks in his pocket at all times, and asks even more aquatic questions than Mr. Rogin's ever-vigilant secretary.  "Is the pool in service at this time?"  Mr. Jessey wants to know, a very important question for the swimming Northerner headed South to do business.  "You can't assume that just because the weather is warm the pool is open," he says with the tone of a man who has learned a bitter lesson the hard way.  "In the South they may see May and June as cold months still.  In Texas in October they're ready to close the pool regardless of the warm temperature."  It is not enough for Mr. Jessey to know that the pool is open year-round and at all hours: He wants a room overlooking the pool to check in advance how crowded it is.  If the front desk can't oblige that request, Mr. Jessey at least would like a room very close to the pool to cut down on travel time.  Mr. Jessey makes no exceptions to his policy of staying only in pool-equipped hotels and makes no apologies for his passion.  "With all the demands of business travel, swimming helps me recover from the hassles and stress," he says.  The high concentration of non-swimmers who work as reservations clerks has tended to turn even the most trusting freestylers into skeptics.  "Do you have a pool?" is Michael Stott's first question when booking a room.  His second question: "Do you REALLY have a pool?"  "A reservation clerk's definition of a pool is not usually my definition of a pool," says Mr. Stott, until recently the marketing director of the Richmond, Va.-based Office America, purveyor of office supplies.  "They always say 'It's Olympic size.' Well, Olympic size is 50 meters {165 feet}, so I ask if it's 50 meters.  Then they say 'It's a BIG one.'" Generally, at this turn in the conversation, Mr. Stott asks, very politely, to be connected to the lifeguard, whom he'll frequently persuade to pace off the pool, describe its contours and reveal whether it has lights for late-night laps.  Not that a small pool would keep Mr. Stott on dry land; he once did his daily mile in a pool that was 27 feet long and 2 1/2 feet deep.  Size and shape and hours of operation certainly are important, says Wendy Finerman, a producer at Columbia Pictures, "but I always ask the temperature of the pool too," she says.  "My basic requirement is it be heated and at least 40 feet long."  Serious swimmers on business trips learn to live with the indignity of kidney-shaped pools ("You know there's a set of stairs at one end so you can't do a flip turn without breaking your heel," says Mr. Stott); they learn to live with the specter of children frolicking at the shallow end ("You've got to get up at ungodly hours to beat the kids into the pool," mourns Mr. Rogin).  They learn to deal with the stares of front-desk clerks, who, according to Ms. Finerman, "look at you real funny when you start asking them a lot of questions about pools."  They even learn to deal with Europe, a continent that presents particular challenges to swimming fanatics.  Ms. Finerman has learned that while most hotels don't have pools, the management can arrange pool time at private clubs.  "There are pools in all the European cities," says Mr. Rogin.  "It's just a matter of finding someone to direct you to one and getting permission to swim there.  "But," he sighs, "there are vast areas of rural Europe {Mr.  Rogin is thinking particularly of Scotland} that you can't go to because the sea is too cold or there aren't any pools.  I simply don't go to those places."  ---  Favorites pools of the fanatics, in no particular order:  -- The Regent (Hong Kong): Outdoor pool, diamond-shaped, 66 feet long, 86 degrees.  Open year-round, 6:30 a.m.-8 p.m. No lanes set aside for lap swimming.  Early-morning swimmers get complementary fresh orange juice.  -- The Chicago Hilton: Indoor pool, rectangular, 66 feet, 83 degrees. 6 a.m.-10 p.m.  Two lanes for lap swimming.  -- The Beverly Hills Hotel: Outdoor pool, rectangular, 66 feet, heated.  Hours vary depending on the season.  No lanes set aside for laps.  Pool used to be eight feet longer, but former owner Ivan Boesky lopped off a portion to expand the deck area and add a cafe.  -- The Four Seasons Inn on the Park (Houston): Two outdoor pools, heated depending on the season.  Rectangular one is 80 feet; L-shaped one is 92 feet.  Both open 24 hours.  No lanes set aside for laps.  -- The Tepid Baths (Auckland, New Zealand): Indoor pool, rectangular, 83 feet, 84 degrees.  Monday-Friday, 6 a.m.-10 p.m.; Saturday and Sunday, 8 a.m.-7 p.m. Lanes for lap swimming.  Admission: NZ$3.50 (about $2).  -- The Four Seasons (Philadelphia): Indoor pool, rectangular, 45 feet, between 79 and 83 degrees. 6 a.m.-10 p.m.  Three lanes for lap swimming.  -- The Grosvenor House (London): Indoor pool, rectangular, 66 feet, 82 degrees.  Monday-Friday, 6:30 a.m.-10 p.m.; Saturday and Sunday, 7 a.m.-10 p.m. Lanes for lap swimming on request.  -- The Fairmont (New Orleans): Outdoor pool, rectangular, 60 feet, between 76 and 78 degrees.  Year-round, 6:30 a.m.-10 p.m. No lanes set aside for laps.  -- The Registry (Scottsdale, Ariz.): Outdoor pool, R-shaped, 55 feet, 84 degrees.  Year-round.  Lifeguard hours, 8 a.m.-6 p.m; swim other times at your own risk.  No lanes for laps.  ---  Ms. Kaufman swims and writes in New York City.  Imagine a day when a Wall Street analyst gets paid $50,000 for every good prediction, gets docked $50,000 for every bad one and otherwise gets only a cup of coffee for showing up in the morning.  That time may not be far away.  Seeking to squeeze more profits from their research staffs at a time when the securities business isn't robust, many big Wall Street brokerage firms are starting to pay more of their analysts and researchers based on whether their work actually helps sell stocks and bonds.  This performance-oriented pay system is a departure from the pre-crash days when Wall Street lavished big salaries and perks on star securities analysts, regardless of how wrong they were.  Lawrence Eckenfelder, a Prudential-Bache Securities Inc. brokerage industry analyst, said that with deteriorating profits from stock sales and trading at many firms, "there seems to be more focus on analysts actually being able to make money.  More firms seem to be looking at it."  Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., a 62%-owned unit of American Express Co., has just put more of its analysts on a 2 1/2-year-old system that ties stock picking and salary so closely that it's called "Bonus."  Shearson analysts rate stocks as either Buy, Outperform, Neutral, Underperform or Sell (the first letters spell "bonus"), and at year end the firm's computers check how well the analysts did.  "It's not a game.  It's real money," said Jack Rivkin, Shearson's director of equity research.  Brokerage firms "are always in competition for good brokers and retaining clients.  And an element of retention of clients has to do with the quality of advice analysts give them, rather than {the firm's} overall image."  For investors, the new pressure on analysts to serve their sales force is another reminder that the advice they get from Wall Street may not always be totally objective.  The danger is that some analysts may be pushing stocks simply to show they can generate a lot of business.  The trend toward performance-based pay has hit full force at Dean Witter Reynolds Inc., a unit of Sears, Roebuck & Co., where the research department's main purpose these days seems to be to generate ideas for brokers, securities-industry analysts said.  A Dean Witter spokesman said the firm has decided to tie a "portion of pay of an analyst to his ideas, and also the result of the ideas," and to require analysts to spend more time in brokerage offices.  The new focus on generating products for brokers is one factor that led to the resignation this month of John Mendelson, a widely quoted Dean Witter stock-market analyst.  Dean Witter brokers said Mr. Mendelson's resignation was tied to the firm's desire to link his pay to how much he helped brokers sell stocks.  Mr. Mendelson said he plans to become a professional trader, manage some money and write a market letter for institutions.  Analysts said there is a new push at Prudential-Bache, a unit of Prudential Insurance Co. of America, to make stock-picking more a part of analysts' pay.  Michael Culp, Prudential-Bache's research head, confirmed the firm is considering "minor modifications" in how analysts are graded, with stock-picking prowess a part of the measurement.  Most of the firms stepping up the pressure on analysts stress that they know when to stop.  Prudential-Bache's Mr. Culp, for example, said he recognizes that there are analysts who know their industries well but just can't pick "hot" stocks, and they should get paid for their skills.  "If an analyst is under too much pressure to pick stocks, he may look for flimsy reasons to recommend stocks," Mr. Culp said.  At Merrill Lynch & Co., which has an elaborate model to measure monthly performance of analysts' ideas, research head Jack Lavery stressed the importance of "subjective evaluation on top of these inputs."  Others agree that the trend toward computer evaluation of analysts can be dangerous.  "The basic trend toward paying people based on good investment ideas is justified, but you have to be careful not to crimp or take away the creativity of analysts," said D. Larry Smith, a C.J. Lawrence, Morgan Grenfell Inc. analyst who was formerly head of research at Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. "Analysts who make money for people have to have courage, and sometimes they're wrong."  Graphic Technology Inc. agreed to be acquired by a unit of Nitto Denko Corp. under a tender offer of $18.50 a share.  There are approximately 2,850,000 shares outstanding, giving the transaction a value of $52.7 million.  Graphic Technology is an Olathe, Kan., maker of vinyl bar-code shelf labels read by computerized scanning devices in retail operations.  Terry Van Der Trunk, chairman and president, said he bought the company 11 years ago for $25,000.  Under the accord, he will exchange 427,975 shares of GTI common for 15% of the stock in GTI Acquisition Corp., the Nitto Denko unit, and will sell an additional 559,589 at the tender offer price.  Nitto Denko, based in Osaka, Japan, makes electrical insulating materials and had sales of $1.4 billion in the year ended March 31.  GTI would be its third U.S. acquisition.  GTI shares closed yesterday at $18.125, up $1, in American Stock Exchange composite trading.  It was some entrepreneur's big opportunity: Massachusetts Institute of Technology scientists already had worked on the problem for 15 years.  The researchers had spent over $3 million before results of the first animal tests emerged.  And now, they had developed a method to inhibit cataract formation in eyes.  At this point, such a project often falters.  Commercializing such university research frequently proves slow and frustrating, and opportunities are missed.  But in this case, a team of special MIT licensing executives quickly helped round up investors and encouraged formation of a new company, Oculon Inc., based in Seattle, to make its fortune off the research.  MIT and its scientists working on the project all get a share of the action.  These days, many universities and nonprofit research institutions are scrambling -- often with limited success -- to commercialize their research.  But in the past three years alone, MIT has helped professors and others start over 50 companies, all aiming to turn the fruits of MIT research into cash.  Traditionally, the world of university research has had trouble connecting with the world of money to commercialize research. (Indeed, many academics say such efforts aren't in keeping with a university's commitment to pure research.) Until it radically changed its methods three years ago, MIT also suffered its share of frustrations -- even though its laboratories are world-famous and its research budget exceeds $700 million a year.  MIT gets results these days because it can "understand the demands of business and the investment community and link them with the needs of scientists," says John Clark, a scientist and one of the founders of Oculon.  For starters, MIT invests heavily in patents -- sometimes over $50,000 to get world-wide coverage.  It helps its own scientists form new companies and recruit investors.  And it routinely acts as a "high-tech yenta" to introduce patents and research to potential investors, an official says.  The start-up companies receive a license to use MIT's technology and agree to a timetable for developing it; in return, the institute gets a small stake and royalties from sales.  In the Oculon case, the institute first filed several patents.  Then its licensing executives began to explore a business use for the results.  With all the work that already had been done, "we began to look for the best way to transfer that technology," says John Preston, head of the MIT licensing office.  After polling a number of potential investors and licensees, Mr. Preston decided that a start-up would be the best way to exploit the technology.  While Mr. Clark and physics professor George Benedek, an early researcher on the project, negotiated $5 million in financing from investors, the licensing office drafted an agreement that would give MIT a stake in the company and a share of future sales.  "MIT was extremely valuable in contacting venture-capital sources.  They knew who to contact and who would be interested," Mr. Clark says.  "They also helped us educate investors about the long-term nature of the project and what the potential obstacles could be."  It wasn't always this way.  In the early 1980s, MIT scientists complained that the university's licensing operation was staffed by bureaucratic lawyers who often became obstacles to good deals.  Back in 1983, for example, when computer technologist Daniel Hillis wanted the university to file patents for his designs for a sophisticated computer he had developed at MIT, the licensing office balked.  It was so indecisive, Mr. Hillis says, that he filed the patents himself and launched his Thinking Machines Corp. with about $8 million from private investors.  But in 1986, MIT restaffed its licensing office with executives who themselves had been entrepreneurs or worked in entrepreneurial businesses.  The institute gave the licensing group broad guidelines and autonomy to run the licensing operations.  Today, the office of six professionals handles six to eight times as many start-ups as in the early 1980s, Mr. Preston says.  As part of its new approach, the licensing group re-established relations with Mr. Hillis and formally licensed the technology to him.  In return, MIT has a small stake and a share of royalties of Thinking Machines.  Last year, the computer company had revenue of more than $40 million.  "The one reason they've been so successful is because they concentrate on ways to get the technology out," says entrepreneur Steven Chubb, president of Matritech Inc., a Cambridge, Mass., start-up involved with new ways to detect cancer.  In Matritech's case, MIT even helped the company find management.  MIT biologist Sheldon Penman and former MIT researcher Edward Fey had developed Matritech's basic technology, which uses antibodies to detect proteins within cells.  Mr. Chubb approached MIT for a license to develop the technology in a new venture.  Besides agreeing, MIT helped the company find $3.5 million in venture capital as well as managers to develop the business.  In most MIT projects that develop into start-ups, scientists such as Mr. Penman and Mr. Fey don't actually run the company, says Lita Nelson, an MIT licensing official.  In fact, she says, university policy prohibits faculty members from being line officers in any company.  Most of the scientists, however, continue to work with the companies as consultants, receive royalties and own small stakes as well.  In some instances, MIT also combines its technology with that of others to form new companies.  Take the launch of Enzytech Inc., which uses enzymes and polymers in food additives and drug delivery.  The initial research was conducted simultaneously by Boston's Children's Hospital and MIT.  In 1987, the two institutions licensed their technologies to a start-up formed expressly for commercialization.  And venture capitalists put in over $5 million to keep the company going.  Many venture capitalists say the projects at MIT are much more "state-of-the-market" than at other universities.  Says New York venture capitalist Fred Nazem, "It's a good place to get new technology."  In 1986, Mr. Nazem was the first investor in Cirrus Logic Inc., which grew out of research at MIT. Mr. Nazem's $2.5 million investment in the Milpitas, Calif., maker of high-performance chips has a market value today of nearly $28 million.  Robert K. Herdman was named vice chairman of accounting services, while Charles J. Reynolds was named vice chairman of auditing services at this accounting and consulting firm.  Mr. Herdman, 40 years old, was national director of accounting standards at Ernst & Whinney.  Mr. Reynolds, 44, was director of auditing for the New York and Metropolitan offices of Arthur Young.  Frederick D. Pettit was named managing director and chief operating officer of the private-banking group of this firm, a newly created position.  He had been deputy chairman of Multinational Capital Ltd., a closely held corporate-finance house in London.  William E. Thiele was named president of this insurance holding company, succeeding John H. Bretherick Jr., who plans to retire soon after turning 60 years old in December.  Mr. Thiele, 47, has been senior executive vice president in charge of the company's insurance operations.  He will also take the chief operating officer post of Continental, which had been vacant.  John P. Mascotte, 50, remains chairman and chief executive officer.  Mr. Bretherick will also retire from the board.  Publishers Equipment Corp., Dallas, agreed to purchase Solna Web AB, a Swedish maker of web offset printing equipment.  The acquisition is valued at approximately $16 million.  Publishers Equipment, which makes printing presses, plans to finance the acquisition with a combination of equity and seller-financed debt.  The seller is AB Bonnierforetagen, a Swedish conglomerate that already holds approximately 22% of Publishers Equipment; the acquisition is expected to raise its stake to about 28%.  The acquisition still must receive final approval from the Publishers Equipment board and is subject to government and third-party consents, but a Publishers Equipment spokesman said it should be completed in the fourth quarter.  Solna Web has sales subsidiaries in England, West Germany, Brazil and the U.S. and had 1988 revenue of $60 million.  Consolidated revenue for Publishers Equipment in the same period was $46 million.  Kenji Yoshizawa was named resident senior managing director of this bank holding company and chairman of its U.S. unit, Bank of Tokyo Trust Co.  He succeeds Tamotsu Yamaguchi, 59 years old, who returned to Japan to become deputy president of the parent company.  Mr. Yoshizawa, 57, was a senior managing director of the parent.  Stephen Keith Carter was named president of the pharmaceutical research and development division of this health-care products firm.  He had been senior vice president of pharmaceutical and medical development in the division.  Jerome Birnbaum was named to the newly created post of executive vice president of research in the division.  Mr. Carter succeeds Giulio Vita, who remains a vice president of the corporation and takes the newly created post of senior vice president and scientific adviser to the Science & Technology Group.  As students of television lip reading no doubt will recall, Mike Ditka, coach of football's Chicago Bears, over the years has had numerous differences of opinion with Mike Tomczak, his quarterback.  Such is the nature of their relationship that the disputes continued even after a victorious Sunday here at the expense of the Minnesota Vikings.  Their latest debate, conducted in separate post-game interviews, was over statistics and the sort of people who value them.  "Statistics are for idiots," declared Ditka.  "Statistics are for critics," said Tomczak.  But, hmmm, maybe it wasn't an argument after all.  Maybe those guys were talking about the same folks.  Or maybe it's that both are able to see things that the, uh, critics can't.  "Our win today wasn't pretty, but we knew it wouldn't look pretty," summed up Ditka without rebuttal.  "We feel we're a little better than we look."  As it was, the Bears looked pretty good on Sunday or, at least, for one quarter of a gloriously sunny afternoon that made even decrepit Soldier Field look good.  That was the fourth quarter, in which they outscored the Vikings, 28-0, en route to a 38-7 win, their second in as many appearances in this still-new National Football League season.  Come to think of it, they must have played OK for the first three quarters, too, or they wouldn't have been ahead.  So what if baby-faced quarterback Tomczak had a 10-for-26 passing day on top of 10-for-24 stats the week before in a 17-14 victory over the Cincinnati Bengals?  So what if the losers outgained the winners, 320 yards to 306?  So what if the Bears, whose carnivorous pass rush turned opposing quarterbacks' hair white with terror in their 1985 championship season and for a couple of years thereafter, went sackless?  "We showed patience and discipline," said Ditka, whose newfound gravity was underscored by sideline attire that included both belt and suspenders.  "I'm proud of that."  You probably get the idea by now that the 1989 Bears are different from their recent, beastly predecessors and, from appearances, they are.  For starters, QB Tomczak does not go about off-field sporting spiked hair and wrap-around sunglasses like Jim McMahon, the man he replaced by virtue of the latter's late exile/trade for draft choices unknown to San Diego.  For reserves (and a few starters, too), 26 of the 47 men currently wearing bruinish black (very dark blue, actually) are in their fourth season or less, meaning that they saw the team's Super Bowl triumph on TV, if at all.  But if the look is new, the ways are familiar to the gang that won the past five NFC Central Division titles and was the league's winningest unit in that span.  "Oh, yeah, we've got a lot of new faces -- just look around you," said Mike Singletary, Chicago veteran middle linebacker and defensive leader, gesturing at the smiling countenances atop the unclothed bods in the Bears locker room post-fray.  "But I think most of them have got the idea pretty well."  If the Bears hadn't they wouldn't be 2-0 after games with a couple teams some thought would knock them off.  The Bengals, their week-one foe, were a narrow Super Bowl loser to the San Francisco 49ers in January, and the Vikings were picked by many to appear in that august struggle this time around.  Indeed, the Minnesotans were slight point-spread favorites Sunday, no small honor in a league in which the humblest home team usually gets a betting bow.  The Vikes' cast included nine last-season Pro Bowlers, and I ain't talkin' ten pins.  Their premier passing combo of Wade Wilson to squirmy Anthony Carter may be the game's best if you don't count San Fran's Joe Montana to Jerry Rice.  They beat the Bears three times last year, if you do count a pre-season tilt in Sweden.  They spindled the formidable-appearing Houston Oilers, 38-7, in their opener last week.  Throughout a Sunday first half made tedious in part by a couple of long delays for those awful TV reviews of field-officials' decisions, the Vikings gave about as good as they got.  The Bears scored first on a 51-yard, first-period drive capped when Neal Anderson, Walter Payton's worthy successor at running back, caught a 24-yard pass and crawled into the end zone before a Viking could pin him down.  The Vikes got even in quarter two on a Wilson-to-Jim Gustafson pass, and although a field goal gave Chicago a 10-7 halftime edge the visitors led in every important yardage category.  In the second half, though, a couple of bad things happened to Minny.  The first was a missed field goal by Teddy Garcia from 33 yards early in quarter three that would have meant a tie.  The other came on a 22-yard pass play from Tomczak to Matt Suhey, a stumpy, graying fullback in his 10th season, that set up the fourth-period TD that finally gave the Bears some leeway.  Tomczak was rushed hard and threw the ball up for grabs.  Suhey looked back before Scott Studwell, the linebacker who was covering him, and grabbed it at the Minnesota two yard-line.  Anderson scored from there to make it 17-7.  "I hung it up for Matt because he's an older guy and needs more time to run his route," Tomczak quipped.  The joke worked only because the pass did.  From there, the Vikes simply collapsed.  On the second play after the next kickoff, Bear linebacker Ron Rivera intercepted a Wilson pass to set up a touchdown drive.  Cornerback Lemuel Stinson intercepted on the first Viking play after that and ran it in from 29 yards.  Rookie halfback Mark Green scored from 37 yards on his first carry as a Bear in his team's last possession.  "It was embarrassing.  We played atrocious," fumed Keith Millard, a Minnesota defensive lineman.  The information that Ditka had commented that the Vikes might not lose again until Dec. 3, the next time the two teams meet, didn't soothe.  "Ditka's a sarcastic person.  I don't take him serious," Millard said.  He didn't say anything about statistics.  First Pennsylvania Corp. agreed to be acquired by CoreStates Financial Corp. for stock valued at $18.75 a share, or about $730 million, passing up a sweetened, eleventh-hour bid from Meridian Bancorp.  The acquisition of First Pennsylvania would make CoreStates the third largest banking operation in Pennsylvania, with about $23 billion in assets and about 280 branches in southeastern Pennsylvania and southern New Jersey.  It would also prevent Meridian, an aggressive and rapidly growing rival of CoreStates, from gaining a much bigger share of the lucrative Philadelphia-area market.  In accepting the CoreStates offer early Monday morning after a weekend marathon of negotiations, First Pennsylvania left on the table a bid from Meridian valued at about $20.85 a share, based on Friday's closing stock prices.  But First Pennsylvania's board was swayed by terms of the CoreStates offer and promises that branch offices and operations could be consolidated without massive layoffs among First Pennsylvania's staff.  Leslie Butler, First Pennsylvania's vice chairman, said his company's board "believes it accepted the offer which provides the best long-term value for our customers, employees, shareholders and community."  Under the terms of the CoreStates offer, First Pennsylvania shareholders would receive CoreStates stock in a tax-free exchange valued at $18.75 for each First Pennsylvania share.  First Pennsylvania shareholders are guaranteed of receiving $18.75 a share in CoreStates stock as long as CoreStates' share price rises or falls no more than 6% from Thursday's close of $49.50 a share.  Wall Street reacted quickly when the agreement was announced yesterday morning.  In over-the-counter trading, CoreStates shares fell $2.125 to close at $47.50, while Meridian shares rose $1.125 to close at $23.50.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, First Pennsylvania shares also rose, closing at $16.75, up $1.50.  Over the weekend, in an effort to respond to deadlines imposed by the CoreStates bid, Meridian raised its initial offer of $18 a share to about $20.85 a share.  But First Pennsylvania officials said the sweetened Meridian bid was difficult to evaluate because it offered the bank's shareholders a fixed number of Meridian shares to be exchanged for their First Pennsylvania holdings.  Thus the final purchase price of the Meridian offer could fluctuate if Meridian's stock price were to rise or fall before the merger could be completed.  "The risk would be entirely borne by our shareholders," explained First Pennsylvania's Mr. Butler.  Meridian declined to comment on the specifics of its bid.  A spokesperson said the Reading, Pa., bank had signed a confidentiality agreement with First Pennsylvania pledging not to disclose details of their negotiations.  People familiar with the negotiations said some Meridian representatives feel betrayed by the outcome because Meridian's final bid was higher, although not guaranteed, and because it had made the first bid.  "It's as if they've been kicked below the belt," said a person who followed the negotiation process.  Others suggested that First Pennsylvania's choice was influenced by CoreStates being based, like First Pennsylvania, in Philadelphia.  The merger agreement is subject to approval by regulators and First Pennsylvania shareholders.  To carry out its transaction with CoreStates, First Pennsylvania will have to extricate itself from a 1986 merger agreement with Marine Midland Banks Inc., a unit of Hongkong & Shanghai Banking Corp. of Hong Kong.  Marine Midland had offered $15 a share.  That combination was supposed to be completed after March 1990.  First Pennsylvania will pay $45 million in cash to buy back warrants held by Marine Midland that would have given it a 24.9% voting stake in First Pennsylvania.  Meridian had offered Marine Midland $30 million for the First Pennsylvania stake.  To terminate its prior agreement with Meridian, Marine Midland said Meridian will receive $22.5 million.  "We're splitting the $45 million in effect," said a Marine Midland spokesman.  CoreStates emerged as a suitor for First Pennsylvania only after Meridian put the Philadelphia bank in play.  In an interview, CoreStates Chairman Terrence A. Larsen said he had been watching First Pennsylvania "for some time," although he hadn't thought of making an offer until recently because he believed both First Pennsylvania and Marine Midland were content with their merger plans.  CoreStates said the acquisition would result in a per-share earnings dilution for the combined company of about 7% to $5.13 a share, based on analysts' forecasts for 1990 and assuming 10% annual earnings growth.  Even so, CoreStates believes it can offset the dilution by consolidating operations and cutting some expenses.  CoreStates predicted that in the first 24 months after the merger is completed it could realize expense savings of about $89 million, with nearly half of that amount coming from back-office and systems consolidation.  Savings of about $57 million would be needed to offset the dilution in the first year of the merger.  CoreStates is "one of the few major banks that actually comes through on what it promises," said Thomas Hanley, a securities analyst at Salomon Brothers.  He noted that the bank holding company has achieved substantial economies of scale in previous acquisitions.  Mr. Larsen plans to dispose of First Pennsylvania's $485 million portfolio of loans to lesser developing countries as quickly as possible, but additional reserves of about $150 million might be needed to liquidate it.  First Pennsylvania already has set aside about $145.5 million of reserves to cover this portfolio.  Although CoreStates will be aggressive in cutting costs and eliminating overlapping operations at First Pennsylvania, Mr. Larsen said the process wouldn't entail massive layoffs of First Pennsylvania employees.  Mr. Larsen said CoreStates is seeing enough growth in its basic businesses to allow it to use the additional staff.  A similar promise was made when CoreStates acquired Hamilton Bank in Lancaster, Pa., in 1983.  CoreStates moved many administrative operations to Philadelphia and Wilmington, Del., and eventually eliminated 265 jobs in the Lancaster area.  The issue of layoffs was a big concern for First Pennsylvania in its negotiations with Meridian.  Meridian "didn't say that there would be layoffs specifically.  But with the cost-savings that would have to be achieved to offset the dilution, there's no question that there would be layoffs," said George A. Butler, First Pennsylvania's chairman.  ---  Robin Goldwyn Blumenthal in New York contributed to this article.  TAKING COVER: More companies fund executive benefits.  But risks persist.  Fully 53% of companies with more than $5 billion of sales have made special funding or security arrangements to assure top managers they'll ultimately collect the deferred pay, pensions and other benefits they've been promised, says Robert Salwen of consultant Mercer Meidinger Hansen.  That's up from 44% last year and a negligible number a decade ago.  The risk of takeovers prods companies to back their pledges, he says.  By Mercer's count, however, two-thirds of the security plans include a form of trust that offers no protection if the company goes bust.  And a third are funded by company-owned life insurance in which the executive has no interest; again, it's a promise to pay.  Fred Rumack of Buck Consultants suggests that worried executives might take benefits in a lump sum when they retire -- while they still have some voice in the company -- rather than in installments payable long after they've left.  Executives, too, could negotiate for more cash or stock now instead of promises of pensions later.  NEW OUTSIDE DIRECTORS: Are they adequately briefed for the job?  Exxon Corp. says it doesn't have any formal orientation for new directors; they meet with officers, visit operations when able and get an armful of budget and business plans each fall.  At Borden Inc., which believes a "formal program would be overkill for some people and not enough for others," new directors get information "based on their needs."  Dow Chemical Co.'s distribution includes a code of conduct and a warning against insider trading.  Airborne Freight Corp. says its outside directors know the company through personal or professional contacts and don't need any orientation.  Similarly, Utah Medical Products looks for directors familiar with the health industry.  Heidrick Partners, a search firm, says, the majority of major industrial companies "fail to offer a structured orientation program."  Chief executives, it says, devote on average only 4.4 hours a year in one-on-one meetings with newcomers to their boards.  EMPLOYEE SURVEYS tap worker attitudes.  But how they're used stirs debate.  Equifax Inc. surveys workers regularly to ask, among other things, what they'd do if they were president.  One result: a change in vacation policy.  Motorola Inc. learns workers crave recognition.  Ashland Oil Co. discovers the best source of information for workers is the company grapevine.  Some companies, however, see limits.  NCNB Corp. questions workers only when it contemplates some action.  "The survey helps us decide what action to take," an official explains.  Corning Inc., which has been running surveys since 1985, sees such studies as "big traps" if used "to provide all the answers."  In Corning's view, "you use surveys to see patterns; they point you in the right direction for conversation."  Consultant A. Foster Higgins & Co. says many companies find it difficult to interpret or implement survey results.  JOB HUNTING gets tougher for displaced executives.  The search took an average 5.9 months last year, up from 5.1 months in 1988, says Drake Beam Morin, an outplacement firm.  But they're getting 3% more severance pay and a 9% bigger salary when hired than last year's crop.  BUSINESS TRIPS get shorter.  The Hotel and Travel Index, a travel directory, says the number of business trips jumped to 155.6 million last year from 103.6 million in 1983.  Only 67% involved hotel stays, off from 72% five years before.  INCREASING NUMBERS of female employees will quit jobs at major corporations, half the women surveyed by Future Focus say.  "Women are leaving because they do not have the support in the workplace or at home," the research firm contends.  HARD HATS for news people.  Virginia's Department of Labor and Industry says newspapers and broadcasters have the same responsibility as any employer to provide protective equipment for reporters and photographers covering hazardous events.  PUBLIC SERVICE gets a college push.  But the schools want federal help.  Some 200 colleges have banded together in the Campus Compact to draw more students into such community service as tutoring youngsters and helping the homeless.  "We're setting the stage for participatory democracy," says Ellen Futter, president of Barnard College.  But volunteerism, she notes, often has been a luxury of the well-to-do.  Students on financial aid find little time to spare from course work and jobs; after graduation, they need private-sector jobs to pay off loans.  Incentives being considered range from credits to loan help.  Joseph Duffey, chancellor of the University of Massachusetts at Amherst, suggests part of the loans might be forgiven for students who take a year off for community work.  Such encouragement, though, could cost billions.  So the colleges are looking to the federal government for leadership and financial support.  President Bush has proposed a volunteer program without pay.  A Senate bill would test cash incentives.  THE CHECKOFF: Middle managers, unite] Power & Systems Inc., which runs seminars, sponsors a workshop on Mastering Middleness . . . .  Looking for a job out of town?  "Wrangle an address and phone number there," advises Joy Reed Belt, a career consultant.  A target company might think you're a local and give you an edge.  Eastman Kodak Co. said it and Optical Radiation Corp. of Azusa, Calif., have developed a process by which a digital optical sound track can be printed directly onto motion picture film.  As a result, movie theatergoers will be able to listen to higher quality sound than that currently available, said Richard D. Wood, president of Optical Radiation Corp.  "It will be like switching from LP's to compact disks."  Kodak said the joint venture is currently in discussion with movie producers to make the first feature film utilizing the new technology.  Although some additional equipment will be required by the theaters, the new process will add no new costs to film producers, said Joerg Agin, general manager of Kodak's motion picture and audiovisual products division.  Unlike current films which have magnetic strips to record analog sound, the Cinema Digital Sound process will allow film negatives to be encoded with a digital sound track, providing digital disk sound quality to movies.  The World Bank approved a $224 million loan to Chile for road-construction projects to be carried out over the next four years.  World Bank officials said other financing for the construction of roads, bridges and other highway facilities in Chile will be provided by Japan's Export-Import Bank, about $150 million, and the 44-nation Inter-American Development Bank, $85 million.  The total cost of the road projects, to be carried out by Chile's ministry of public works, will be about $907 million in the 1990-1993 period, the World Bank said.  In other action, the World Bank cleared two loans, totaling $80.5 million, for housing projects in Morocco, particularly in low-income urban areas of the North African country.  Separately, the International Development Association, a World Bank affiliate, approved a $40 million credit to Mozambique to cover part of the estimated $345 million cost of a major transport project.  World Bank officials said Mozambique will rehabilitate and upgrade rail, highway, pipeline and other facilities in the transport corridor linking several African countries, including Zimbabwe and Malawi, with Mozambique's Indian Ocean port of Beira, which will compete with South Africa's port of Durban in handling various cargoes.  The World Bank said its loans to Chile and Morocco will carry variable lending rates, currently 7.73% a year, while the IDA financing for the transport project in Mozambique will be interest-free except for administrative fees.  MAI Basic Four Inc., Tustin, Calif., said Brooke Partners L.P., which is controlled by MAI Chairman Bennett S. LeBow, completed its previously announced investment that gives Brooke a 54% stake in the computer maker.  Brooke invested $30 million in cash, and contributed to MAI's capital $25 million of Series B preferred stock (both outstanding and to be issued).  Brooke also gave MAI certain financial guarantees, for which it received equity securities convertible into 17.5 million MAI common shares.  MAI plans to offer shareholders nontransferable rights to buy 17.5 million MAI common shares at $3.54 each.  The rights offering is expected to be made by March 30, 1990.  MAI expects to use proceeds from the MAI stock sale in the rights offering to repurchase from Brooke a corresponding portion of equity securities it initially received.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, MAI closed yesterday at $3.125 a share, down 62.5 cents.  CAPITAL HOLDING Corp. said it will issue $200 million in public medium-term notes.  The Louisville, Ky., life insurance concern said the Series A notes will be issued with fixed or floating interest rates or at an original issue discount.  Maturities may vary from nine months to 30 years.  Proceeds will finance the company's recent acquisition of Southlife Holding Co. and for general corporate purposes.  Super Rite Foods Inc. said shareholders of the grocery-store chain approved its acquisition by an investor group led by Super Rite's chairman, Alex Grass, in a transaction valued at about $137 million.  Mr. Grass is also chairman of Rite Aid Corp., a Shiremanstown, Pa., an operator of drugstores and other retail chains, which owns about 47% of Super Rite.  The investor group also includes members of Mr. Grass's family and certain senior managers at Super Rite, which is based in Harrisburg, Pa.  Under terms of the merger, each of Super Rite's five million common shares outstanding will be exchanged for $25.25 and $2 face amount of newly issued preferred stock yielding 15% annually.  Holders also will receive warrants to acquire 10% of the equity in the new closely held company.  It looks like California securities brokers won't be going to real estate school after all.  Gov. George Deukmejian is widely expected to sign Senate Bill 1209, a measure to exempt licensed broker-dealers from a requirement to also be licensed as real estate brokers.  The bill was approved by the California state legislature last week.  The real estate license requirement, which applies to business brokers, protects sellers of grocery stores, gasoline service stations and other businesses.  However, a recent appellate court decision extended the requirement to include mergers-and-acquisitions specialists engaged in traditional investment banking activities.  The court decision was so sweeping, attorneys said, that it could be applied to most large transactions, such as a tender offer to California investors by an out-of-state company.  The Securities Industry Association, a large trade group, retained a law firm to get an amendment to the state code passed before the end of the legislative session Friday.  "There's no opposition to the bill," said a legislative assistant in the office of Sen. John Garamendi (D., Sacramento), who introduced the measure for the Securities Industries Association.  The California Association of Realtors and the state departments of corporations and real estate agreed with the language, said the aide.  ART  Metropolitan Museum of Art, New York: "Masterworks of Ming and Qing Painting From the Forbidden City" -- Seventy-six hanging scrolls, handscrolls and albums from Beijing's Palace Museum.  The museum is located in the former Imperial Palace, also known as the Forbidden City, a 180-acre complex of gardens, courtyards and buildings in the heart of the city, whence the 24 emperors of the Ming (1368-1644) and Qing (1644-1911) dynasties ruled. 82nd Street and Fifth Avenue, through Oct. 29.  National Museum of American Art, Smithsonian Institution, Washington: "Masterworks of Louis Comfort Tiffany" -- Sixty-five of the rarest and most technically brilliant creations of Louis Comfort Tiffany, most of which have never before been seen in a museum exhibition.  Included are leaded-glass windows, lamps, glass vases, jars and bottles, enamels, bronzes, mosaics, wooden objects, jewelry and paintings.  Renwick Gallery, Sept. 29-March 4.  The show then can be seen at New York's National Academy of Design, March 27-July 8.  Carnegie Museum of Art, Pittsburgh: "ART/artifact: African Art Through Western Eyes" -- More than 160 objects -- jewelry, masks, knives, beadwork, textiles, utensils, carved figures -- selected from three of the oldest collections of African art in the U.S. (those at the Buffalo Museum of Science, the Hampton University Museum and the American Museum of Natural History). 4400 Forbes Ave., Sept. 30-Dec. 10.  FILM  New York Film Festival: This year's edition of Manhattan's annual movie marathon has everything including "The Kitchen Sink" (a short from New Zealand).  The festival opens Sept. 22 with "Trop Belle Pour Toi" ("Too Beautiful for You"), a new take on sexual attraction by France's Bertrand Blier, and wraps Oct. 9 with "Breaking In," a wry look at a pair of small-time thieves from Scotland's Bill Forsyth.  The 31 offerings in between include "Mystery Train," the latest from offbeat American Jim Jarmusch; "Strapless," a psychological study by Britain's David Hare; and "A Short Film About Killing," a hard-hitting drama from Poland's Krzysztof Kieslowski.  Alice Tully Hall, Lincoln Center. (212) 362-1911.  DANCE  American Indian Dance Theatre: After transfixing audiences from Tucson to Tokyo, this ensemble of Native American dancers, musicians and singers makes its Manhattan debut with a two-week engagement at the Joyce Theater.  The pan-tribal troupe, in brilliant handcrafted costumes, performs a variety of traditional rituals adapted for the stage, including the stately Zuni Rainbow Dance, the eerie Apache Crown Dance, and the dervish-like Fancy Dance. 175 Eighth Ave. at 19th Street, Sept. 19-Oct. 1, (212) 242-0800.  After this the company starts a North American tour, with dates including: Calgary, Alberta (Oct. 10); Billings, Mt. (Oct. 12); Helena, Mt. (Oct. 13); Spokane, Wash. (Oct. 14); Tacoma, Wash. (Oct. 15-16); Bellingham, Wash. (Oct. 17); San Diego (Oct. 19); Riverside, Calif. (Oct. 20); Los Angeles (Oct. 21); Tucson (Oct. 22-23); Moorhead, Minn. (Oct. 27); Minneapolis (Oct. 28); Indianapolis (Oct. 30); Des Moines, Iowa (Oct. 31); Dayton, Ohio (Nov. 2); Skokie, Ill. (Nov. 3), Springfield, Ill. (Nov. 4); Chicago (Nov. 5); Interlochen, Mich. (Nov. 6); East Lansing, Mich. (Nov. 9).  MUSIC  New York Philharmonic: Zubin Mehta opens the orchestra's 148th season tomorrow night with a benefit concert featuring soprano Jessye Norman, then returns Sept. 22 and 23 to lead a double bill of Mahler's Symphony No. 5 and Mozart's Symphony No. 40.  Later on the maestro presides over the world premieres of two works -- Roger Kellaway's "Songs of Ascent," for tuba and orchestra (Nov. 24, 25, 28); and "Steps," by the Philharmonic's composer-in-residence, David Del Tredici (March 810).  Among other highlights are Leonard Bernstein conducting an all-Copland program (Oct. 19, 20, 21, 24), and two weeks of performances (beginning Oct. 5) with Stuttgart's Gachinger Kantorei under the direction of Helmuth Rilling, including the U.S. premiere of "Messa per Rossini" (Oct. 12, 13, 14, 17).  Avery Fisher Hall, Lincoln Center. (212) 799-9595.  Carol Neblett gives a recital Oct. 1 featuring soprano arias from Korngold's "Die tote Stadt," Massenet's "Le Cid," Verdi's "I Masnadieri," and Bellini's "La Straniera"; songs by Scarlatti, Debussy, Brahms and Rachmaninoff; and a new song cycle written for Ms. Neblett by Thomas Pasatieri, who will accompany her at the piano.  Sherwood Auditorium, La Jolla Museum of Contemporary Art, La Jolla, Calif. (619) 232-7636.  3-D SYSTEMS Inc. said 2,857,143 special warrants sold last April in a private placement at $5.25 each had been exercised, boosting the company's common shares outstanding to 12,629,143.  The Valencia, Calif., concern develops, makes and markets equipment that produces plastic models from computerized data.  The U.S. sales unit of Mazda Motor Corp. said it estimates it will sell 316,000 cars in the U.S. in 1990 and garner a 3% share of the car market.  William Hackett, marketing vice president for Mazda Motor of America Inc., said Mazda expects industrywide car sales in the nation to reach 9.7 million next year.  Mazda expects to sell 288,000 cars this year.  Mr. Hackett announced the projections at a ceremony here to kick off U.S. production of Mazda's 626 compact sedan.  Mazda said 25%, or 60,000 units, of the plant's output here in 1990 will be its 626 models.  Mazda already builds its MX-6 sporty compact model and the Probe sporty compact for Ford Motor Co. at the plant.  According to Mazda, 60%, or 144,000, of the 240,000 cars it will build next year will be Ford Probes.  The remaining 36,000 units will be MX-6s.  Mazda, which began building cars at the plant two years ago, says the domestic content of its vehicles will reach 65% for the 1990 model year and is expected to reach between 70% and 75% by 1992.  Biogen Inc. said it signed a $20 million funding agreement with New York Life Insurance Co. that will expand Biogen's development and commercialization efforts for products based on the experimental AIDS drug, CD-4.  Upon introduction into the marketplace of products based on CD-4, New York Life would earn royalties on sales world-wide.  In addition, New York Life will receive warrants for 1.8 million shares of Biogen common stock, exercisable at $17 a share between July 1992 and December 1996.  This is New York Life's second funding agreement with a pharmaceutical company for research and development of products to treat acquired immune deficiency syndrome.  In May 1988, the insurance company reached an $8.5 million financing arrangement with IDEC Pharmaceuticals Corp., La Jolla, Calif.  In national over-the-counter trading, common of Biogen, a Cambridge, Mass., biotechnology company, fell 37.5 cents to close at $12.125 a share.  Next Inc., Stephen Jobs's closely held company, said it completed the first version of the operating-system software for its much-anticipated new computer.  The announcement, which had been expected, marks an important milestone for both Next and Mr. Jobs, who co-founded Apple Computer Inc. but quit in 1985 after a management power struggle.  Mr. Jobs had previously impressed many industry analysts with the advanced hardware dreamed up for Next, but the operating-system software had been delayed for months by bugs and other glitches.  Operating-system software controls a computer's basic functions.  Furthermore, Next plans to rely heavily on sales to universities.  Thus, analysts had considered it critical that the company complete the software and have the finished machine ready before the end of this month, when many students and faculty begin a new academic year.  Next's software has many of the same general features -- icons, pull-down menus, windows and desktop imagery -- that are credited with fueling the popularity of Apple's Macintosh computer, whose design Mr. Jobs oversaw in the early 1980s.  However, it is written in a variant of Unix, a computer language widely used by scientists and engineers.  Although Unix is more powerful than DOS, the standard language for personal-computer programs, it is more complex and doesn't yet offer many applications popular with users of personal computers, such as spreadsheets and databases.  Computer-guided buying programs vaulted stocks higher in the final hour of trading, but volume was the lightest in a week.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average gained 12.92 to 2687.50.  The benchmark average is now 64.59 points, or 2.3%, below its record closing high of 2752.09 set Sept. 1.  New York Stock Exchange volume of 136,940,000 was the lightest since last Monday.  It was sharply below the 234,870,000 shares traded Friday, but that total was inflated by the quarterly "triple witching hour" expiration of stock index futures, options on index futures and options on stocks.  Advancing issues ended ahead of decliners after trailing for most of the session, as 751 stocks closed higher, compared with 693 decliners.  Blasts of stock-index arbitrage buy programs -- in which traders buy the momentarily "cheaper" stocks and sell futures to lock in fleeting price differences -- hit the market at about 3:30 p.m. EDT and drove the industrial average to a double-digit gain.  Apart from the futures-related buying, the market was quiet for most of the session.  Several traders and analysts said investors were still cautious as a result of last week's volatility in the junk bond and foreign exchange markets.  The spectre of Campeau's problems "still hangs over the place," veteran trader Arthur Cashin said from the New York Stock Exchange trading floor.  "There is a general nervousness.  People are asking, 'Are we in the eye of the storm?  Or has it passed?'" Campeau stock has not traded on the over-the-counter market since last Wednesday.  Concern that a cash crisis at Campeau, the big Toronto-based retailer and a major junk-bond issuer, might spell an end to leveraged buy-outs sparked some selling in rumored takeover stocks.  Among those, Tambrands fell 1/4 to 69 1/2.  On Aug. 22, Tambrands rallied to about 75 on takeover rumors, trading at about double its average daily volume.  Ralston Purina, also recent grist for the rumor mill, fell 3/8 to 86 7/8.  In late August, the stock traded as high as 101 1/2.  Manufacturers Hanover rose 7/8 to 41 3/4.  Before trading was halted at 3:38 p.m., the stock traded 903,200 shares, more than three times its average daily volume.  The holding company for one of the largest U.S. banks announced plans for asset sales, stock issuance and a boost in loan loss reserves.  Manufacturers also said it reached a definitive agreement to sell a 60% interest in CIT Group to Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank of Japan for $1.28 billion.  The company also plans to place about 2.7 million newly issued shares with Dai-Ichi at $45 a share in a transaction valued at about $120 million.  Among other big bank stocks, J.P. Morgan jumped to the top of the active list on professional trading strategies aimed at capturing the company's dividend.  More than 7.4 million shares changed hands, and the stock gained 1/8 to 40 1/8.  Helping lift the industrial average, Procter & Gamble gained 2 1/2 to 121 1/2 and Boeing rose 5/8 to 57 1/8.  Boeing said it found a way to trap the sun's rays and convert them to electricity at a level of efficiency never before achieved, The Wall Street Journal reported.  Woolworth, another of the blue-chips, recovered most of the ground it lost Friday, gaining 2 to 65.  The stock was among those that fell last week as investors turned skeptical of takeover rumors when the junk bond market faltered.  Junk bonds provide the bulk of the financing in many acquisitions.  First Bank System lost 1 1/4 to 22 7/8 after announcing that it will take a charge of between $25 million and $40 million against third-quarter earnings to raise its loan-loss provision.  The bank also said it plans to lay off 15% to 20% of its staff and might cut back or eliminate some businesses.  Time Warner rose 5 3/8 to 132 7/8, and Warner Communications gained 1 1/8 to 64.  Interpublic Group rose 1 5/8 to 36 3/8 after one of its units was awarded the advertising account for Sterling Drug's Therapy Bayer aspirin.  Plains Petroleum fell 2 to 33 1/2.  On Friday, a federal appeals court threw out a 1986 natural-gas federal pricing regulation.  The reversal could require Plains Petroleum and others to refund millions of dollars to customers, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  Plains Petroleum officials weren't immediately available for comment.  First Pennsylvania gained 1 1/2 to 16 3/4 after it agreed to be acquired by CoreStates Financial for stock valued at $18.75 a share.  In agreeing to the takeover, First Pennsylvania is said to have passed up a $20.85-a-share bid from Meridian Bancorp.  Meridian gained 1 1/8 to 23 1/2 and CoreStates lost 2 1/8 to 47 1/2 in over-the-counter trading.  Di Giorgio rose 1 to 34 3/4.  DIG Acquisition, which has bid $32 a share for the company, demanded equal access to any information that Di Giorgio supplies to other parties interested in buying the company.  On Friday, Di Giorgio said it had received indications of interest from third parties whom it didn't identify.  UAL gained 1 3/4 to 281 1/2.  The stock has failed to approach the $300-a-share buy-out price agreed upon by its pilots union and chairman.  Investor Marvin Davis has said he is ready to step in with the same bid if the transaction falls through.  But the recent weakness in junk bond prices has cut investor confidence, traders said.  Birmingham Steel jumped 4 1/2 to 29 1/8.  The company agreed to be acquired in a merger with Harbert for $30 a share.  Wheeling-Pittsburgh lost 1 to 14 1/4.  The company's bankruptcy plan has been challenged by Oppenheimer & Co.  The American Stock Exchange Index went down 0.14 to 379.50.  Volume totaled 9,420,000 shares, compared with 14,240,000 Friday.  There were 237 issues advancing, 298 declining and 274 unchanged.  Graphic Technology rose 1 to 18 1/8 after agreeing to be acquired by Nitto Denko for $18.50 a share.  "After death human thought lives on by momentum," wrote Vladimir Nabokov in an early novel.  He certainly was correct about his own: A dozen years after his death at 78, new paperback editions of his works proliferate, and we are offered his 10th posthumous volume, "Vladimir Nabokov: Selected Letters, 1940-1977" (Harcourt Brace Jovanovich/Bruccoli Clark Layman, 582 pages, $29.95), edited by Dmitri Nabokov and Matthew J. Bruccoli.  In Nabokov's career the numbers count.  This new volume supplies more than 400 letters to put beside the eight novels written in English; the 10 in Russian; the four volumes of stories; the four books of translations of Russian literature; the two volumes of plays; the one of poems and chess problems; the autobiography; the "strong opinions" (a collection of "public prose": interviews, letters to editors and articles); the correspondence with Edmund Wilson; and the five critical books on works of English, French, German, Spanish and Russian literature.  The author of "Lolita," "Pale Fire" and "Speak, Memory" seems well positioned for a classic run.  Not that the man who so ostentatiously exulted in his literary prestidigitation and who so gleefully declared his hatred of Freud ("the Viennese Quack"), Henry James ("that pale porpoise") -- as well as Dostoevski, Faulkner, Eliot and Thomas Mann (the last two simply were "big fakes") -- will ever congeal into a safe classic.  He was much too eager to create "something very weird and dynamic," "catastrophic and jolly" like "this great and coily thing" "Lolita."  But in Nabokov's work nothing is simply as it seems.  Beauty and pity, the grotesque and the heartbreaking, freedom and tyranny, the aesthetic and the moral, time lost and time regained -- these themes run throughout his books despite disclaimers that he cared not a whit for the social, political or moral aspects of literature.  His notorious high Mandarin disdain was his protective coloration against political or moralistic predators.  Nabokov knew more than most about the bite of history, politics and moralism, about noble causes and the sense of loss.  By the time he arrived in New York in 1940 with his wife, his six-year-old son and the manuscript of his first English novel, he already had been thrice exiled -- in 1922 from the Russia of his childhood and adolescence; in 1937 from the Berlin where he had become a distinguished Russian novelist; and in May 1940 from the Paris where he had hoped to continue his literary career safe from the Nazis.  His father -- a liberal democrat jailed by the czar and booted by the Bolsheviks -- had been assassinated by Russian monarchists in Berlin in 1922, and a brother died in a German concentration camp some 20 years later.  No wonder Nabokov thought of art -- perfected memory -- as the one sure defense against time.  But at his best he avoided aesthetic megalomania.  In his masterpiece, "Lolita," he portrayed the evolution of lust into love and condemned the cruel perversion that -- trying to stop time in its tracks -- created pornography and death.  Despite his later evasions, Nabokov was "Conradically conservative" (to steal his pun) and did believe in the moral importance of art: "I never meant to deny the moral impact of art which is certainly inherent in every genuine work of art," he wrote a correspondent in 1945.  "What I do deny and am prepared to fight to the last drop of my ink is the deliberate moralizing which to me kills every vestige of art in a work however skillfully written. . . .  In my opinion, the fact that {Tolstoy's} 'The Kreutzer Sonata' and 'The Power of Darkness' were written with a deliberate moral purpose largely defeats their purpose, killing the inherent morality of uninhibited art."  These letters bring us a master's voice notably more human and humane than Nabokov's late public manner might suggest.  In them we see a little more of the man than the mask -- not that he ever permits himself to appear in verbal or social deshabille.  But in these letters his gift for friendship and his love for his family are as notable as his noble, if aristocratic dedication to the vocation of literature.  While scrambling for a teaching job and trying to gain a foothold in the American literary world, Nabokov worked as a part-time research fellow in lepidoptery in New York and at Harvard.  Within five years of his arrival he was teaching at Wellesley and had published three books, as well as stories, poems and reviews in the New Republic, the New Yorker and the Atlantic, to all of which the admirable, admiring and competitive Edmund Wilson had most generously provided access.  In 1948 he became a professor of Russian and European literature at Cornell for $5,500 a year.  By 1959, the once-scandalous, unpublishable "Lolita" had triumphed on "the golden trapeze of the best-seller list" and freed its author from all extra-literary drudgery.  He moved to Switzerland, supervised translations of his Russian works, produced an annotated English version of Pushkin's "Eugene Onegin," and continued to create new works in English until his death in 1977.  In all, these letters provide a laudable and attractive self-portrait that enlarges and -- in every sense -- domesticates our understanding of this great Russo-American writer who once so characteristically declared, "the difference between the comic side of things and their cosmic side depends upon one sibilant."  ---  Mr. Locke teaches English and comparative literature at Columbia University.  Exports, domestic sales and production by Japan's two largest car makers, Toyota Motor Corp. and Nissan Motor Co., grew from the year-earlier levels in August owing to brisk demand in Japan and overseas.  "Domestic demand is pretty strong because of this long economic expansion, and demand in other countries, especially in the U.S. and Europe, is also good," one Nissan official said.  Exports by Toyota, the country's largest auto maker, rose 5.4% to 127,676 units, marking the fourth-consecutive year-to-year gain.  Toyota officials said introduction of new models led to the stepped-up exports.  Exports to the U.S., the largest overseas market, rose 5.2% to 57,911 units, while those to the European Community increased 4.3% to 25,137 units.  Though the market is small, Australia showed a 40% surge, with shipments totaling 4,605 units.  Demand in Australia and New Zealand has been strong in recent months.  Toyota's overall exports to Oceania climbed 56% to 8,037 units.  Nissan's overall August exports came to 83,826 units, a 5.5% rise.  August was the fourth-consecutive month in which its exports registered a year-to-year rise.  Nissan's overseas shipments were also sustained by healthy demand in the U.S. and Europe.  Exports to the U.S. climbed 42% to 31,132 units, while those to Europe went up 22% to 33,156 units.  Toyota's domestic sales of cars, trucks and buses jumped 17% to 118,019 units in August, a record for the month exceeding the previous high of 107,166 units set in August 1973.  As a result of the gain, Toyota officials said, their company's share in the domestic market grew 0.5 percentage point from a year earlier to 28%.  Nissan's domestic sales rose 28% to 78,271, pushing its domestic market share 1.3 percentage point from a year ago to 25%.  Steady demand in Japan and overseas drove Toyota's production in August up 12% from the year-earlier level to 248,367 units.  This was the first time in two months that Toyota's production surpassed the year-earlier levels.  Nissan's August output was 171,185 units, up 20% from a year ago.  Car output set a record for the month of August, totaling 146,302 units, Nissan officials said.  The battle lines were drawn when Bolar Pharmaceutical Co. blasted Rep. John Dingell, in full-page newspaper ads, "for creating a climate of fear and distrust within the entire generic pharmaceutical industry."  Rep. Dingell, a Michigan Democrat, has been leading a House subcommittee probe of questionable practices by generic-drug companies.  As part of that inquiry, he prodded the Food and Drug Administration into investigating Bolar, based in Copiague, a tiny company by Wall Street standards but flagship of the public generic-drug companies.  The ads this month in the New York Times, USA Today and Newsday angered subcommittee members who saw Bolar's highly unusual tactic as an effort to cow congressional investigators.  But others familar with Bolar say the company acted out of frustration, concerned that its credibility was being unfairly assailed.  "We're caught in the middle of a big power play," asserts Robert Shulman, Bolar's co-founder, who contends the company has become a pawn in a political fight between Rep. Dingell and the FDA.  With his open shirt, jeans and jogging shoes, Mr. Shulman looks more like one of his pill-factory workers than president of the company.  While he has run in five New York and Boston marathons, 55-year-old Mr. Shulman now faces his biggest challenge: successfully defending the integrity of the company and its products.  Rep. Dingell has not only triggered the FDA's review of approvals granted, but surveillance of industry manufacturing practices.  Congressional investigators believe Bolar may have gained approval in 1987 of a big-selling generic version of the blood pressure drug called Dyazide by passing off the brand-name drug as its own, and pressed the FDA to investigate.  That was more than two months ago, and while the FDA inquiry drags on, Bolar's reputation has been deeply tarnished.  Moreover, the FDA is threatening to withdraw its approval of the company's generic version of Dyazide, a move that could cost Bolar as much as 40% of about $130 million in annual sales.  It could also lead to higher consumer costs, because Bolar's is the only inexpensive version of Dyazide, sold widely as a brand name product by SmithKline Beecham PLC. Hemant Shah, a Warren, N.J. drug analyst, charges that "Bolar's unfairly twisting in the wind. {FDA Commissioner Frank} Young is trying to deliver bodies to Dingell to save his job."  Still, he says Bolar's generic Dyazide sales haven't been significantly hurt.  A spokesman for Rep. Dingell declined to comment about Bolar.  "There isn't any point in commenting until the facts are known," he said.  "The only concern is that the facts be known."  The FDA has yet to rule on whether Bolar committed fraud in its approval application.  Generic-industry officials believe the ruling hasn't been made because of an internal FDA rift between officials who want to placate Rep. Dingell and others who believe Bolar did nothing wrong.  Meanwhile, Bolar's stock has plummeted, though it made a partial recovery in recent days in heavy trading, closing at $21.75 up $1.125, after gaining 75 cents on Friday.  One indication of the FDA dispute is the conflicting positions of agency officials.  While FDA director Young has said he wants to strip Bolar of its approval for generic Dyazide, one of the agency's top scientists, Dr. Carl Peck, has stated publicly that Bolar's generic blood-pressure medicine is safe and effective.  Bolar's Mr. Shulman contends that questions about generic Dyazide and the approval application for an anti-psychotic medicine were resolved to the FDA's satisfaction years ago.  "I see it as a fight between the FDA scientific types and Young," says William Haddad, vice chairman of Schein Pharmaceutical Inc., of Port Washington, N.Y., which receives 50% of the profits from sales of Bolar's generic Dyazide as part of a marketing arrangement.  Mr. Shulman says he doesn't intend to pull the blood-pressure medicine off the market.  The battle over the drug, he acknowledges, could drag out for a year or more.  During that time he predicts Bolar will prove Bolar's product is equivalent to the Dyazide manufactured by SmithKline, of Philadelphia.  "Eventually our Dyazide will be cleared," he says.  But an FDA official's testimony before the Dingell subcommittee last week severely damaged Bolar's credibility.  Paul Vogel, deputy compliance director, suggested that Bolar tried to pass off a Sandoz Phamaceuticals Co. anti-psychotic drug as its own in laboratory testing in 1982.  If Bolar was trying to be sneaky, it muffed the job.  The faint outline of the distinctive Sandoz logo can be seen on the pills originally submitted to the testing laboratory. (Bolar eventually resubmitted different pills and won FDA approval.) Mr. Shulman insists that the problem occured when Bolar tried to match the color of its pills with those of brand-name Sandoz's and mixed up the pills of Sandoz with Bolar's.  He says if Bolar really wanted to cheat, it could have completely removed the Sandoz logo from the brand name pills and recoated them without a logo.  "Nobody would try to wipe a logo off {a brand-name product}," Mr. Shulman said.  Nonetheless, he said Bolar plans an internal investigation into the incident.  Yet Mr. Shulman says that his lack of political savvy probably has damaged the company.  In retrospect, he says, the newspaper ads "may have been a mistake," because they raised the ire of congressional investigators.  Franklin Computer Corp., Mt. Holly, N.J., said it filed a lawsuit against Smith Corona Corp. and one of its distributors for patent and copyright infringement on an electronic spelling machine.  In a lawsuit filed Sept. 8 in a Camden, N.J., U.S. District Court, Franklin alleges that two models of Smith Corona's SpellRight machine violate Franklin's patent on an electronic spelling machine and copyrights on affiliated software.  Franklin also claims its New Canaan, Conn.-based rival is falsely advertising its spelling aids as "dictionaries" when no definitions are provided by the machines.  A spokesman for Smith Corona said the company hadn't seen the suit and couldn't comment on it.  The suit seeks damages estimated at more that $1 million, and an injunction against further infringement.  Franklin's machine, Spelling Ace, is the company's core product.  Junk bond prices continued to fall yesterday, but trading activity in the high-yield bond market slowed considerably.  Bond traders estimated that at least 90% of the issues in the junk bond market didn't trade at all, while most of the remaining bonds fell between 1/4 point and 1/2 point, or between $2.50 and $5 for each $1,000 face amount.  There were, however, a few exceptions.  "There's beginning to be some buying interest in the better quality names," said Robert Lupo, a managing director at Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  He said the junk bonds of Kroger Co., for example, rose yesterday by 1/4 point.  The high yield bonds of RJR Holdings Capital Corp. also rose, despite reports that the firm's efforts to sell its Del Monte unit to Citicorp Venture Capital have stalled.  RJR Holdings's 14.7% convertible pay-in-kind securities maturing in 2009 closed 1/4 point higher at 95 1/2 while the company's subordinated discount debentures, maturing in 2001, were quoted up one point to 50 1/4.  But the gains in those and other so-called "high-quality" junk issues were small compared with last week's sharp declines that pushed some issues as many as four points lower on the week.  Overall, junk prices tumbled about five points last week.  While the panic selling of last week is over, yesterday's slow trading is a sign that investors remained extremely nervous.  "Investors are taking a wait-and-see attitude," said Kingman Penniman, senior vice president at McCarthy, Crisanti & Maffei.  "They are asking, 'Is this the lull before the hurricane, or has the storm passed?'" Mr. Penniman said.  He said investors are especially concerned that individual investors will bail out of junk mutual funds, which, in turn, would force the funds to sell portions of their portfolio to meet redemptions.  Mutual funds are among the largest holders of junk, accounting for about a quarter of the market.  Large sales by the funds could push junk prices even lower.  Bargain hunters and so-called bottom fishers, investors who thrive on distressed or troubled securities, were scouring the junk market yesterday.  But traders say the bargain hunters couldn't find junk holders willing to accept the low-ball bids they received.  "There are people trying to buy, but at prices that aren't being offered," said Mr. Penniman.  News of financial woes at Campeau Corp., the Canadian real estate and retailing giant, jarred the junk bond market last week and sent some investors scurrying to the safe haven of Treasurys and government-backed securities.  But that didn't happen yesterday.  In the Treasury market, the benchmark 30-year government bond fell less than 1/8 point while municipal bonds, mortgage-backed securities and investment-grade corporate bonds were unchanged to as much as 3/8 point higher.  Meanwhile, the World Bank's innovative $1.5 billion premiere in the U.S. federal agency debt market, planned for today, is expected to meet with strong investor demand.  The World Bank, which makes loans to developing countries, is one of the world's largest debt issuers, with about $80 billion of outstanding borrowings denominated in a wide range of currencies.  Market talk is that the new bonds will yield .38 to .40 percentage point more than 10-year Treasury notes, said Richard Mohlere, director of agency trading at Salomon Brothers Inc.  At that spread, he said, there's excellent demand.  He added that the issue is already oversubscribed.  The 10-year bonds will be offered simultaneously in the U.S., Japan and Europe through an international, 14-member underwriting group led by Salomon and Deutsche Bank Capital Markets Ltd.  The World Bank has had characteristics of an agency borrower, including exemption from Securities and Exchange Commission registration and the direct support of the U.S. government.  Until now, though, it always has borrowed in the U.S. corporate market, where it was classified as a "Yankee," or non-U.S., borrower.  The World Bank has picked an "opportune time" for its first foray into the agency market, said one New York-based agency trader.  He said that the markets "have been jolted and roiled by the junk bond stuff" and that investors will be lured to the World Bank bonds because they see "a scarcity of high-rated credits around . . . and people are familiar with the name."  Treasury Securities  The falling value of the U.S. dollar pushed Treasury securities down about 1/8 point in quiet trading.  "The bottom line is the weaker dollar," said William Sullivan, director of money market research at Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. "That's the only major influence in today's {yesterday's} trading."  In part, the market is taking a breather after exhausting itself on Friday, he said.  On Friday, prices staged wild swings during a rumor-driven session after showing a mixed reaction to the heavy schedule of economic reports released that morning.  On the economic front, the Labor Department today will release the consumer price index and housing starts for August.  Economists surveyed by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report expect, on average, a 0.2% rise in the CPI and a 1.4% increase in housing starts.  The CPI, which measures inflation on the consumer level, should be slightly higher with the volatile food and energy sectors excluded, economists said.  The benchmark 30-year bond was quoted late at a price of 100 10/32 to yield 8.085% compared with Friday's closing price of 100 14/32 to yield 8.074%.  The latest 10-year bonds were quoted at a price of 99 9/32 to yield 8.086% compared with a price of 99 11/32 to yield 8.077% on Friday.  At the government's weekly Treasury bill auction, rates on the three-month and six-month bills were unchanged from last week's auction.  Here are details of yesterday's auction:  Rates are determined by the difference between the purchase price and face value.  Thus, higher bidding narrows the investor's return while lower bidding widens it.  The percentage rates are calculated on a 360-day year, while the coupon equivalent yield is based on a 365-day year.  @ 13-Week 26-Week  @ Applications ......... $25,080,215,000 $21,171,660,000  @ Accepted bids ........ $7,200,380,000 $7,200,660,000  @ Accepted at low price 82% 62%  @ Accepted noncompet'ly $860,615,000 $754,705,000  @ Average price (Rate) 98.069 (7.64%) 96.138 (7.64%)  @ High price (Rate) ..... 98.076 (7.61%) 96.158 (7.60%)  @ Low price (Rate) ...... 98.066 (7.65%) 96.117 (7.68%)  @ Coupon equivalent ..... 7.90% 8.06%  Both issues are dated Sept. 21.  The 13-week bills mature Dec. 21, 1989, and the 26-week bills mature March 22, 1990.  Corporate Issues  Investment-grade corporate bonds ended between 1/8 to 1/4 point lower.  Among new issues, Sears, Roebuck & Co. issued $200 million seven-year notes offered at par to yield 9%.  Foreign Bonds Most European government bonds rebounded Monday as the value of the U.S. dollar fell against major currencies.  But in Japan, bond prices ended weaker on talk that there will be a flood of selling later this week.  The end of this month marks the end of Japan's fiscal year, and participation has been curbed as accounts want to avoid risking losses that will show up in this period's results.  There is talk that Japan's city banks are going to start selling from their Japanese government bond holdings.  The banks are concerned that the Bank of Japan will raise the discount rate, according to a salesperson at a Japanese bank.  Japan's bellwether No. 111 4.6% bond due 1998 ended on brokers' screens at a price of 95.35, down 0.24.  The yield rose to 5.385%.  In West Germany, government bonds rebounded from morning lows to end as much as 0.25 point higher.  The upward move, after a week of falling prices, was led by professionals, primarily futures traders in London.  West Germany's 6 3/4% bond due June 1999 rose 0.25 point to 98.75 to yield 6.92% while the 6 3/4% notes due 1994 rose 0.125 point to 98.625 to yield 7.10%.  In Great Britain, government bonds ended moderately higher.  The Treasury's benchmark 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 rose 13/32 to 113 22/32 to yield 9.87% while the Treasury's 12% bond due 1995 was 5/32 higher at 104 25/32 to yield 10.77%.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  The Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. made an unusual $215 million sale of mortgage securities yesterday afternoon, using loans from its $14 billion portfolio.  The 30-year and 15-year securities were sold in special auctions through Freddie Mac's selling group of banks and securities dealers.  Freddie Mac typically buys mortgages from originators and resells them immediately as mortgage securities.  But some mortgages, which don't meet Freddie Mac's immediate pooling requirements, are held for sale at a later time.  Freddie Mac sold the $155 million of 30-year mortgage securities and $60 million of 15-year securities in addition to its regular daily auction of mortgage securities, which totaled $55 million yesterday.  The $155 million of 9 1/2% securities were sold at a price of 99 6/32.  The underlying mortgages apparently couldn't be sold immediately because their mortgage coupon rates were too high to be included in regular Freddie Mac pools.  Freddie Mac limits the mortgages included in any single pool to a range of one percentage point.  The 9 1/2% 30-year securities have an underlying weighted average coupon rate of nearly 11%.  Traders said Freddie Mac made similar mortgage sales from its portfolio last week.  Meanwhile, mortgage securities ended 1/32 to 3/32 lower, as they fared slightly worse than intermediate Treasury securities.  This reversed the pattern of last week, when mortgages advanced more than Treasurys did.  Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities for October delivery ended at 97 23/32, down 3/32; 9 1/2% securities at 99 25/32, down 3/32; and Freddie Mac 9% securities at 96 7/8, down 1/32.  Municipals  A supply crunch has pressured municipal bond prices gradually lower, with dollar bond issues now mostly 1/8 to 3/8 softer for the session.  With dealer shelves still well stocked after last week's pricing barrage, the market faces the task of absorbing more than $1 billion in new long-term debt over the next few days, including $894.5 million of bonds from the Dormitory Authority of the State of New York.  The structure of the huge two-part bond offering was still not firmly established by late afternoon, according to lead underwriter Lazard Freres & Co.  The issue may be tentatively priced today.  New Jersey Turnpike Authority 7.20% issue of 2018 was 1/8 point weaker on the bid side at 97 5/8 to 97 3/4, yielding 7.39% based upon the offering, which was .02 of a percentage point higher than it was Friday afternoon.  Triborough Bridge and Tunnel Authority, New York, 7 1/8% issue of 2019 was off 1/4 at 96 1/4 to 96 1/2.  Apple Computer Inc. said it named Ian W. Diery, who quit recently as executive vice president of troubled Wang Laboratories Inc., president of its Apple Pacific unit.  Mr. Diery was also named a senior vice president of the parent company.  He succeeds Delbert W. Yocam, a longtime Apple executive who has held many posts at Apple, including chief operating officer.  Mr. Yocam announced last year that he intended to leave Apple to pursue other interests.  Mr. Diery will head up Apple's operations in the markets of Australia, Canada, Japan, the Far East and Latin America.  He begins working at Apple Oct. 16; Mr. Yocam, 45 years old, intends to stay on until Nov. 27.  Mr. Diery, 39, resigned from Wang last month after the Lowell, Mass., concern reported a record $424.3 million net loss for the year ended June 30 and Wang President Frederick A. Wang was forced to resign by his father An Wang, the chairman and chief executive officer.  In his 11 years at Wang, Mr. Diery rose to become the most powerful executive outside the Wang family, but he was blamed by Frederick Wang and other Wang insiders for optimistic sales forecasts that led the company to maintain its huge and costly sales and administrative staffs in the face of declining sales.  Before his troubles at Wang, Mr. Diery, a bluff, dynamic Australian, had led Wang's highly successful European sales operations.  He was brought to the U.S. in 1986 and put in charge of U.S. sales.  His last position at Wang was executive vice president in charge of world-wide field operations.  First of a Series.  This marks the beginning of a wide-ranging series of stories exploring consumers' buying habits and their attitudes about the American marketplace.  The weekly series will be based on reporters' interviews with consumers, marketing consultants and other industry experts, as well as in-depth consumer surveys conducted by Peter D. Hart Research Associates and the Roper Organization.  The project is part of The Wall Street Journal's observance of its centennial year.}  Each year, the nation's marketers embark on ever more intricate anthropological quests to answer their perennial question: What do consumers really want?  To find out, companies stalk us in shopping malls and invade our homes.  They hire us for focus groups and grill us by telephone.  Each year, thousands of new products and tantalizing messages from Madison Avenue burst forth onto the consumer landscape.  So what do most Americans want?  Not all that much, it turns out.  If we landed an all-expenses-paid vacation in a sweepstakes, many of us would choose to stay at the Holiday Inn.  We still envision -- in our minds if not our garages -- the basic Chevy four-door sedan as the ideal car.  If we ever could manage to win a year's free supply of something, we would choose heartland Budweiser as our beer and middlebrow Baskin Robbins as our ice cream.  One of our most beloved home-entertainment appliances remains the no-frills color television, the same 21-inch box we could have bought in the '60s.  This, at least, is the snapshot that emerges from a Wall Street Journal survey of the aspirations and attitudes of more than 4,000 consumers from all walks of life.  The in-depth probe of the consumer psyche was conducted in two separate polls by the Roper Organization and by Peter D. Hart Research Associates Inc.  The studies reveal that, despite all the hype about Rolexes, BMWs and "Lifestyles of the Rich and Famous," most Americans have remarkably modest aspirations and down-to-earth dreams.  The prevailing levelheadedness suggests that the excess of the Reagan Gilded Age, if it ever was the consumer ideal, is passe.  The shop-till-you-drop types haven't disappeared.  But simplicity and homey comfort, not opulence, are the order of the day.  And there is evidence that Americans by and large are finding them -- at least in their private lives.  Indeed, the people polled by Mr. Hart express a surprising degree of satisfaction about their place on the planet.  Three-fourths of the 2,000 consumers surveyed say they've fulfilled most if not all of their material needs.  Financially, they're either comfortable or can manage to pay the bills each month, while saving a little or spending a little, too.  But if they're basically happy in their own back yards, when they enter the marketplace they turn into scolds.  The gripes of these prototypical purchasers probably sound much like yours.  Prices are up, but quality is down.  The middle class is squeezed by the soaring costs of home-buying and education.  Imports are supplanting U.S.-made goods. (These "bad news" headlines were the top picks of the consumers interviewed by Mr. Hart, when asked what the '80s were all about).  Their verdict on American service: It's lousy.  Shopping has become such a chore that more people actually hate taking a trip to the supermarket more than doing housework.  "I'm happier as a person than a purchaser," declares Peter Hanlon, a 32-year-old computer analyst in Spokane, Wash., and one of the consumers who took part in the Journal survey.  "I live in the best country on the face of the earth, so I guess I'll put up with high prices, mediocre quality and poor service."  Marketers beware.  The miffed mind-set is rampant.  Some feel shopped out after a grand fling with consumerism during the mid-'80s.  And others feel shut out as companies woo the silk-stocking set.  "There is clearly an aspirational group in America who are seduced by high-end products and high-end advertising, and these are the people that marketing power is being directed to," says Richard Winger, a partner at Boston Consulting Group.  "But the largest group are the go-along and get-along middle-of-the-roaders, and marketers today really aren't paying much attention to them."  Thus, only 5% of the people in Mr. Hart's part of the study think that American business is listening to them and striving to do its best.  Almost one-third think companies and executives are too greedy -- a view that's especially popular with white-collar professionals and executives earning $35,000 to $50,000 a year.  So what's a marketer to do?  How about lowering the stress levels of America's very stressed-out shoppers.  It emerges that one of their top pet peeves is waiting in long lines while other registers or windows stay closed.  The Journal research also suggests that many consumers seethe when they hear a recorded solicitation message.  And if you want to drive people crazy -- especially working women -- have your service or delivery people fail to show up when they say they will.  Joan Tinsman, a 52-year-old nurse in Topton, Pa., is still fuming at how a Kenmore washing machine repairman failed to show up at her house, even though the event occurred a decade ago.  Mrs. Tinsman, a respondent to the Journal survey, recalls: "He showed up a week late and said, 'Lady, maybe you'd better buy a new machine.' I thanked him for his knowledge -- and bought a Westinghouse."  Beyond such ABCs of service, people also crave anxiety-free products -- simple items without lots of fancy bells and whistles and complex instructions.  It's not just because souped-up gizmos cost more.  Consumers just don't want to squander their mental energy figuring out how something works.  Jay Ogilvy, a futurist and founder of Holen North America Inc. in New York, says consumers in the '80s are victims of "involuntary complexity": traffic jams, delayed airplane takeoffs, junk mail and all the other hassles of contemporary life.  "People are trying to escape from this involuntary complexity with voluntary simplicity in all aspects of their lives," he contends.  Such loathing of things complicated explains why almost 50% of the individuals interviewed by Mr. Hart say they don't feel confident about buying computer equipment.  "It might be even worse than the figures say," admits John Rossi, president of Blue Chip International Inc., which makes IBM-compatible computers.  "Generally, we talk in what, for most people, amounts to a foreign language.  The only problem is the computer industry doesn't know it."  Other intimidating buys: exercise equipment and stocks.  About half of the consumers polled by Roper confessed they wouldn't know how to go about buying 100 shares of a publicly traded stock.  And almost one-third of those earning more than $50,000 a year claimed ignorance, too.  Perhaps the most heartfelt plea comes from Ray Struthers, a telephone repairman in Los Angeles.  "American industry has really lost touch with the simple things that everyday Americans really need to use and buy," says this participant in the Journal study.  Mr. Struthers's simple requests?  Stores that stock both black and white floor tiles and a pair of work boots that fit his sizenine feet.  The shopper claims that Sears's decision to shift production of its DieHard work boots from the U.S. to South Korea has caused his present podiatric problems. (Sears says it made the switch offshore about four years ago with "no compromise" in quality.)  In the midst of so much frustration and inconvenience, it's easy to see why those polled were so grateful for technology's true achievements: TV remote-control devices, smoke alarms, microwave ovens and automatic bank teller machines.  But they tended to look askance at status symbols.  "People are constantly looking for improvement -- but realistic, moderate improvement, not a revolution in their lives," explains Burns Roper, chairman of the Roper Organization.  In part, that's because most Americans really aren't eager to outstrip the Joneses.  "Mainstream America doesn't wish for the things that impress New Yorkers living on the Upper East Side," says Margaret Marks, director of consumer planning at the Young & Rubicam ad agency.  "They wish for things that are valued by their friends and neighbors, and those things tend to be traditional brand names and products."  In its ads though, Madison Avenue is apt to forget that most folks aren't members of the leisure class -- proud owners of Chanel scarves, Cole Haan loafers, and couscous cookers.  Us magazine recently flaunted the attitude when it ran a (now-discontinued) ad campaign, which featured a photo of beer-bellied fatsos seated together in a trailer park.  The elitist slogan?  "Definitely not Us."  But given what turns out to be most of America's expectations and chosen life styles -- comfy not snazzy -- is Madison Avenue selling the wrong message?  "Advertising too often reflects the life styles of the creators rather than the consumers of the ads," says Al Ries, chairman of Trout & Ries, a marketing research firm.  "Much advertising goes over the heads of the average consumers because they say, 'That's not me' or 'I couldn't afford it.' Marketers are missing the mainstream of America by a mile."  Donald Belway, an employee at Iowa Beef in Amarillo, Texas, and a survey participant, believes that increasingly there's lots of choice in the marketplace, but few real options.  "Nowadays, all companies show you is commercials for expensive products," Mr. Belway laments.  "It seems like companies really care only about the swells who can afford that stuff."  Still, in our communication-cluttered society, ads may be more real in the minds of consumers than many products themselves.  Surprisingly, when asked what American business does best, people polled by Mr. Hart said advertising and promotion above all else -- homage that even a number of Madison Avenue executives were at a loss to explain.  Quality and durability were a weak second.  Good management and good prices came in dead last.  But here's some even more ominous news for corporate America: The world's premier consumer society is breeding a new generation of purchasers suffering from shopping fatigue.  Now, they're purging jammed closets in what Carol Colman, a partner and trend-spotter at Inferential Focus in New York, calls the "clear-it-out" phenomenon.  And people have begun to yearn not for new products but new experiences.  This trend showed up among the consumers interviewed by Mr. Hart when they were told to pretend they were competing for the grand prize on a game show just like "Let's Make a Deal."  Behind door one was a new stereo system with a compact disk player, new living room furniture, and a fine piece of jewelry.  Behind door two was a lifetime health-club membership, a Hawaiian vacation, and a year's worth of tickets to local events.  More than half voted for experience-oriented door two.  "It's not that we are spawning a nation of ascetics who will stop owning things like TVs and automobiles, but most people have taken care of those needs and are paying more attention to the satisfaction of other ones," says Mr. Ogilvy, the futurist whose specialty is telling companies what makes consumers tick.  "People who aren't stalking saber-toothed tigers want to compensate for the relative dullness of their modern lives with vivid experiences."  (See related story: "After the Beep: The Message Is Convenience Matters Most" -- WSJ Sept. 19, 1989)  ---  @ Peter Hart's Showcase of Shoppers  Madison Avenue, like Hollywood, loves to typecast.  In their struggle to understand consumers, many advertisers and market researchers study people's attitudes and values and segment them into little niches.  Then they invent catchy labels for these groups, names like the Insecures or the Strivers or the Master Consumers.  To some people, such pigeonholing is simplistic and gimmicky.  But to others, it's a useful way to analyze consumer groups and plot marketing strategies.  With the caveat that such typecasting is more art than science, here is pollster Peter Hart's dissection of the American shopper.  He came up with these seven types of shoppers by doing a cluster analysis of the data from his poll on consumer buying habits and attitudes.  Agreeable Shoppers (22%)  These get-along, go-along consumers are especially susceptible to advertising and are most likely to shop at discount stores.  -- Tend to be lower-middle income  -- While 68% are white, this group has the highest proportions of Hispanics and blacks  -- More likely than average to enjoy watching TV, shopping for groceries and doing household work  -- High brand loyalty for everything from TV sets to tuna fish  Practical Shoppers (21%)  These are smart shoppers who research their purchases and look for the best deal.  They would shop at a store that sells off-price, name-brand clothing.  -- Have the highest proportion of women and tend to be middle-income, younger and better educated than average  -- More inclined than other groups to view items like TV remote control devices, CD players and video cameras as modern frills  -- Three-quarters see the increased use of credit cards as a change for the worse -- but the same proportion sees automatic teller machines as a change for the better  -- Pay more attention than most to food labels  -- Tend to be the least brand-loyal of any group  Trendy Shoppers (16%) These impulse buyers love to shop and stay up with the latest fads.  Look for them at fashion boutiques.  -- Tend to be young, unmarried and politically liberal  -- Have little brand loyalty  -- Don't carefully watch the kinds of food they eat  -- Least likely group to say they have most everything they need in life  -- Only one in three believes America makes quality products, and less than three in 10 say American-made products satisfy consumers' tastes  Value Shoppers (13%)  Value Shoppes are cost-conscious but traditional, tending to believe the best products are those that have stood the test of time.  But they often don't have the money to buy the very best, and they shop at mid-priced department stores.  -- Middle income, and more likely to be homemakers and retirees  -- More likely than others to be "extremely satisfied" with the quality of their lives  -- More likely to view shopping as a chore  -- Care more about saving money than time, and rarely buy on impulse  Top-of-the-Line Shoppers (10%)  These buyers put a premium on a product's reputation for quality and believe they've earned the right to buy the best.  They're apt to shop at upscale department stores.  -- The highest median income and the oldest group  -- Tend to believe foreign goods are better than American ones  -- Fully half say they have most everything they need in life  -- Less likely than most to enjoy browsing or window shopping  -- Less inclined to want the latest gadgets  Safe Shoppers (9%)  Rather than research a purchase, Safe Shoppers look for familiar products that make them feel comfortable.  They're inclined to shop at the well-known mass merchandisers.  -- Most likely to be white and male  -- Most likely to feel they have the same values as their parents  -- Find shopping a chore  -- Less confident than any other gorup that they are savvy grocery shoppers, and pay little attention to nutritional labels on food  Status Shoppsers (5%)  Sometimes impractical in their buying habits; a day without a new gadget is a day without joy.  They love to buy designer labels. -- Youngest group, with highest percentage who have never been married  -- Most politically conservative group  -- Second-highest median income gorup  -- Most likely to own cordless phones, CD players and answering machines.  Items they would most like to own: computers, car phones, fax machines  -- Most likely group to spend an extra hour browsing or shopping, and most likely to buy on impulse  ShowBiz Pizza Time Inc., Irving, Texas, said it expects to post a third-quarter loss because of its decision to close up to 26 of 52 "Monterey House" restaurants operated by one of its subsidiaries.  The restaurant company anticipates the closings will result in an extraordinary charge of approximately $4.5 million before taxes, but also estimates gains of approximately $1 million from sale of the closed properties.  Richard M. Frank, chairman and chief executive officer, said the stores will be closed as soon as possible because they have been "an annual $500,000 cash drag on the company."  Restaurants targeted for closing are in Tulsa, Okla., Oklahoma City, Dallas and Houston.  The Monterey House restaurants account for about 15% of annual revenue at the company, which also operates 258 Showbiz Pizza Place and Chuck E. Cheese restaurants.  Until now, many troubled junk-bond issuers have been able to restructure bad debt -- rather than default on it.  But with the junk market in turmoil, analysts say they expect more defaults.  M.D.C. Holdings could be one of the first companies to test that thesis.  The Denver-based developer has been on the ropes because of depressed housing markets in Denver, Texas and Arizona.  Its 11 1/4% senior subordinated notes, underwritten by Drexel Burnham Lambert have fallen to about 35 cents on the dollar.  Its stock has plummeted to 2 5/8 from a 1988 high of 6 7/8.  But Brian E. Bogart, an analyst for McCarthy, Crisanti & Maffei, says the company's bonds, and probably its stock, are trading too high.  In a strongly worded report, Mr. Bogart says the probability that M.D.C. will default or exchange its bonds, of which $256 million are outstanding, "has risen to the highest level.  The company has experienced difficulty in renewing some of its revolving {bank} credit, and we expect the situation to worsen."  In an interview, Mr. Bogart asserts that with M.D.C.'s bonds trading at such distressed levels, the bondholders would be unlikely to swap them for new paper if such a restructuring were to be proposed.  "My feeling is: They will most likely end up in bankruptcy" proceedings, he says.  Spencer Browne, M.D.C.'s executive vice president and general counsel, disagrees.  "We've never missed a payment.  We closed seven divisions and we're still building homes," he says, adding that M.D.C. is "the only major survivor" among Denver's home builders.  Although banks have reduced M.D.C.'s credit lines, he argues that the now-smaller company doesn't need as much capital.  However, the company concedes that it has been selling homes and mortgages in its inventory, as well as other assets, to meet its expenses.  Mr. Bogart estimates that operating cash flow will cover only 81% of this year's interest bill.  Whether it lives or dies, M.D.C.'s plight speaks volumes about how junk issuers got in trouble.  Not only did its own business sour, but it took a $49.7 million write-down on investments last year -- largely from selling junk bonds issued by others.  What was M.D.C. doing with other people's junk?  In 1986 Drexel -- then in its heyday as a junk-bond marketer -- raised $506 million in M.D.C. senior subordinated notes.  Jeff Sussman, chief investment officer at Far West Savings & Loan, says, "their strategy was 'give me half a billion dollars and I'll go find places for it.' It was a big blind pool."  When various acquisition attempts failed, M.D.C. found itself overfunded and paying high interest.  Looking to earn as high a yield as it was paying, it invested $200 million in third-party junk.  Ray Garea, of Donaldson Lufkin & Jenrette, says "that was the name of the Drexel game of a few years ago."  Overfunding, he says, helped insure that buyers would be there for Drexel's next deal.  A Drexel spokesman says "M.D.C. raised funds so they could expand in home building, and they did.  They were also looking to expand into financial services.  When they could'nt find a suitable company they put money into high-yield bonds."  Mr. Browne says M.D.C. bought bonds from other underwriters as well as Drexel.  Curiously, M.D.C. has been helped by the fact that its own bonds fell faster than those it invested in.  Although it sold third-party junk bonds at a loss, it used the proceeds to buy back its own bonds at deeper discounts and booked a $55.3 million gain last year.  That move also reduced the company's interest charges.  But now, M.D.C.'s bank covenants prevent it from buying back more of its bonds.  Mr. Browne says "in retrospect, we should have {borrowed less}.  The company expanded very fast and used a lot of leverage."  About 42% of M.D.C's raw land and land under development is in Colorado, perhaps the worst U.S. real estate market.  It also has real estate in strong markets, such as California and Virginia.  Mr. Browne says M.D.C. is hoping to sell some of its California assets.  "That would worsen the long-term earnings outlook," Mr. Bogart says.  But M.D.C. may not have the luxury of thinking long-term.  James Spirrison, a trader at Rodman & Renshaw, says "it's a horse race whether they can turn the business around before they run out of cash."  Many of M.D.C.'s bank lines mature next year, but Mr. Browne predicts they will be renewed.  And MDC recently settled charges against it by the Securities and Exchange Commission relating to its accounting; the company didn't admit or deny any wrongdoing.  Mr. Browne boasts that the SEC "didn't take action against any official."  Now, he says, "We're trying to get our house in order."  But, he adds, the fact that the McCarthy report may be read by the company's creditors "doesn't help."  --- M.D.C. Holdings  (NYSE; Symbol: MDC)  Business: Home builder  Year ended Dec. 31, 1988:  Revenue: $840.6 million  Net loss: $5.3 million vs. loss $16.8 million  Second quarter, June 30, 1989:  Net loss: $5.3 million vs. loss $16.8 million  Average daily trading volume:  6,651 shares  Common shares outstanding: 15.9 million  NCNB Corp., Charlotte, N.C., said it plans to offer five million new shares of common, exclusively in the Japanese market, at $51 a share.  The bank holding company said the Nomura Securities Co. is the managing underwriter for the sale.  Proceeds from the stock sale, which will be used for general corporate purposes, are about $250 million.  NCNB previously made a public offering in Japan in mid-1987.  NCNB shares closed yesterday at $51.375, up 37.5 cents, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  PUBLISHING: Wolters-Kluwer N.V. acquired 70% of Lamy S.A., a French publisher of data bases offering legal information, for an undisclosed financial consideration.  The Netherlands' second-largest publishing group said it expects to acquire the remaining 30% of Paris-based Lamy soon.  The 70% stake was acquired from a group of seven family shareholders of Lamy, which employs 200 people.  WHO'S NEWS: Dow Jones & Co. said Geoffrey E. Meyer was named advertising sales director of its Barron's National Business and Financial Weekly, succeeding Walter Dietzer, who resigned.  For the past 12 years, Mr. Meyer, 45, has been manager of financial advertising at The Wall Street Journal, another Dow Jones publication. . . .   Polly Allen Mellen is stepping down as a fashion director of Vogue magazine, flagship of Conde Nast Publications Inc. Ms. Mellen, a fashion editor and director at Vogue for 25 years, said she is taking a part-time post at Vogue, special projects editor in fashion, as of Jan. 1.  She said she wanted more free time and denied industry reports that she had clashed with Vogue's editor in chief, Anna Wintour.  Ms. Wintour said Ms. Mellen was taking her new job "under great terms.  There is no problem."  Ms. Mellen is one of three Vogue fashion directors; her post won't be filled.  Burroughs-Wellcome Co., bowing to pressure from patients and their advocates, announced a 20% price cut in its antiviral drug AZT for acquired immune deficiency syndrome.  AIDS activists, who have been lobbying for a price cut for months, gave the move muted praise.  It is "a small step in the right direction," said one.  The price cut, which follows an earlier price reduction of 20% in Dec. 1987, effectively reduces AZT's retail price to $6,400 from $8,000 a year per patient.  But recent studies suggest that the drug may be effective at 40% or 50% of the original dose, which could further reduce the cost to patients to about $3,000.  In the end, it wasn't consumer pressure alone but anticipated growth in its market that brought the change.  AZT's market is expected to mushroom due to findings that the drug slows the onset of AIDS in people infected with the AIDS virus but not yet showing any symptoms of disease.  That suggests the drug will be useful to hundreds of thousands of infected people, in addition to the tens of thousands of patients with AIDS symptoms.  The company's stock surged 32% in mid-August when those findings were announced, and analysts have projected that a broadened market for the drug could boost AZT sales to $1 billion by 1992.  The company, based in Research Triangle Park, N.C., is a unit of Wellcome PLC of London.  "We're pleased to see the price lowered," said Mervyn Silverman, president of the American Foundation for AIDS Research.  "But to be fair and to put AZT within reach of most people with AIDS {and its related infection}, the price needs to be reduced much further."  Burroughs-Wellcome long resisted pressure and pleas for a price cut, citing the burden of ongoing research and doubts about AZT's useful product life.  But T.E. Haigler, Jr., president and chief executive officer, said yesterday, "The expected growth in patient population, coupled with recent production economies, will reduce somewhat our financial risk and will remove some of the uncertainties which existed when this drug was first introduced."  Mr. Haigler added that the company, in its calculations, also had to consider the health of the corporation and the value of the stock to shareholders.  Reactions to the price cut, while favorable, were heavily qualified, and hinted at continued public scrutiny of Wellcome.  "We know their market is expanding exponentially, so we feel a further reduction is warranted.  Their stock is rising, so we know their profit margins aren't in jeopardy.  But what is in jeopardy is the life and health of many people," said Timothy Sweeney, acting executive director of Gay Men's Health Crisis, a support group in New York.  "The company can do better," agreed Rep. Henry Waxman (D., Calif.), who held hearings on AZT's price when it was introduced in 1987.  "Wellcome's cost of production is clearly lower, and its market is clearly larger.  The Congress has the responsibility to ensure that this life-saving drug is available to everyone -- through federal insurance to the poor, and through a reasonable price to all."  So far, the U.S. government has loomed large as AZT's biggest single purchaser, with $320 million in subsidies to patients through its Medicaid program and federal grants for the purchase of AZT.  That cost is expected to increase as earlier treatment of the infected population begins, a program that could run as high as $5 billion to $10 billion in public and private outlays, according to an article in the current issue of the Journal of the American Medical Association.  Mr. Waxman, meeting with Wellcome executives yesterday in Washington, again pressed the company to disclose details of its development costs and threatened to reopen hearings into AZT's price -- notwithstanding yesterday's cut -- if he believes the company is reaping too high a rate of return.  Activists said they will continue to pursue their inquiries into Wellcome.  "It's a good start.  But we'll continue to look at a possible challenge of the company's patent," said David Barr, an attorney with the Lambda Legal Defense Fund, a New York public interest firm specializing in gay rights issues.  AZT, originally created in 1964 by Jerome Horwitz of the Michigan Cancer Foundation with federal grant funding, was developed in close collaboration with the National Cancer Institute, a unit of the National Institutes of Health.  Wellcome financed clinical trials and conducted tests of AZT's toxicology and pharmacology; that the company stood on so many shoulders in making the product further heated up the pricing debate.  The compound itself has been in the public domain for more than two decades, but Wellcome holds a so-called "use patent" for treating AIDS.  In addition, the company has claimed broad title to AZT's use in infections by other "retroviruses," a class of viruses encompassing AIDS which are linked by their habit of transmitting genetic information in a backwards flow from RNA to DNA.  But AZT's potential use in retroviruses was first published by West German researchers in 1974, a quirk of AZT's history likely to be exploited in any assault on Wellcome's patent.  The controversy over AZT's price prompted government lawyers to consider a range of potential remedies, from price controls to government manufacture of AZT, and sparked re-examination of an old statute enabling the U.S. to invite patent infringement when federal procurement of a strategic product was threatened by activities of a single supplier.  The uproar also inspired a "reasonable price" clause that now is inserted into all technology licensing agreements between the government and companies.  Ultimately, many experts believe moderation of AIDS-drug prices will be brought about by competition between many drugs and pharmaceutical companies.  Real market competition is still months away, however.  One of the earliest sources of such competition may be DDI, a related compound patented by the cancer institute and licensed to Bristol-Myers Co. DDI has passed safety tests and now is entering tests of effectiveness needed for market approval.  But the company already has pledged to distribute DDI to patients in critical need even as such tests proceed.  The Food and Drug Administration is expected to approve such a giveaway shortly, by designating DDI a "treatment I.N.D.," or investigational new drug, some time this week.  "I really think the answer from everybody's point of view is going to be having lots of effective agents in the hands of lots of competing companies," said Samuel Broder, director of the National Cancer Institute.  "Until then, we never will have a solution satisfactory to everybody.  You run a better race when you have a competitor."  Spicer & Oppenheim, the 14th-biggest U.S. accounting firm, which recently has been under financial pressure, said it lost its biggest public-audit client, Bear Stearns Cos.  William Montgoris, senior vice president, finance, of Bear Stearns, the holding company for Bear, Stearns & Co., a large securities concern, said next year's annual audit would be done by Deloitte & Touche, the fifth-biggest accounting firm.  Deloitte & Touche was formed recently by the merger of Deloitte, Haskins & Sells and Touche Ross & Co.  "This was a very difficult decision because of our long association with Spicer," Mr. Montgoris said.  "But because of our development of many new products, including real-estate-asset securitization in London, we need a larger auditor to handle our global requirements."  Spicer had been Bear Stearns's auditor since 1944.  Steven D. Oppenheim, chief executive partner of Spicer, said he isn't happy about losing Bear Stearns but believes his firm is getting a lot of new business in bankruptcy and litigation-support work to make up for the loss.  "Also, we're going to continue to do a substantial amount of other consulting and special projects for Bear Stearns," he said.  While neither Spicer nor Bear Stearns would disclose the annual fee for the Bear Stearns audit, other auditors estimate it at about $500,000.  Mr. Oppenheim said that with mega-mergers of major accounting firms increasing, "there is going to be vicious competition from the big, new firms to take away the larger audit clients of smaller CPA firms such as us, while we may gain some middle-market work from the merged firms."  He estimated that Spicer's revenue for the fiscal six months ending this month will rise more than 10% from a year earlier.  In fiscal 1989, ended March 31, Spicer's revenue rose only 7%, to more than $70 million, from fiscal 1988, when revenue rose 11%.  Spicer recently cut 10% of its 1,000-member staff at nine U.S. offices.  Mr. Oppenheim said the firm is now seeking to boost its professional staff by 5% to handle new business.  As to a report that Spicer is in preliminary merger talks with Laventhol & Horwath, the seventh-biggest accounting firm, Mr. Oppenheim said "a great number of {accounting} firms want to talk to us" about merger.  He declined to comment further.  The Options Clearing Corp. named Paul Stevens, executive vice president of the American Stock Exchange, president and chief operating officer of the stock options clearinghouse.  Mr. Stevens succeeds Fred Casey, who retired from the OCC in June.  Mr. Stevens, who was an OCC board member for nearly six years, said he "couldn't pass up" an opportunity to be the operating officer at OCC, which is jointly owned by the five U.S. exchanges that trade stock options.  Mr. Stevens, 44, was among the architects of the American Stock Exchange's move into stock options in the mid-1970s.  Since last April, he has been in charge of equity order flow analysis at the Amex.  Jules Winters, Amex senior vice president for market operations, is likely to be appointed to succeed Mr. Stevens next month, according to an Amex official who requested anonymity.  RJR Nabisco Inc.'s sale of its Del Monte canned foods business to Citicorp Venture Capital is being revamped to comply with federal limits on banks' ownership of non-financial companies, according to people familiar with the transaction.  The change is being made as a result of concerns expressed by the staff of the Federal Reserve Board, which applies the provisions of federal banking laws to proposed individual transactions, the same people said.  The Citicorp unit was expected to purchase the Del Monte business for about $1.48 billion in a leveraged buy-out as part of RJR's sale of Del Monte's fresh-fruit and processed-foods divisions.  If it occurs, the sale will pare down RJR's debt after its record $25 billion LBO earlier this year by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co.  Instead, Citicorp's equity interest in the purchase is being reduced, and another financial buyer, possibly another leveraged buy-out fund, is likely to step in to help make the purchase, according to one person familiar with the sale.  One participant said Citicorp's equity percentage may be reduced to around 25% from a higher level that hasn't been disclosed.  The identity of the additional equity investors couldn't be learned.  Citicorp is being advised by Merrill Lynch & Co., which could supply funds to assist in completing the transaction.  Although some people involved in the transaction were hopeful that RJR would receive the same price tag for the business, at least one said the price might have to be reduced as a result of the change.  There also remained a chance that RJR might yank the property off the auction block and postpone any sale.  Some people involved said the Fed staff vetoed the proposed sale as part of an informal procedure in which transactions are submitted, informally and unofficially, for inspection by the Fed staff.  These people said the veto may signal a tougher attitude by the Fed staff members toward bank equity investments in leveraged buy-outs.  "I think they finally just took a different stance," said one person familiar with the sale talks.  "I think they let the banks do a lot for a long time and finally said no."  Banks, which usually supply more than half of the debt for most LBOs, haven't generally been big equity investors in them.  Federal bank law bars commercial banks regulated by the Federal Reserve from owning more than 5% of a non-financial company.  Banks can own nearly 25% in non-voting stock.  And they can own nearly 50% of a small business.  One person said the Fed may be tightening the rules for small-business exemptions.  A spokesman for the Fed wouldn't confirm its intervention in the transaction, and said there has been "no change" in the Fed's orientation to banks' participation as equity investors in LBOs.  Nevertheless, tougher interpretation of existing bank laws wouldn't be implausible in light of the current turmoil in the junk-bond market.  Prices of such high-interest, high-risk bonds, which help finance LBOs, have tumbled in the past week as a result of financial woes at Campeau Corp., a Canadian retailer choking on debt.  A spokesman for RJR said: "We've had a few complications, but that's normal for a complex transaction.  As each complication comes up, we work it out.  The deal is still under discussion and we think it's going to get done."  A Citicorp spokeswoman said she could confirm the RJR statement but couldn't elaborate.  Depending on how it is worked out, the snag in the transaction could tarnish the outcome of asset sales that RJR is making to try to pay down some of the debt incurred in the buy-out.  RJR received a higher-than-expected price for five European food businesses this summer; but the Del Monte sale is coming in under earlier optimistic hopes for proceeds of $3 billion or more.  During a lengthy auction, bidders for the Del Monte business were first asked for bids for the entire company, and then later were asked for bids for the two major pieces.  Two weeks ago, RJR announced the sale of Del Monte's fresh-fruit business for $875 million to Polly Peck International PLC.  The proposed canned-foods price tag would mean RJR would obtain $2.35 billion for the Del Monte businesses.  Anything less in the canned-foods sale would increase the amount by which the sale fell short of earlier hopes.  However, the canned-foods sale won't include the Canadian and Latin American businesses, leaving open the chance that RJR might yet come closer to its target with further asset sales.  R.H. Macy & Co. said in a letter to its investors that pretax earnings before interest and depreciation were $925 million on sales of about $7 billion in fiscal 1989, which ended July 29.  The New York-based retail company, which went private in a leveraged buy-out in July 1986, said in the letter yesterday: "In light of the well-publicized difficulties experienced by the Hooker and Campeau corporations and the resultant general market reactions, we felt it important to reiterate for you the strengths of our company so that you are informed and as comfortable as we are about our financial condition."  Macy said pretax earnings in fiscal 1988 were $833.6 million on sales of $6.6 billion.  Those results are pro-forma and include Bullock's and I. Magnin, which Macy acquired in May 1988.  Same-store sales in fiscal 1989 rose 7.2% from a year earlier, the retailer added.  The letter was signed by Edward S. Finkelstein, Macy chairman and chief executive officer, and Mark S. Handler, president and chief operating officer.  Macy said it will file its financial report for the fiscal year with the Securities and Exchange Commission in mid-October.  Macy also said it has completed its previously announced offering of $200 million of 8.9% credit-card backed notes as part of a $400 million transaction that also will include $200 million of commercial paper.  The transaction, Macy said, "reduces the cost of financing our accounts receivables," with a savings of about $9 million in fiscal 1990 and "as much as $20 million in future years."  The last of three settlements in one of the nation's largest tax-shelter scams is expected to be approved by a federal court in Brooklyn early next week.  The total of the settlements -- $16.9 million -- will be the biggest civil settlement of a tax-shelter case, tax lawyers said.  At least 5,000 investors will recoup a portion of more than $45 million in losses from three fraudulent shelters sold in 1982 and 1983.  The wide-ranging scam, which involved promoters, lawyers, engineers, and accountants in a dozen states, was based on investments in the "Energy Control System," an electronic switch which could monitor and conserve electricity for businesses.  In several civil suits, consolidated in the Eastern District of New York, investors claimed that OEC Leasing Corp. and First Energy Leasing Corp. both of Long Island, N.Y., the two principal promoters, and 34 other defendants violated federal securities and racketeering laws in a series of sham sales of the device.  The promoters marketed the investment as a tax-shelter security.  The investors alleged that OEC and First Energy inflated the value of several models of the electronic switch by asserting they were worth between $65,000 and $280,000.  Plaintiffs' lawyers put the value in the range of $500 to $3,000.  The promoters allegedly exaggerated the available investment tax credits and depreciation deductions.  In addition to tax benefits, the investors alleged they were led to believe they would reap huge profits through a revenue-sharing arrangement with the users of the switch.  Edward Labaton, a lawyer for the investors, said that although many of the devices were manufactured, very few, if any, were installed.  Mr. Labaton, of the New York law firm Goodkind, Wechsler, Labaton & Rudoff, said one reason the promoters were successful was that "energy had sex appeal" in the early 1980s.  "The opinions of experts were the real key to the sales," said Mr. Labaton.  The experts, including lawyers, engineers, and accountants, "simply did a reckless job.  They didn't look far enough," he said.  One of the experts, Touche, Ross & Co. settled for $2 million, said Mr. Labaton.  The accounting firm has since merged with Deloitte, Haskins & Sells.  Another accounting firm, Stuart Becker & Co., settled for $2.3 million; the engineering firm of Day & Zimmerman, of Philadelphia, for $3.8 million; and two law firms, Spierer Woodward & Holguin and Bernstein, Bernstein, Stein & Rush settled for $4.9 million and $1.7 million respectively.  A Philadelphia grand jury indicted 12 individuals connected with the scam in April 1988.  Seven pleaded guilty.  Of the five who went to trial in last November, two were acquitted.  The three others, including the former general manager of OEC, Salvatore Giuffrida, were sentenced to prison terms earlier this year.  Five law firms have been working together on the civil cases for nearly five years.  Mr. Labaton's co-lead counsel is Fay Clayton of the Chicago law firm, Kahn, Robinson, Curley & Clayton.  ---  PRESIDENT OF COMPANY that violated OSHA standards will serve time.  In the 18 years that the U.S. Department of Justice has been prosecuting employers for risking the lives of their employees, no company official has ever been sentenced to serve time -- until last week.  The 35-year-old president of a plumbing and heating company in Avon, S.D., was sentenced to six-months imprisonment because of a construction accident that killed two men.  All but 45 days of the sentence was suspended.  Howard Elliot, president of Elliot Plumbing & Heating, earlier pleaded guilty to deliberately failing to comply with Occupational Safety and Health Administration standards for digging trenches.  His attorney, Dennis Duncan of Parker, S.D., said Mr. Elliot will serve the time either in jail or a halfway house.  Two of Mr. Elliot's employees died and a third was injured in May 1988 when the trench they were working in collapsed for the second time in four days.  OSHA and the Justice Department have been criticized for being lax in pursuing criminal penalties against reckless employers.  Since its inception in 1971, OSHA has referred 54 workplace accident cases for criminal prosecution.  The Justice Department has prosecuted 17 and has won civil and criminal sanctions in 13.  ---  DALLAS LAWYER will run for governor of Texas.  Thomas Luce III, longtime counsel to billionaire H. Ross Perot, will kick off his campaign for governor.  Mr. Luce, a founding partner of the 150-lawyer Dallas firm of Hughes & Luce, will join three other candidates for the Republican nomination.  Mr. Luce spent most of the past year lobbying to secure funding for the supercolliding superconductor research facility to be built south of Dallas.  Last year, he was embroiled in litigation between Mr. Perot and General Motors Corp. over the terms of GM's 1986 buy-out of Electronic Data Systems Corp., the data-processing firm founded by Mr. Perot.  Mr. Perot says he doesn't have a role in his lawyer's gubernatorial campaign.  "When Mr. Luce becomes governor, I will certainly miss him as an able attorney," he says.  ---  TWO FORMER OFFICIALS OF FIRST MARYLAND SAVINGS & LOAN INC. were sentenced to prison Friday in connection with the thrift's failure in 1985.  Former President Julian M. Seidel, 53, was sentenced to 12 years behind bars and former Senior Vice President James R. Porter, 41, was sentenced to seven years.  Both were convicted in federal court in Baltimore in June of multiple counts of conspiracy and mail- and wire-fraud related to insider loans, false reports to regulators and false statements to the public.  First Maryland collapsed in August 1985 owing about 2,700 depositors more than $118 million.  ---  GERMAN LAW FIRM ENTERS N.Y. MARKET: One of the largest law firms in West Germany, Mueller Weitzel Weisner, plans to open an office in New York next year.  Two other German firms have New York offices.  Mueller Weitzel is one of Germany's fastest-growing firms.  In January, it will merge with Hengeler Kurth Wirtz of Dusseldorf in what will be one of the first major law firm mergers in Germany.  The combined firm will have about 50 lawyers.  Next month Mueller Weitzel, known for its international corporate work, will open a branch in Brussels.  ---  MYERSON & KUHN RECRUITS REAL-ESTATE PARTNER: Robert W. Claeson, 49, a partner at the New York law firm of Shea & Gould, will join Myerson & Kuhn, also of New York.  Mr. Claeson, who has been at Shea & Gould since 1972, will head Myerson & Kuhn's real-estate practice.  A group of 20 real-estate lawyers led by David Stadtmauer and Michael Bailkin left Myerson & Kuhn earlier this year.  Cocoa futures prices plunged to a 14-year low following the failure of the International Cocoa Organization (ICCO) to agree on price-supporting measures at a weeklong London meeting.  Reports that a deal involving 500,000 tons of Ivory Coast cocoa and a major New York trade house had fallen through also spurred selling of contracts, analysts said, but confirmation wasn't available.  The December delivery ended with a loss of $67 a ton, at $1,035, after trading as low as $1,031.  All contracts traded at new life-of-contract lows.  Yesterday's prices were the lowest since May 1975, one analyst said.  The ICCO meeting, which began Sept. 11, was extended until early Saturday, when members weren't able to agree on price-supporting measures.  "The major stumbling block proved to be that there wasn't any money forthcoming from producing member countries to pay the estimated $120 million they owe the organization from export levies," said Arthur Stevenson, analyst for Prudential-Bache Securities, New York.  Thus, Mr. Stevenson said, "the organization lacked the funding to reinstate price-supporting measures."  The ICCO has a procedure by which the "buffer stock" manager buys cocoa beans when the market price falls below certain levels.  In meetings earlier this year, various proposals to support prices were rejected by ICCO members.  Efforts to lower the intervention price at which the buffer stock manager can buy cocoa were rejected as well.  The buffer stock is at its 250,000-ton limit, and the manager, without a mandate or money, is unable to buy more cocoa.  According to one news report, there was a proposal at last week's meeting that would have enabled the buffer stock manager to buy an additional 120,000 tons, but the plan was rejected.  The proposal would have cut both import and export levies and would have brought in an estimated $30 million to finance the purchases, the report said.  The cocoa market has been and is expected to continue to be under the pressure of surpluses.  Prudential-Bache's Mr. Stevenson said the excess from the 1989-90 season, which begins Oct. 1, may be as much as 150,000 tons, the sixth consecutive year of surpluses.  One London trading firm estimated the cumulative surplus as of Sept. 30, the end of the current season, at 1.06 million tons.  With such surpluses, said Bernard Savaiko, an analyst at PaineWebber Inc., if it is true that the deal between the Ivory Coast and the New York trade firm has actually broken down, "that 500,000 tons of unsold cocoa beans would create a great weight on the market."  Mr. Savaiko also noted that more efficient cocoa producers, such as Malaysia, "which isn't a member of the ICCO and apparently hasn't any intention of joining, are making hefty profits even at current low prices.  They're flooding the market with cocoa and are expected to expand production even more in the next few years.  It's a time bomb hanging over the market."  In other commodity markets yesterday:  SUGAR: Prices rose on concern over possible danger of Hurricane Hugo to Caribbean sugar-producing areas.  The October contract advanced 0.39 cent a pound to 14.36 cents.  According to one analyst, "This was a knee-jerk reaction.  The hurricane has passed Puerto Rico and at least one weather report says it will pass about 500 miles from Cuba.  If it does, instead of causing damage, it will provide some much-needed moisture for the crop on that island."  However, the weather concern did prop up prices and enabled the London market to close firm, as well, another analyst said.  He added that increased buying interest for sugar in the world market might also have contributed to a stronger tone in futures.  India, which has failed to buy three times recently, is expected back in again this week, as are Egypt, North Yemen and Syria, the analyst said.  GRAINS and SOYBEANS: Futures prices fell because of a lack of demand from exporters and warm, dry weather across much of the Midwest, analysts said.  Corn futures for December delivery on the Chicago Board of Trade dropped 2.5 cents to settle at $2.28 a bushel.  Traders attributed part of the decline to comments made last week by a Soviet Union official indicating that Soviet grain imports may not pick up for several weeks.  Wheat futures for December delivery fell five cents to end at $3.9125 a bushel.  Fair weather depressed soybean futures prices by nearly eliminating the fear that an early frost might reduce the soybean harvest by freezing soybean plants before the beans were fully developed, said Mickey Luth, a futures analyst with Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. in Chicago.  Farmers in certain areas have just begun harvesting soybeans in portions of the Farm Belt during the past week.  On average, about 20% of the soybean crop is harvested by the first week in October.  Soybean futures for November delivery settled eight cents a bushel lower at $5.685 a bushel.  COPPER: Futures prices rose as labor talks at a major producer broke down.  The December contract ended with a gain of 0.95 cent a pound to $1.2770.  Traders ignored an increase in London Metal Exchange warehouse stocks last week of 9,525 tons to 92,700 tons, the highest level since early April, an analyst said.  One reason, he said, was that it had been expected that a shipment of Zambian copper would be put into LME warehouses.  Labor negotiations at the Highland Valley Mines in British Columbia were broken off over the weekend, William O'Neill, vice president of research for Elders Futures, New York, said.  "Apparently the key issue was the contracting out of work," Mr. O'Neill said.  The analyst said that Poul Hansen, president of mining company, was quoted in news reports as saying, "I have no idea when negotiations will resume" in the bitter contract talks.  The news reports also quoted Mr. Hansen as saying: "It was obvious at the negotiating table there was no reason to go on."  Mr. O'Neill observed: "General expectations had been that the strike would be settled by the end of September.  It doesn't now look like it will."  ENERGY: Petroleum futures were mixed.  Crude oil was generally lower.  But gasoline posted gains after hurricane Hugo forced the closings of at least two refineries, one in the Virgin Islands and the other in Puerto Rico.  West Texas Intermediate crude for October delivery was down eight cents a barrel to $19.88 on the New York Mercantile Exchange.  Unleaded gasoline for October delivery was up 0.52 cent a gallon to finish at 58.13 cents.  Except for the hurricane, there was little news to affect the oil markets.  But there were reports that Hisham Nazer, the influential oil minister of Saudi Arabia, is recuperating from recent surgery and isn't expected to be at the meeting of the ministerial monitoring committee of the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries, which begins Saturday in Geneva.  "In his absence, it will be unlikely anything substantial will come out of this meeting," said Shahrokh Nikkhah a Prudential-Bache senior vice president.  It sounds incredible, even for a boondoggler like Uncle Sam.  But a Customs Service program run by Northrop Corp. to auction off property confiscated from scofflaws is losing money.  No one seems certain exactly how much because, government auditors say, Customs' books are a mess.  House aides believe the program has fallen some $8 million in the hole since Northrop took it over in 1985.  Senate staffers put the loss at $10 million.  "There have been real problems with how Customs has managed this contract from the very beginning," says Sen. Carl Levin, a Michigan Democrat.  "Now we're seeing some of the unfortunate results."  The Justice Department, as reported, is investigating the matter.  Affidavits filed in U.S. District Court in Oklahoma allege that Northrop has been making "fraudulent claims" to the government and "deliberately billing" it for storage of items that have been out of the company's hands for up to three months.  Northrop and Customs officials won't comment on the criminal inquiry.  But they say the program's critics fail to consider that even worthless goods must be stored while a suspect's case slogs through the legal system.  They also say balance-sheet estimates by Congress don't take into account property that the government decides not to sell off, but instead distributes to various agencies for their own use.  If credited for those transfers, they argue, the program would be in the black.  "We've done a very outstanding job," insists Roy P. Hooks, the Northrop executive who runs the program.  "We're providing an outstanding service to Customs and a benefit to the taxpayers."  But Customs agents in the field tell a different story.  Documents unearthed by Sen. Levin's staff and made available to this newspaper suggest Northrop is mismanaging things, and that monitoring by Customs is deficient.  "The administration of the Northrop contract may be leaving the Customs Service vulnerable to a charge of waste, fraud or abuse," warns a June 1988 memo from Customs' Southwest region office to Washington headquarters.  The June memo says Northrop charged $25,516 for 16 days storage of 503 pieces of loose pipe.  When regional Customs officials, checking up on the company, solicited a comparative bid from a local pipe yard that serves as a bonded Customs warehouse, they found "an identical shipment with the same amount of sorting work would cost $4,300 for one month's storage, including all in/out handling charges," according to the memo.  Mr. Hooks says Northrop's tally was justified because Customs ordered the pipes sorted, stacked and transported in unusually quick fashion.  He also says the company was unable to find a lower-cost alternative.  Still, a Customs spokesman says of the incident: "There is a problem there.  Thank God things like that don't happen very often."  But they apparently do, if the memos obtained by Sen. Levin's office are any indication.  While examples in the documents generally don't involve big dollar amounts, critics of the program say they illustrate a pattern of questionable transactions.  Specifically, the memos allege that Northrop has raised program costs by getting outside appraisals on jewelry when in-house Customs personnel could have done the job; by needlessly shuffling items from one district to another for auction; and by failing to get rid of merchandise in a timely fashion.  Mr. Hooks disputes the allegations.  In the case of outside appraisers, he says, they are brought in because Customs personnel aren't always equipped to handle specialized work; the government, he adds, caps the amount that can be spent on that part of the project.  He also says goods are moved to a common selling point to "get a competitive crowd and maximize revenues."  He denies that Northrop fails to dispose of items quickly, though he says the bookkeeping on that can be "skewed" because some bidders fail to claim their merchandise.  "I have to sell some items three times," he says.  Nonetheless, some lawmakers argue that there is a built-in incentive for Northrop to run up costs, all of which are covered by the government.  Though up to 80% of the company's fee is based on performance -- Customs consistently has rated it "very good" -- the basic fee structure that's negotiated at the outset of the fiscal year is linked to anticipated program expenses.  Thus, the more costs soar, the higher the next year's base fee is likely to be.  "The contract is so loosely drawn, it's riddled with opportunity for fraud," charges Rep. E. Clay Shaw, a Florida Republican.  The Customs spokesman contends that "the government is not out to make money" on the program, which he says is designed to free agents from "custodial duties" so they can concentrate on law enforcement.  But Rep. Shaw counters, "We seize hundreds of millions of dollars worth of assets, and then we throw it all away.  We envisioned the whole process as potential profit."  Actually, most of the seized items aren't auctioned off at all; almost three-quarters are remitted, usually as part of a settlement in which the original owner pays Customs its costs -- and often a penalty on top of that.  "Customs should be in the black no matter how you cut it," Sen. Levin's aide says.  Part of the problem may be the way the government calculates costs.  Northrop, for instance, sold for $100 some jewelry that had been seized in El Paso, Texas.  Customs put the cost of the sale at $819.  But Northrop says $774 of that amount stems from a government formula to recoup overhead expenses.  "Even if Northrop did nothing wrong, there's still obviously a problem here," says the aide to Sen. Levin.  Los Angeles-based Northrop was brought aboard to make the seized-property program run smoother after a 1983 report by the General Accounting Office, Congress's investigative arm, blasted Customs' management of the program and recommended hiring a private contractor.  Northrop won the accord because its sophisticated computer system could track Customs' nationwide inventories.  Now, House and Senate committees are abuzz that it might be a shoo-in to win an extension of the pact, which recently was put out for bid.  But Northrop says it isn't even planning to go after the contract again because it's trying to focus on its core aerospace businesses.  Slow sales are prompting Ford Motor Co. to place buyer incentives on its much ballyhooed Ford Super Coupe and Mercury Cougar XR-7, which were named Car of the Year by Motor Trend Magazine.  The two models share many of the same features.  Effective last Friday, Ford offered $1,500 cash back to Super Coupe and XR-7 purchasers.  Ford hadn't previously offered incentives on those models.  A Ford spokesman confirmed that the company is adding the incentives in an attempt to boost sales of the models.  The company also increased the cash back allowance to $750, from $500 on its Probe GL and LX models.  Ford also increased the incentive on its Probe GT model to $1,000, from $500.  In lieu of the cash-back offerings, buyers may elect to participate in Ford's interest-rate finance program, which features discounted rates ranging from 2.9% to 10.9%, depending on terms.  Tokyo stocks closed higher, but a wait-and-see mood caused by late currency fluctuations and lower bond prices kept the turnover small.  London stocks also finished higher in thin trading, and gains were concentrated in selected issues.  The Tokyo market was helped by moderate gains made by housing-related issues, traders said.  Index-related buying by investment trust funds also played a role, they noted.  The Nikkei index of 225 selected issues rose 70.66 points to 34472.54.  It gained 114.94 points Thursday, the final trading day last week, as Friday was a holiday.  In trading in Tokyo Tuesday, the Nikkei index rose 56.68 points to 34529.22 just after the opening.  Volume on the First Section Monday was estimated at 450 million shares, down from 585 million Thursday.  Advancing issues outnumbered declining issues, 483 to 436, while 199 remained unchanged.  Institutional investors remained on the sidelines ahead of their midyear book closing and because of wild currency fluctuations overseas last Friday.  On the other hand, housings, constructions, real estates and railways were pushed up by buy orders mostly from individual investors, traders said.  Some traders noted rumors that major brokerage houses may recommend those issues.  The "Big Four" brokerage firms are set to hold their meetings later this week and decide on their most-recommended issues.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index (Topix) of all issues listed in the First Section, which gained 19.27 points Thursday, was up 3.80 points, or 0.15%, at 2622.23.  The Second Section index, which climbed 9.27 points Thursday, was up 15.38 points, or 0.45%, to close at 3409.19.  Volume in the second section was estimated at 18 million shares, down from 20 million Thursday.  One of the Big Four brokerage houses will hold its meeting today.  Market rumors had it that it will set housing-related and consumption goods sectors as targets of its trading, a trader at Dai-ichi Securities said.  Because of growing speculation that the other three major brokerage houses may set the similar targets, these issues received buy orders from individual investors entering the market before the prices go up, he added.  Gainers among housing issues included Sekisui House, which went up 30 yen (20 cents) to 2,490 yen ($17).  Misawa Homes gained 60 to rise to 3,000 and Daiwa House added 30, standing at 2,660.  Among real estates, Mitsubishi Estate advanced 60 to 2,460 and Sumitomo Realty was up 60 at 2,080.  Railroads were expected to be included in most-recommended-issues lists because of their strong earnings prospects resulting from real estate they own, traders said.  Odakyu Railway added 10 to 1,630 and Tokyu Corp. was up 50 to 1,920.  Textile makers Nisshinbo and Toyobo advanced, helped by buy orders from dealers, traders said.  Nisshinbo gained 50 to 1,610 and Toyobo was up 16 to 891.  Monday's losers included pharmaceuticals.  Ono Pharmaceuticals was down 50 to 6,220.  Taisho dropped 30 to 2,650 and Chugai fell 40 to 2,160.  Machineries ended easier on profit-taking, traders said.  Amada was down 30 at 1,990.  Hitachi Seiki shed 10 to 1,280.  Some steels scored gains after receiving buying orders from investors who decided the issues were scraping bottom.  Kobe Steel and Nippon Steel were among the gainers.  London shares closed firmer in the wake of Wall Street's early advance.  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index closed at a session high of 2373.8, up 7.3.  The narrower market barometer, the Financial Times 30-share index, finished at 1958.9, up 9.2.  Volume was 310.2 million shares, down sharply from 725.9 million Friday.  Dealers acknowledged nagging concerns remain over whether Wall Street is open to a deeper correction after sharp losses last week.  But they added that sentiment was buoyed by the FT-SE 100's ability to rebound from an early low of 2358.3, down 8.2, to finish at its session high.  The day's high was reached shortly after New York opened firmer.  The index's recovery was interpreted in some circles as a sign London could be poised to renew its test of higher levels, or is at least in less danger of moving below 2350, a major support point on technical charts.  Whether concerns over New York and problems surrounding U.S. junk-bond financing are beginning to subside is still a point of debate.  Dealers still voiced caution given London's thin volume, which they said reflected uncertainty and the market's reluctance to aggressively position itself without further direction from Wall Street this week.  Among major moving issues, Glaxo Holdings surged 24 pence (38 cents) in modest volume to #15.86 ($24.82).  Britain's biggest pharmaceutical company is slated to release full-year earnings today, with expectations that it will pierce the #1 billion pretax profit barrier for the first time.  Fisons added 1 1/2 to 343 and Reckitt & Colman closed 4 higher at #12.18 in sympathy with Glaxo.  SmithKline Beecham, however, closed 3 lower at 591, and Wellcome settled at 668, down 6.  Among ex-dividend stocks, Blue Circle lost 4 to 247, British Aerospace shed 10 to 638, United Biscuits dropped 2 to 391 and Cadbury Schweppes recovered from early losses to close 1 higher at 400.  Shell, another ex-dividend stock, fell 9 to 447.  Oil stocks, however, performed well overall during the day.  And Shell may have followed if it hadn't been for ex-dividend factors, dealers said.  British Petroleum closed at 318 1/2, up 3 1/2, Enterprise Oil at 589, up 1, and Burmah up 6 at 627.  Lasmo settled at 542, up 13.  Dealers said oils were underpinned by expectations of improved market fundamentals, including greater cohesion within the pivotal Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries, or OPEC.  Elsewhere, stock prices closed higher in Zurich and Brussels, mixed in Paris, Frankfurt, Amsterdam and Milan and lower in Stockholm.  South African gold stocks closed marginally firmer.  Share prices closed higher in Taipei and Hong Kong, were mixed in Manila, lower in Seoul, Wellington and Singapore and little changed in Sydney.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Sep 15 Sep 14 Year  @ U.S. .................... 317.6 315.6 + 24.0  @ Britain ................. 709.0 713.5 + 29.8  @ Canada .................. 424.6 423.8 + 15.6  @ Japan ................... 1531.9 1531.9 + 7.8  @ France .................. 547.1 545.8 + 23.6  @ Germany ................. 254.6 254.7 + 22.4  @ Hong Kong ............... 1966.1 1966.1 - 3.1  @ Switzerland ............. 228.6 227.6 + 32.2  @ Australia ............... 344.4 344.7 + 18.6  @ World index ............. 523.3 527.2 + 5.8  ---  @ Weekly Percentage Leaders  Last week's best and worst performing stocks among those issues that make up 80% of the world's stock market capitalization (in local currency)  @ ISSUE (COUNTRY) CLOSE %CHG  @ WINNING ISSUES  @ Nippon Soda (Japan) .................. 1300.0 + 42.1  @ Bell Resources (Australia) ........... 1.13 + 41.2  @ Sat SATelecommunications (France) .... 960.0 + 22.4  @ Fasa Renault (Spain) ................. 540.0 + 21.3  @ United Scientific Holdings (Britain) . 1.77 + 21.2  @ Inageya (Japan) ...................... 4900.0 + 20.7  @ Chase (N.Zealand) .................... 0.06 + 20.0  @ Shokusan Jutaku Sogo (Japan) ......... 1400.0 + 17.6  @ Banca Naz Agricolt Ord (Italy) ....... 11200.0 + 17.4  @ EuraFrance (France) .................. 2368.0 + 16.9  @ LOSING ISSUES  @ Campeau (Canada) ..................... 13.5 - 27.5  @ Renouf (N.Zealand) ................... 0.13 - 18.8  @ Hufvudstaden (Sweden) ................ 115.0 - 15.4  @ Cultor II Free (Finland) ............. 80.0 - 14.0  @ Phelps Dodge (U.S.) .................. 67.125 - 13.4  @ Colonia Vers Vorzug (W.Germany) ...... 1040.0 - 13.0  @ Bell Group (Australia) ............... 0.48 - 12.7  @ Woolworth (U.S.) ..................... 63.0 - 12.2  @ Schindler Namen (Swiss) .............. 1080.0 - 11.8  @ Prime Computer (U.S.) ................ 9.0 - 11.1  Source: Morgan Stanley Capital Intl.  Perspective  Birmingham Steel Corp., one of the nation's biggest minimills, accepted a $30-a-share offer from Harbert Corp., a closely held concern controlled by one of the Birmingham, Ala., company's outside directors.  The transaction is valued at about $525 million, including assumption of about $100 million in debt and fees.  The offer is subject to evaluation by First Boston Corp., which has been directed by the Birmingham board to solicit other offers and determine within 45 to 60 days whether the $30-a-share offer is fair.  Should a higher offer by a third party be made and accepted, however, Birmingham has agreed to reimburse Harbert $9 million for expenses.  The Harbert offer was recommended by a special committee of outside directors.  "We believe the proposed merger transaction provides stockholders with an opportunity to maximize the value of their shares at this time, with a reasonable expectation that they should be able to obtain at least $30 a share," said E. Mandell deWindt, chairman of the special committee.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Birmingham surged $4.50 a share to close at $29.125.  Harbert, based in Birmingham, is involved in construction, real estate development and oil and gas exploration.  It is controlled by John M. Harbert III, who is also a Birmingham director and who owns, with affiliates, about 568,700 shares.  Birmingham, which went public in 1985, had about an average of 12.4 million shares outstanding in the year ended June 30.  Harbert said it would contribute as much as $75 million in equity, and has received firm commitments for $100 million subordinated bridge financing from Bear, Stearns & Co. and $350 million in senior credit facilities from Continental Bank.  Although the transaction doesn't involve current management, Harbert said it would invite top managers and employees to invest in the new company.  Harbert also said it plans to keep management and won't get involved in the day-to-day operations.  Birmingham's management has been credited with acquiring and turning around a half dozen ailing minimills.  Should the acquisition be completed, as expected, during the last two weeks of calendar 1989, Birmingham would be the third major minimill to go private in less than two years.  Northwestern Steel & Wire Co. and Florida Steel Corp. both went private in leveraged buy-outs.  John Tumazos, an analyst with Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp., said managements at minimills have been disappointed with the market's treatment of their stocks.  In fact, Birmingham Steel withdrew a public offering last year because the company wasn't satisfied with the price.  And in spite of management's record, Birmingham hasn't received the same market welcome as Nucor Corp., considered the Wall Street darling of minimills.  Raymond Harbert, Mr. Harbert's son and a vice president of the holding company, said Birmingham would help balance the company's other operations and provide a steady earnings stream.  However, Mr. Tumazos said Birmingham, which provides steel bar used in construction, was hurt by heavy rains this spring that damped construction and caused a 6% drop in spot bar prices.  Such softness, he said, is expected to continue through the year, at the same time minimills are adding capacity.  "The fact that a spring rain can cause prices to fall 6% to 8% suggests that the demand-supply balance isn't too stable," he said.  Birmingham, for example, had been planning to build a flat-rolled sheet minimill in Texas, along with other partners.  Raymond Harbert said that construction program would be reviewed.  President Carlos Salinas de Gortari gave the strongest signal yet that the government would cede majority control of Mexico's 56%-owned telephone monopoly to private investors when a new national telecommunications strategy is unveiled this week.  Telefonos de Mexico "ended up in the hands of the state because before it wasn't adequately administered" as a private-sector company, Mr. Salinas said yesterday in a speech to the phone workers union.  "Nevertheless, the Mexican state doesn't have sufficient resources to achieve its adequate growth."  Mr. Salinas never referred specifically to a privatization of the phone company.  He did indicate that in the coming telecommunications revamp, Mexicans would retain a majority stake in the monopoly, known as Telmex.  Mr. Salinas also praised telephone workers union leader Francisco Hernandez Juarez, who discussed the prospect of privatizing Telmex in unusually frank terms.  "Privatizing permits overcoming . . . some problems of financing and administration in the short and medium term," Mr. Hernandez Juarez said.  He cautioned, however, that a greater private-sector role wouldn't solve all of Telmex's problems.  Many foreign phone companies are interested in a stake in Telmex.  Dreyfus Corp. agreed to sell the credit-card operation of its Dreyfus Consumer Bank to a Bank of New York Co. subsidiary for $168 million.  The move comes seven months after Dreyfus put the East Orange, N.J., branch of the bank on the block because of asset-growth limits on so-called non-bank banks, such as Dreyfus Consumer.  Dreyfus said then that the move was designed to take the bank out of demand deposits -- the so-called retail side -- and to let it concentrate on credit cards, mortgages and certificates of deposits.  The price breaks out to $120 million plus $8 million of payments annually for six years in return for which Dreyfus won't compete with Bank of New York in the credit-card business.  The sale of the credit accounts, which the companies expect to close around the end of November, is subject to regulatory clearance and approval by Dreyfus's board.  "It became clear that the direction of the credit-card business is that a large number of cards are needed to keep costs low," a spokesman for Dreyfus said.  Issuers must do a large volume to gain economies of scale, he said, and Dreyfus faced the decision either to acquire other credit-card businesses or to sell its own.  John Keefe, analyst at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., called the deal "a little bit of a surprise . . . but I'm sure they've done this with the long term in mind."  The analyst, who calls himself an "incorrigible bull" on Dreyfus and has a buy recommendation out on its stock, notes that selling the credit accounts will fatten Dreyfus's about $600 million cash hoard.  The company has declined to say what it plans to do with those funds.  Bank of New York called Dreyfus's portfolio the fourth-largest MasterCard Gold portfolio in the U.S., encompassing more than 320,000 accounts with $790 million in credit outstanding.  The credit-card business accounted for the lion's share -- $20.7 million -- of the bank's $22.9 million of 1988 revenue.  Earnings for the credit-card operation were unavailable, but it is known to be highly profitable.  Bank of New York (Delaware), the buyer, has more than two million cards issued, accounting for some $2.8 billion of credit outstanding at June 30.  "We plan to continue to expand this business, both through internal growth and by solicitation and acquisition of credit-card portfolios," Bank of New York said.  Under an existing agreement, the receivables from the MasterCard accounts at Dreyfus Consumer Bank are reflected in the financial statements of Bank of New York (Delaware), and the two companies share the revenue.  In 1982, Dreyfus bought Lincoln State Bank for $2.8 million and then sold the bank's commercial-loan portfolio.  Dreyfus renamed it Dreyfus Consumer Bank and, said Drexel's Mr. Keefe, realized a strong return on the investment.  Recently, Dreyfus agreed to sell the East Orange branch of Dreyfus Consumer to a unit of Broad National Bancorp., Newark, N.J.  That sale is awaiting regulatory approval.  Under federal law, banks can take consumer deposits and make commercial loans.  The so-called non-bank banks make consumer loans but not commercial loans; this allows commercial concerns like Dreyfus, which primarily manages mutual funds, to own them.  MANUFACTURERS HANOVER agreed to sell a 4.9% stake in the parent company for $120 million and control of its CIT Group for $1.28 billion to Japan's Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank.  The accord, part of a sweeping recapitalization by Manufacturers, represents the biggest investment yet by a Japanese bank in the U.S. Manufacturers also will add $950 million to loan-loss reserves, resulting in a third-quarter loss of $775 million.  ---  A boost in the top tax rate to 33% is being considered by House Democratic leaders as a substitute for the capital-gains tax cut approved by the Ways and Means panel last week.  ---  Burroughs-Wellcome is cutting the price of its AIDS drug AZT by 20%, bowing to pressure from patients and their advocates.  The reduction, to about $6,400 a year from $8,000, also reflects anticipated market growth.  ---  RJR Nabisco's sale of its Del Monte canned foods business to a Citicorp unit is being revamped to meet federal limits on banks' ownership of nonfinancial firms, sources said.  The Fed staff's veto of the sale may signal a tougher stance toward bank equity investments in leveraged buy-outs.  ---  Kellogg's president and heir apparent, Horst Schroeder, resigned suddenly, citing "personal reasons."  His departure comes as the cereal maker fights to regain market share.  ---  First Pennsylvania agreed to be acquired by CoreStates Financial for stock valued at $18.75 a share, or about $730 million.  The bank passed up a last-minute bid of $20.85 a share from Meridian Bancorp, citing concerns about massive layoffs.  ---  Birmingham Steel has accepted a $30-a-share takeover bid from a private firm controlled by an outside director.  The accord is valued at $525 million, including debt and fees, though higher bids will be sought.  ---  Stock prices rose as worries about junk bonds eased, though long-term Treasury bonds and the dollar edged lower.  The Dow Jones industrials closed up 12.92 points, at 2687.50.  --- Maxwell Communication of Britain agreed to buy Bell & Howell's Merrill publishing unit for $260 million, boosting its growing role in the U.S. textbook publishing market.  ---  A major corn-farmers group and an agricultural science organization are moving toward calling for more surveillance of the nation's food supply for cancer-causing aflatoxin.  ---  Delta Air Lines is talking with NWA and TWA about forming a joint computer-reservation system that could become a major new competitor for U.S. travel-agency bookings.  ---  Lloyds Bank agreed to sell its U.S. commercial-banking operation to Japan's Daiwa Bank for $200 million.  ---  Ferranti of Britain confirmed it may have been defrauded on some big weapons contracts.  Concern grew about the defense firm's future.  ---  Spicer & Oppenheim lost its biggest public-audit client, Bear Stearns.  The accounting firm has been under financial pressure recently.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 136,940,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2687.50, up 12.92; transportation 1442.21, up 2.49; utilities 216.49, up 0.95.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3334.96, off 2.65.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 130.24, off 0.45; spot index 129.58, up 0.10.  Dollar: 145.88 yen, off 0.55; 1.9520 marks, off 0.0140.  The dollar sank as confidence in the U.S. currency faded following Friday's sudden plunge.  Foreign-exchange dealers reported that trading was thin and choppy, with most participants too numbed by the dollar's cascade last week to venture new positions.  An abundance of ready sellers, presumably still holding uncomfortable long-dollar positions, quashed every attempt to nudge the dollar higher, dealers said.  "When people lose that much money they don't bounce back," said Susan Babcock, vice president of corporate foreign exchange at Hongkong & Shanghai Banking Corp.  "They don't say, 'Hey, we were buying it at 1.99 marks Friday, and now we can buy at 1.95 marks.'"  Although many traders said it could take several weeks to repair Friday's damage to the dollar, several were optimistic that the U.S. currency will again push toward the year's highs, set in June around 2.0475 marks.  "We're still close enough.  There's no reason to think the market is one-way down," said a vice president at a German bank in New York.  Others, however, noted that with the chance for interest rate increases in Europe and Japan increasing, the dollar will find any climb a hard one.  And, after Campeau Corp.'s troubles with its junk bond debt, concerns about the health of other highly leveraged companies -- and their bankers -- add a fresh area of uncertainty to the market.  In all, traders agree, the foreign-exchange arena will be kept on edge for the next week or two, and the likelihood of any assertive dollar moves during that period is slim.  In late afternoon New York trading yesterday, the dollar was at 1.9520 marks, down from 1.9660 marks late Friday, and at 145.88 yen, down from 146.86 yen.  Sterling was at $1.5705, up from $1.5535.  In trading in Tokyo Tuesday, the dollar opened at 145.70 yen, down from 146.43 yen at Monday's close.  The dollar waffled through Asian trading Monday, trading roughly in a relatively broad range as participants attempted to adjust their positions following Friday's helter-skelter tumble.  An intervention by the Bank of Japan when the dollar was trading around 145.75 yen hampered an already weak recovery, but the dollar eventually managed to build a base above 146 yen.  Encouraged by the overnight dollar gains and expecting some correction from Friday, European players pulled the dollar higher.  The dollar encountered heavy selling as it rose in New York trading, however, and eventually the opposition scuttled the currency's chance for posting gains.  Comments by Swiss National Bank President Markus Lusser that most central banks aren't prepared to alter their monetary policy to influence the level of the dollar did little to dissuade sellers, as did his praise of the U.S. Federal Reserve's management of the U.S. economy.  James Maccario, vice president of foreign exchange at Shawmut Bank of Boston, said that although Friday's U.S. trade figures showed encouraging progress in reducing the country's trade gap, the decline in both exports and imports suggests economic activity may be more subdued than many had thought.  A survey of international analysts indicates, also, that while the Bundesbank and other European central banks aren't likely to raise interest rates following the Bundesbank's Central Bank Council meeting Thursday, many analysts expect a coordinated credit-tightening on the Continent in the next four to eight weeks.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery settled at $361.70 an ounce, down $2.20.  Estimated volume was a moderate three million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Tuesday, gold was quoted at $360.07 an ounce.  Amdura Corp. said Cilluffo Associates L.P. had obtained consents from enough shareholders to replace the current board and force the resignation of Robert H. Nassau as president and chief executive officer.  The Denver hardware and automotive distributor said Cilluffo Associates had obtained support of shareholders owning approximately 51% of its shares.  New York investor Frank J.A. Cilluffo has said he started the consent solicitation because of concerns that shareholder equity would be diluted by Amdura efforts to refinance a $40 million bridge loan.  Mr. Nassau, whose resignation is effective today, has been with Amdura since 1982.  Meanwhile, Amdura also announced it has agreed to supply automotive aftermarket products -- such as oil, polishes and accessories -- to Sears, Roebuck & Co. and to Caldor, a division of May Department Stores Co.  The agreements, according to company officials, are expected to generate combined annual sales of approximately $20 million.  Hughes Aircraft Co.'s Radar Systems Group announced a streamlining of its operations as part of the company's reorganization.  General Motors Corp., Hughes Aircraft's parent, announced a complex restructuring of the aerospace concern in February.  The Radar Systems Group's eight divisions will be reduced to the microwave and processor divisions, and four systems divisions.  The systems divisions include tactical systems, strategic systems, advanced systems and reconnaissance systems.  The group, which had a work force of 10,500 to 10,700 when the corporate restructuring was announced, will be reduced by about 1,000 employees by the time it is completed in December.  The unit currently has about 10,000 employees, a spokesman said.  Hughes Aircraft is based in El Segundo, Calif.  Robert Campeau's son, Jacques, failed in a court attempt to take possession of two million Campeau Corp. shares controlled by his father.  A justice of the Supreme Court of Ontario dismissed a motion Friday in which Jacques Campeau, 35 years old, asked for control of the shares.  The shares are held for Jacques Campeau in a trust and he is entitled to the dividend income from the shares.  But voting rights to the stock are currently controlled by Robert Campeau, chairman of the real estate and retailing concern, which owns Bloomingdale's and other big department store chains.  The shares represent about 7.2% of the Campeau common stock held by the elder Mr. Campeau, who has a total equity stake of 62.5%, or 54% fully diluted.  In an affidavit filed with the court, Jacques Campeau said he is concerned about Campeau's financial condition and the recent drop in its share price.  He said he has incurred a "paper loss" of 17 million Canadian dollars (US$14.3 million) on his Campeau stock recently and he is "extremely concerned" that his quarterly dividend income from the shares of about C$200,000 is in jeopardy.  "It is my primary source of income and if it stops or declines substantially I will suffer great hardship," the son said in the affidavit.  Campeau stock ceased trading Wednesday afternoon and hasn't resumed.  From Sept. 7 to Sept. 13, the stock fell from C$22.25 to C$13.50 in Toronto Stock Exchange trading.  Robert Campeau sued his son last year over voting rights to the shares.  That case isn't expected to go to trial for several months.  The elder Mr. Campeau also sued his daughter, Rachelle, to keep voting rights to 1.6 million Campeau shares held in trust for her.  In documents filed previously with the court, Robert Campeau has argued that he is entitled to vote the shares held in trust for his son and daughter and that the stock should remain part of a "unified voting control block controlled by members of the Campeau family or by Robert Campeau."  BUSH IS GRANTING Hungary permanent most-favored-nation trade status.  Responding to spreading political liberalization in Eastern Europe, the president announced the new trade status for Budapest, which ensures that its exports to the U.S. won't face discriminatory tariffs.  Hungary is expected to receive the new status next month.  Speaking in Montana, Bush also cited "encouraging signs" that might help Moscow win similar status.  He also said "it isn't time for normalcy" in U.S. ties with China, despite contacts between the two nations since last summer's crackdown on dissent in Beijing.  Bush urged tree-planting in the U.S., and unveiled plans to train Peace Corps volunteers to help protect the environment in developing countries.  ---  HURRICANE HUGO POUNDED Puerto Rico after lashing other Caribbean islands.  The storm, which has left at least 14 people dead and tens of thousands homeless in the Caribbean, slammed into the U.S. commonwealth's eastern tip with winds as high as 125 mph.  While there wasn't any immediate word on casualties, extensive damage was reported.  The governor said he would ask Bush to declare the island a disaster area.  The hurricane was headed toward the Dominican Republic and the Bahamas.  Tropical Storm Iris rose in the wake of Hugo, and forecasters advised residents of the battered Leeward Islands to keep a close watch on the new storm.  ---  ISRAEL AND EGYPT HELD talks in Cairo on the prospects for Mideast peace.  Israeli Defense Minister Rabin met for three hours with Egyptian President Mubarak and said Israel would accept a Cairo-sponsored dialogue with Palestinians in an effort to end a 21-month-old Arab uprising in the occupied lands.  Both leaders expressed cautious optimism about talks, but the two sides are divided on the composition of the Arab delegation.  Shamir opposes Mubarak's plan.  Wrangling between Israel's coalition partners intensified over Mubarak's plan, and officials said the rift could turn into a government crisis.  ---  Defense Secretary Cheney ordered the Pentagon to develop plans to strengthen the U.S. military presence in the Caribbean and along the nation's southern border to curb cocaine smuggling.  The plans are to be completed by Oct. 15.  He also asked the military to accelerate training and other assistance to military and police in Latin America.  Colombian officials said drug traffickers were suspected in a rocket attack on the U.S. Embassy in Bogota.  The rocket, fired from blocks away, struck the embassy but didn't explode.  It was the first assault on a U.S. target since a war on drugs began a month ago with Washington's support.  ---  Israel and Hungary restored full diplomatic ties, more than 20 years after Budapest severed relations to protest the Israeli occupation of Arab territories in the 1967 Mideast war.  Hungary is the first East bloc nation to renew ties with Israel, which expressed hope that the move would lead to improved links with the Soviet Union.  ---  Artillery battles erupted in Beirut after the Christian army commander rejected creation of an Arab League security committee to oversee a cease-fire in Lebanon.  Police said at least six people were killed.  Gen. Aoun had sought written Arab guarantees that Syria would withdraw its forces as a condition for accepting the proposal.  ---  Poland's Communist leaders proposed transforming the party into a "new socialist party" that would be able to flourish under democracy.  At its first meeting since a Solidarity-led government was installed this month, the party's ruling body warned Central Committee members that only radical change could save the party from oblivion.  ---  A bomb exploded and killed five people in the republic of Azerbaijan, where rival ethnic groups have carried out violent protests, the Soviet Communist Party newspaper Pravda reported.  The unrest came as Communist leaders gathered in Moscow for a Central Committee meeting this week on ethnic problems in the Soviet Union.  ---  India and Sri Lanka signed an accord calling for the New Delhi government to withdraw its 42,000 peacekeeping troops from the island nation by the end of the year.  While some officials said the pact, which ended a three-month diplomatic deadlock, could help end ethnic violence, others expressed concern about more fighting.  ---  Argentina's President Menem said 18 retired generals and admirals facing trial on charges of committing hundreds of human-rights abuses in the 1970s will be pardoned.  He said the cases of six other people, including two ex-presidents already convicted and sentenced, will be considered later.  ---  China's Deng has named Jiang Zemin, the Communist Party chief, as his successor, the New York Times reported.  The senior leader reportedly chose the former Shanghai mayor during "informal talks" with other officials in May and June.  Kurzweil Music Systems Inc., Waltham, Mass., said it signed a letter of intent with Hammond Suzuki Ltd. for the purchase by Hammond Suzuki of 909,091 unregistered shares of Kurzweil common stock at $1.10 a share, for a total purchase price of $1 million.  The transaction is subject to both boards.  Kurzweil, which has said additional financing is required for its operations, described the transaction as "an important first step in meeting this requirement."  Kurzweil is a supplier of digital electronic musical instruments.  Hammond Suzuki is a supplier of inventory to Kurzweil, and distributes Kurzweil products in Japan.  For some people, the videocassette recorder is a convenience.  For Wilma Forrestal, it's almost a way of life.  Every Sunday morning, Mrs. Forrestal, the wife of the president of the Atlanta Federal Reserve Bank, grabs the television guide of the local newspaper and marks the movies that appeal to her.  Then she makes a list of the movies, along with their times and channels, and sticks it on the front of the guide.  Every morning without fail, she checks the list and sets one of her two VCRs.  "I sound like a fanatic," she admits.  "I'm really not.  I do do other things."  Inventions of earlier decades -- the television, the air conditioner, the dishwasher -- brought the American home communications, comfort and automation.  But The Wall Street Journal's "American Way of Buying" consumer survey found that the recent inventions that Americans prize most are those that yield convenience and control: the microwave oven, the VCR, the automatic coffee maker.  To get at the issue of just which gadgets do and don't matter to American consumers, pollster Peter Hart gave respondents a list of 19 inventions that have become major consumer items in the past decade or so, asking them to rate each on a scale ranging from "made life a lot better" to "modern frill."  Three-quarters of the respondents say the microwave has made life a lot better.  More than 40% say the same for the VCR.  In terms of products that give the most enjoyment, the microwave oven emerges the hands-down favorite, with the VCR a clear second.  And neither boom is quite over yet.  Though the survey found that nearly eight in 10 households have microwaves and seven in 10 have VCRs, they remain among the most-desired objects by people who don't yet have them.  Of course, one consumer's life-bettering invention is another's useless frill.  The Journal's poll, for instance, found that while older Americans especially cherish their coffee makers and remote control devices, they aren't impressed with computers, facsimile machines, VCRs or telephone answering machines.  On the other hand, no group prizes that telephone answering machine more than Americans between 18 and 29 years old.  More than half of them say the machines have made life a lot better; only the microwave and the home computer are more popular.  "I don't consider it a luxury.  I consider it a necessity," says Michael Robinson, 25, who lives by himself in Washington, D.C.  He bought an answering machine -- the kind that plays back his messages when he calls in from someplace else -- shortly after graduating from college.  "My sister was going to call me the other day and tell me when she was arriving in Washington, but I didn't know where I was going to be," he says.  "I told her to call the answering machine and then I checked it every 45 minutes or hour."  In Mr. Robinson's circle, the answering machine seems to be replacing the "Dear John" letter.  He has more than one friend who has phoned an estranged lover's home in order to leave a message on a machine without having a conversation.  "I've never done it," he says.  "It's kind of cheating.  But it's effective."  Some celebrated modern inventions fail to impress American consumers.  Roughly half those surveyed denounce the compact disk player and the Walkman-style portable stereo as modern frills.  In the case of the Walkman especially, the poll indicates a possible saturation point: While a third of all households have lightweight stereos, only a scant 3% of the remainder say that they strongly want one.  The invention on the list that consumers labeled a frill most frequently was that status symbol of the prosperous business executive, the car phone.  Yet according to the survey, many of the people who have car phones love them, and more than twice as many people want to buy them as now have them.  By asking which products consumers now own and which ones they would most like to have, the Journal survey provides a rough indicator of a national wish list.  Some of the results were surprising -- for instance, the showing by home computers.  The computer industry largely regards the home market as a fad that faded.  But according to the poll, while 19% of respondents already have computers at home, another 25% who don't have them strongly want them.  Demand for home computers dried up in 1985, rebounded in 1986 and 1987 and then leveled off in 1988.  "Last Christmas was a disappointing Christmas.  The industry is nervously looking forward to this one," says William Bowman, co-founder of Spinnaker Software Inc., a Cambridge, Mass., company that never realized its dream of riding a home computer boom to riches.  Mr. Bowman, now a marketing consultant with Regis McKenna, says demand for home computers will pick up as rapidly improving computer graphics attract a new group of users.  The Journal's poll suggests that the strongest unsatisfied appetite for home computers isn't among the richest consumers -- who are more likely to have a computer at home already -- but among those who earn less than $50,000 a year.  One big factor in wanting a home computer is children: One in every three households with kids at home puts a computer on its wish list.  The video camera is another product that still has some upside potential.  According to the Journal survey, 14% of households now have a video camera, while another 25% are strongly interested in having one.  Here, too, children count: As with the computer, one in every three households with children wants a videocam.  Of fax machines, perhaps the hottest current fad, only 7% of respondents say they strongly want one -- but since only 1% have them now, that suggests there's still some growth left in that market, too.  To a surprisingly large number of Americans, it's the little things that make life much better.  Take the modern coffee maker, for instance.  At best, it saves a few minutes a day.  Yet more than half those surveyed say it has made life a lot better, and only about one in every 10 deems the coffee maker a modern frill.  In contrast, two of every 10 say that about the home computer and six of every 10 feel that way about the car phone.  Barbara Clay owns four fancy coffee makers, the kind that actually grind the beans as well as brew the coffee.  One sits near her desk at the Office of Management and Budget in Washington so she doesn't have to rely on what passes for coffee in government offices.  One is in her kitchen.  And, she says, "I have two in the closet at home that I am prepared to use should one of mine break."  Miss Clay isn't the kind of person who sets the timer on the coffee maker every night so she doesn't have to bother in the morning.  She saves that treat for Sunday mornings.  "Instead of my alarm clock," she says, "there's the aroma of fresh-perked coffee."  (See related story: "Most Consumers Shun Luxuries, Seek Few Frills but Better Service" -- WSJ Sept. 19, 1989)  ---  @ American Consumers: A Statistical Portrait  Percentage of total responses to the question: "How satisfied are you with your life right now?"  @ Extremely/Pretty ............................... 72%  @ Just Somewhat .................................. 22%  @ Dissatisfied ................................... 6%  Note: Does not include "Not sure" responses  Source: WSJ Centennial Survey  ---  Percentage of respondents choosing these headlines to describe the '80s  @ Consumer gets less value ....................... 34%  @ Middle class caught in squeeze ................. 34%  @ Foreign goods become dominant .................. 30%  @ Americans go into debt ......................... 19%  Source: WSJ Centennial Survey  ---  @ Hits and Misses of the 1980s  Percentage of total respondents citing product as "making life a lot better" and as a "modern frill"  @ Made Life Modern  @ Better Frill  @ Thumbs Up  @ Smoke alarm ...................... 82% 2%  @ Microwave oven ................... 75 7  @ Coffee maker ..................... 55 12  @ TV remote control ................ 53 22  @ Home computer .................... 45 19  @ Thumbs Down  @ Car phone ........................ 16% 59%  @ CD player ........................ 15 52  @ Walkman .......................... 13 50  @ Video camera ..................... 23 42  @ Pulsating shower massager ........ 21 41  Source: WSJ Centennial Survey  Reeves Communications Corp. said it is in talks with Britain's Thames Television PLC about the possibility of it being acquired by Thames.  Reeves, a television producer and syndicator, declined to elaborate or disclose financial terms under discussion, but industry executives estimated that it would cost about $100 million to purchase Reeves.  Thames is the leading commercial television station in Britain and also produces programming.  Foreign television companies find U.S. television producers desirable because of their film and videotape libraries, as well as their role as suppliers to the major networks.  Last year, for example, another British concern, Television South PLC, acquired MTM Entertainment Inc. for $320 million.  Reeves has been without a prime-time hit since "Kate & Allie" was canceled by CBS Inc. last spring.  It produces "Home," a daily daytime series on ABC, a subsidiary of Capital Cities/ABC Inc. and "Doctor, Doctor," a prime-time series on CBS which the network is saving as a possible midseason replacement.  Reeves had a loss of $12.2 million for the fiscal fourth quarter ended June 30, in contrast to a profit $3.9 million for the same period last year.  Revenue fell to $28.9 million from $46.7 million.  For the full year, Reeves reported a loss of $14.9 million, compared with net income of $8.3 million in fiscal 1988.  Revenue slumped to $79.2 million from $105.5 million.  Marvin H. Green Jr., Reeves's chairman and chief executive, said that although earnings were "disappointing," the company "generated substantial cash flow" during the past fiscal year from the syndication rights for "Kate & Allie" and "Gimme A Break," which ran on General Electric Co.'s National Broadcasting Co.  Mr. Green also said that he expects Reeves to have a full production schedule nest year.  It will produce "Witness to Survival," 13 half-hour advertiser-sponsored programs, as well as "Jackpot," a co-production for first-run syndication.  In national over-the-counter trading, Reeves closed at $6.50, up 37.5 cents.  General Motors Corp.'s Electronic Data Systems Corp. said in Dallas that it signed a 10-year contract with Great Western Bank, Beverly Hills, Calif., to provide expanded item-processing services to Great Western.  No dollar value for the contract was disclosed.  EDS currently handles Great Western's NOW accounts.  The new contract calls for EDS to take over additional processing that had been contracted out to a commercial bank.  EDS will provide all of Great Western's demand deposit account processing as well as all check processing, statement rendition and other back office services.  EDS, which serves more than 6,000 financial institutions world-wide, will build processing centers in Oakland, Calif., and in San Diego to support the Great Western account.  Chambers Development Co., Pittsburgh, said it plans to acquire a site for a proposed 96-acre landfill in Mecklenberg County, Va.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The purchase is subject to county and state approval of a permit application for the site, located about 72 miles south of Richmond.  The solid waste and security services concern also said it has completed the acquisition of Bay Disposal Inc., a garbage collection and hauling company in the Norfolk and Richmond, Va., area.  The company also received a permit for construction and operation of a landfill in Charles City County, Va., about 25 miles southeast of Richmond.  The Wall Street Journal "American Way of Buying" Survey consists of two separate, door-to-door nationwide polls conducted for the Journal by Peter D. Hart Research Associates and the Roper Organization.  The two surveys, which asked different questions, were conducted using national random probability samples.  The poll conducted by Peter D. Hart Research Associates interviewed 2,064 adults age 18 and older from June 15 to June 30, 1989.  The poll conducted by the Roper Organization interviewed 2,002 adults age 18 and older from July 7 to July 15, 1989.  Responses were weighted on the basis of age and gender to conform with U.S. Census data.  For each poll, the odds are 19 out of 20 that if pollsters had sought to survey every household in the U.S. using the same questionnaire, the findings would differ from these poll results by no more than 2 1/2 percentage points in either direction.  The margin of error for subgroups -- for example, married women with children at home -- would be larger.  In addition, in any survey, there is always the chance that other factors such as question wording could introduce errors into the findings.  (See related stories: "After the Beep: The Message Is Convenience Matters Most" and "Most Consumers Shun Luxuries, Seek Few Frills but Better Service" -- WSJ Sept. 19, 1989)  NRM Energy Co. L.P., buffeted by depressed gas prices, announced payment on some of its preferred units but suspended distribution on others.  Distribution on the oil and gas company's $2.60 senior cumulative convertible preferred depositary units will be payable Nov. 15 to unit holders of record Sept. 29, at the rate of 65 cents per unit.  But distribution has been suspended on NRM's $2 convertible acquisition preferred units, which are cumulative and bear interest at one percentage point above the prime rate.  NRM earlier reported a deterioration in financial results.  For the first six months of 1989, it posted a loss of $36.7 million, widened from a year-earlier loss of $11.4 million.  Revenue for the first half fell to $34.6 million from $42.2 million.  In addition, an NRM spokeswoman said the company is "in the throes of determining a restructuring" and the suspension is part of its strategy to become a publicly traded corporation.  Proxy materials will be mailed to unit holders in October, she added, with restructuring to be completed by year end.  An Arizona Corporation Commission hearing officer issued a scathing recommendation in which he suggested that the commission cut Tucson Electric Power Co.'s request for a rate increase to $57 million from $80.3 million and that the company's request for a 9% fuel surcharge be denied.  The commission can accept, deny or amend the recommendations.  Assistant Chief Hearing Officer Jerry Rudibaugh also recommended that a Tucson Electric management audit be conducted, saying that "one theme prevalent throughout the recent history of TEP has been its emphasis on shareholder/management compensation, and disregard for its customers and this regulatory commission."  He added that the utility "stretched the regulatory limits as far as possible.  As a result, the company was reluctant to come before the commission for a rate increase until financially it could no longer afford to wait."  A Tucson Electric spokesman noted that the company has 10 days to respond to the commission, and wouldn't comment further.  Edward Tirello, a utility analyst at Shearson Lehman Hutton, said that despite the critical language, the officer's recommendation is "not all that bad.  On a relative basis it could have been worse."  He noted that although the utility had requested a 22% rate boost, it was bracing itself for only a 9% to 10% increase.  The officer's recommendation would amount to nearly a 12% increase.  Under the recommendation, the average residential electric bill would increase $5.35 a month.  It has become the hearth of Americans' daily lives.  In subtle and far-reaching ways, it has changed perceptions of family, fastness and even food itself.  It is that unsung icon of the '80s, the microwave.  In a sign of the times, The Wall Street Journal survey participants said the microwave was their favorite household product, and they rated it second in importance to their lives, just behind the smoke alarm.  For women, the no-fuss, no-muss appliance offers the perfect way to flee the kitchen without feeling much guilt.  The microwave is also the embodiment of '80s-style individualism, turning each family member into a private chef.  Gone is the sanctity of the family meal.  Irretrievably altered is the role of mom, the nurturer.  "The mother who was tied to the kitchen as either the cook or the maid for her family has become merely the manager of the food supply," says Richard Nelson, director of market research services at Campbell Soup Co. Kids as young as six are zapping child-oriented product lines like Kid's Kitchen, Kid Cuisine and My Own Meals.  Most of all, the microwave is both symptom and symbol of our radically altered attitudes about time.  It's no coincidence that during the '80s -- the decade in which time has come to rival money as the commodity people crave most -- the appliance moved from the realm of the novel to the necessary.  The invention was available to consumers in the '60s, but they stayed away because of high prices and fears about cooking quality and radiation leakage.  By 1980, only about 15% of all American households had microwaves.  Today, that figure is between 75% and 80%.  If the appliance satisfies people's compulsion to hoard time, it has also transformed their sense of how fast is fast.  "Microwaves have changed our perceptions of time in the '80s much as telephones changed them at the turn of the century," says Mona Doyle, president of Consumer Network Inc., a consumer research firm in Philadelphia.  "It has made even fast-food restaurants not seem fast because at home you don't have to wait on line."  Food manufacturers have gotten the message.  They say they dare not require cooks to spend more than 10 minutes microwaving a meal these days.  That's particularly startling when one considers that most cooks were willing to devote 30 minutes to meal preparation a scant 10 years ago and about an hour in the early '70s.  Accordingly, Campbell Soup is testing a microwave soup line for all the people who find it too taxing to open a can and pour the contents into a pot.  And RJR Nabisco Inc. just made a microwavable version of S'Mores, the campfire classic.  Joel Weiner, senior vice president of marketing at Philip Morris Cos.' Kraft USA, credits the microwave with enabling people to progress beyond the "grazing" phenomenon of the early '80s to "refueling" -- an even less leisurely approach to shoveling food into their mouths.  But even Mr. Weiner is loath to argue that the heat-and-eat microwave has done much for American cuisine's image.  "We're just not as critical of food as we used to be," he admits.  Indeed, food industry research shows that 36% of consumers blame the microwave for poorer food flavor, 20% say it makes items soggier and 15% say it consistently overcooks products.  But the urge to bake or broil seemingly vanishes when people are faced with a machine that provides so much freedom and demands so little brainpower.  Such is the microwave's power that it has even resurrected items that seemed destined for obscurity.  For instance, Kraft two years ago decided to transform its venerable-but-much-derided Cheez Whiz spread into a microwavable hot cheese sauce, ideal for nacho-crunching teenagers.  Sales of the slow-growth item soared 40% annually.  Ultimately, the microwave seems destined to reinvent the eating experience.  Consider that lunch staple, the grilled cheese sandwich.  When microwaved, the soggy sandwich doesn't remotely resemble the golden brown delectable that most Americans grew up on.  But the newfangled version is the gold standard for '80s kids.  "We are redefining culturally how we think of food," Campbell's Mr. Nelson says.  "Kids today are being 'imprinted' with the microwave, not the stove.  By the time they grow up and have kids, it will be the primary cooking appliance."  A senior International Business Machines Corp. executive told analysts here that the strength shown by IBM's U.S. operations in the second quarter continued through August.  Terry Lautenbach, general manager of the computer giant's U.S. operations, also told the Montgomery Securities conference that the company's U.S. revenue will increase this year compared to last year's level.  It would be the first time since 1985 that the U.S. revenue has shown growth for a full year.  Mr. Lautenbach added, however, that the growth is "not as rapid as we would like."  Although IBM's second-quarter results showed the first significant revenue growth in its U.S. operations in years, some securities analysts had speculated that IBM pulled out all the stops to make that happen and that it wouldn't be able to sustain that pace.  So Mr. Lautenbach's statements should allay some of those concerns.  "To hear the U.S. is good is very encouraging," said Jay Stevens, an analyst at Dean Witter.  Mr. Lautenbach said the Armonk, N.Y., company still faces problems that are making its U.S. operations grow more slowly than IBM's operations in Europe and Japan.  He said these difficulties include "problems getting new products out the door," relatively slow growth in software and a need to further increase the time that IBM's marketing force spends in the field.  In addition, the bulk of IBM's third-quarter business is typically done in September, so the real test will be what happens this month.  Dan Mandresh, an analyst at Merrill Lynch, also cautioned that there are numerous other factors involved.  He said that, for instance, if the dollar's value stays unchanged through year end, the dollar will be 17% higher against the yen in the fourth quarter compared with its level in the year-ago period.  That would mean a corresponding reduction in the value of IBM's overseas earnings when they are translated into dollars.  Some analysts have, in fact, expressed caution in recent days about the outlook for IBM's second half because of concern that the dollar's strength may hurt fourth-quarter results even more than previously projected.  Conversion Industries Inc. said it completed its exchange of 245,000 shares of Conversion common for 1.3 million common shares of Colin Energy Corp. of Alberta, Canada.  The exchange boosts Conversion's stake in the independent oil and natural gas producer to 51%.  Conversion, a fully integrated independent power production company, has 2.3 million common shares outstanding.  Conversion also said its board ended negotiations to acquire KVA Resources Inc. of Bellevue, Wash., a closely held engineering and design firm specializing in power plants.  Despite the chaos in the junk bond market and to the great relief of takeover-stock speculators, First Boston Corp. made good on its commitment to lend $230 million to an investor group that bought restaurant operator Jerrico Inc. for about $470 million.  First Boston, a unit of CS First Boston Group, had agreed last month to make the temporary loan, known on Wall Street as a "bridge loan" because it is intended to be replaced within a few months by permanent financing through the sale of high-yield, low-rated junk bonds.  But because of last week's sharp price decline of many junk bonds, some takeover-stock speculators who had bought Jerrico shares and expected to resell them at a profit to the buy-out group feared that First Boston might delay the loan.  The announcement yesterday that the buy-out group, led by Castle Harlan Inc., New York, had accepted all shares of Jerrico that were tendered, came as a big relief to takeover-stock traders, or arbitragers.  "The fact that {the loan} did get funded in the middle of all the hullabaloo going on in the junk bond market was a good sign," said one arbitrager who declined to be identified.  Some arbitragers had feared that First Boston might be inclined to delay the transaction because the firm already had made about $1.7 billion of bridge loans to three other companies and has agreed to lend an additional $700 million as part of the pending $3.35 billion acquisition of American Medical International Inc.  Officials of First Boston, however, said the arbitragers shouldn't have been worried.  "While the market may have been unsettled, this is the business we're in," said David M. Malcolm, a managing director involved in First Boston's corporate finance and high-yield bond activities.  "We're ready, willing and able to do deals that make sense, and this deal makes sense," Mr. Malcolm said.  Arbitragers also had been concerned about First Boston's willingness to lend to the Jerrico buy-out group because First Boston last year had made a bridge loan to the Federated Department Stores unit of Campeau Corp. and wasn't able to sell all the junk bonds necessary to repay the loan.  Moreover, disclosures of Campeau's deepening financial troubles and the failure of one of its units to make an interest payment last week prompted much of the decline in junk bond prices.  And in August, First Boston had to pull back a proposed $475 million sale of junk bonds by a group that purchased Ohio Mattress Co. because investors were unwilling to buy the bonds.  First Boston has lent $450 million to the Ohio Mattress group that won't be repaid until the bonds can be sold in a revised form.  First Boston expects that most of the $230 million loan in the Jerrico transaction will be repaid with proceeds from the sale of junk bonds; the rest is expected to be repaid through a private placement of securities and a small amount of bank borrowings.  Jerrico, based in Lexington, Ky., operates the Long John Silver's seafood restaurant chain.  Jerrico is being purchased by a unit of Long John Silver's Holdings Inc., which is controlled by Castle Harlan and DJS-Inverness & Co.  Both Castle Harlan and DJS Inverness have recently purchased other restaurants.  Including the assumption of Jerrico debt and fees and expenses, the total value of the transaction is estimated at about $620 million.  Secretary of Defense Dick Cheney has ordered the Pentagon to develop plans to strengthen the U.S. military presence in the Caribbean Sea and along the nation's southern border to curb cocaine smuggling.  Noting that Congress and President Bush have given his department the lead role in interdicting illegal drug shipments, Mr. Cheney told his top commanders to develop plans by Oct. 15 to carry out the new missions.  Mr. Cheney also asked the military to accelerate training and other assistance to military and police forces in Latin America.  Mr. Cheney said he hoped the moves would "immediately complicate the challenge of getting illegal drugs into America -- increasing the cost and the risk of drug smuggling."  At a Pentagon briefing, Mr. Cheney said the plans will be carried out under President Bush's guideline that no U.S. troops will accompany Latin American forces on military operations.  U.S. troops, he said, will be restricted to training and technical aid, such as improving communications.  While there have been reports that some U.S. military officials were reluctant to take on the anti-drug mission, Mr. Cheney said, "I haven't found that to be the case."  The cost of the new Pentagon effort, he said, won't be determined until the plans are analyzed and approved.  Norwest Corp. agreed to acquire First Interstate Corp. of Wisconsin for about $215 million in common stock.  Under the agreement, the regional bank holding company said, First Interstate holders will receive for each of their common shares, Norwest common valued at $25.50.  The exchange ratio may vary from 1.103 to 1.166 of Norwest shares for each First Interstate share, depending on the value of Norwest shares during a specified period.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, First Interstate of Wisconsin shares jumped $5.50 to close at $23 a share, while Norwest shares rose 25 cents to $22.50 each in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  A Norwest spokesman said the company expects to issue about 9.6 million common shares to complete the transaction, although the precise number can't yet be determined.  Norwest has about 93 million common shares outstanding.  First Interstate, based in Kohler, Wis., has assets of $1.7 billion, compared with Norwest's $23 billion in assets.  The Wisconsin bank had 1988 earnings of $13.2 million, or $1.55 a share.  Norwest said the merger, which will be carried out on a "pooling-of-interest" basis, is expected to have a "very minimal" dilution in per-share earnings for 1990 and will be "anti-dilutive" by 1991, the company said.  The transaction, which the companies expect to close in early 1990, is subject to, among other things, the approval of First Interstate shareholders.  Norwest will need the approval of its shareholders to issue additional common shares, and regulators must approve the merger.  Norwest, a large bank holding company in the Midwest, already owns a bank in La Crosse, Wis., as well as several consumer finance and mortgage offices in the state.  Nike Inc. reported that net income for its fiscal first quarter ended Aug. 31 jumped 33% to $75.9 million, or $2.01 a share, from $57 million, or $1.52 a share, a year earlier.  The Beaverton, Ore., company cited strong shoe sales, especially for tennis shoes and other sports shoes.  Revenue rose 18% to $602.6 million from $510.7 million a year earlier.  Nike said orders for shipments between September and next January are up 37% from year-earlier levels.  Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank Ltd. will take a 4.9% ownership stake in Manufacturers Hanover Corp. for $120 million and purchase control of Manufacturers' CIT Group Inc. for $1.28 billion, in the biggest U.S. investment to date by a Japanese bank.  However, it doesn't appear that Dai-Ichi, long regarded as the sleeping giant of Japanese banks, will be boosting its stake in either Manufacturers or CIT anytime soon.  The stakes to be held by Dai-Ichi, the world's largest bank, were announced as part of a sweeping recapitalization plan unveiled by Manufacturers that includes a $950 million addition to loan-loss reserves and an equity issue of as much as $500 million before the end of the year.  Manufacturers has about 51 million shares outstanding.  The purchases by Dai-Ichi, which means "the first" in Japanese, eclipse prior business investments by Japanese financial institutions, specifically Bank of Tokyo's purchase of Union Bank, Los Angeles, from Britain's Standard Chartered Bank PLC for about $750 million in late 1988.  The reserve addition will result in a $775 million third-quarter loss for Manufacturers and a projected $475 million loss for the year.  In the year's first six months, Manufacturers' net income was $209 million, or $3.70 a share.  The U.S.'s seventh-largest banking company took the steps to neutralize investor worries about its huge portfolio of loans to developing countries and comparatively weak capital base.  The addition to loan-loss reserves will boost that account to $2.4 billion or 36% of the bank's medium-term and long-term loan exposure; the reserve had stood at 22%, the lowest among major U.S. banks.  John F. McGillicuddy, Manufacturers chairman, said he would "prefer not to do" the reserve addition and added that he would not be selling the stake in CIT "except for the fact that capital today is the name of the game."  Asked if the actions will put the developing-country debt question behind it, Mr. McGillicuddy said, "I sure hope so."  The move is bound to put pressure on other major U.S. banks to boost reserves before year end.  In recent months, Bankers Trust New York Corp. and Chase Manhattan Corp. have boosted reserves above 30%.  British banks, which unlike U.S. banks have tax incentives to make reserve additions, have boosted the developing-country debt coverage to 50% of their exposures.  Securities analysts were encouraged by the actions.  James J. McDermott Jr., research director at Keefe, Bruyette & Woods, said: "In June they figured that they had a black hole of $1.8 billion in capital needs.  This gets them $1.5 billion.  This is a new company.  It will slim them down and give them focus."  He added that "I think you'll see a shift in analysts' sentiment" on Manufacturers.  The announcement came just prior to yesterday's market close.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Manufacturers closed at $41.75, up 87.5 cents.  Dai-Ichi, which had $410.59 billion in assets as of March 31, will pay $120 million, or about $45 a share, for its 2.7 million Manufacturers shares and has agreed not to purchase additional shares for 10 years without the bank's consent.  The price is slightly above yesterday's closing price.  Yuko Oana, senior managing director for Dai-Ichi's international operations, said the two banks have had "a warm relationship for over 40 years."  Manufacturers will report a gain of about $100 million on the sale of its 60% of CIT, which it bought in 1984 for $1.51 billion from RCA Corp.  Since the purchase, Manufacturers has had to completely overhaul the once-troubled asset-based lending company, selling its consumer-finance unit last year and refocusing its business on larger ticket items, such as aircraft.  Mr. McGillicuddy said proceeds from the $1.28 billion sale will be used to pay down Manufacturers debt, adding that the bank's cost of amortizing the premium it paid for CIT will be reduced.  As a result Mr. McGillicuddy said the CIT sale will have practically no impact on Manufacturers' earnings and will unlock $850 million of value in CIT.  Albert R. Gamper Jr. will remain chief executive officer of CIT. Mr. Gamper said the fact that CIT will no longer be a wholly owned subsidiary of Manufacturers will allow CIT to get more deeply into the leasing business than it can under current banking laws.  Once the sales are completed and the new equity raised, Manufacturers will have about $3.1 billion in tangible equity, $61 billion in assets and a developing country loan exposure of about $6.7 billion.  As of June 30, Manufacturers had $1.8 billion in tangible equity and $74 billion in assets.  Toshiichi Hashimoto, general manager of Dai-Ichi's New York branch, said the bank considers the leasing business particularly important and noted the CIT investment "gives us access to the leasing business in the U.S."  Mr. Hashimoto also said the stake in CIT would assist the bank's merger and acquisition effort in the U.S. That's because CIT could have many small and medium-sized clients that would make potential acquisition targets for some of Dai-Ichi's large Japanese corporate customers.  Currently, Dai-Ichi has five branches in the U.S.: New York, Atlanta, Chicago, San Francisco and Los Angeles.  The bank has also been an active lender to U.S. takeovers and leverage buy-outs, including that for RJR Nabisco Inc. Analysts estimate that Dai-Ichi's U.S. assets are around $25 billion to $30 billion.  While it is the biggest bank in terms of assets, Dai-Ichi has lagged its Japanese competitors in entering the U.S. market.  Dai-Ichi is playing catch-up.  The bank is the product of a 1971 merger of two Japanese banks that didn't go smoothly.  The problem of fusing the two staffs, analysts and competitors contend, forced the bank to concentrate more than it otherwise might have on its domestic business.  While Dai-Ichi grappled with its internal problems, its biggest competitors made significant inroads into the U.S. market.  Several large Japanese commercial banks already have extensive investments in the U.S.: Bank of Tokyo Ltd., Mitsubishi Bank Ltd., Sanwa Bank Ltd. and Sumitomo Bank Ltd. all have sizable branch operations in California where Japanese banks account for roughly 20% of the banking business.  In addition, the Industrial Bank of Japan Ltd., Long-Term Credit Bank of Japan Ltd., Fuji Bank Ltd. and Sanwa all control primary dealers in U.S. government securities, an elite group of institutions that deals with the Federal Reserve Bank of New York when it buys and sells securities as part of its open-market operations.  In addition, Sumitomo Bank a few years ago paid $500 million for a 12.5% stake in Goldman, Sachs & Co., a leading Wall Street firm.  Overall, Japanese institutions hold about 9% to 10% of all U.S. banking assets.  Moreover, Japanese financial institutions have announced or completed several large deals within the past year.  Yesterday, Daiwa Bank Ltd. agreed to acquire the U.S. commercial banking operations of Britain's Lloyds Bank PLC for about $200 million.  Last month, Japan's Orix Corp., a major leasing company, agreed to pay $190 million for Commercial Alliance Corp. of First Interstate Bancorp, a company involved in financing capital equipment.  In June, Orix paid about $80 million for a third of Commodities Corp., a Princeton, N.J.-based money manager.  In June, Mitsui Bank Ltd. agreed to pay $100 million for a 5% stake in a Security Pacific Corp. finance unit that includes leasing, commercial and consumer finance and venture capital.  Mitsui also has an option to purchase another 5% interest later.  Dai-Ichi isn't the first Japanese bank to buy an asset-based lender to U.S. medium-sized companies.  In 1984, Fuji paid $425 million for Heller International Corp.  But since then, the big Japanese bank has been forced to pump in hundreds of millions of dollars more, in a series of capital infusions and purchases of Heller problem loans, that has boosted Fuji's total investment in the company to $1.25 billion.  But one analyst predicted that by keeping Manufacturers Hanover involved in CIT as a partner, Dai-Ichi could well avoid a similar fate.  "What they are doing is getting firmly into the U.S. market, particularly the middle market," he said.  Like most Japanese banks, Dai-Ichi doesn't worry much about the Third World debt that has so burdened Manufacturers and other U.S. banks.  Dai-Ichi's capital and assets are so huge and its Third World lending exposure so relatively small that the consequences of such nonperforming loans are negligible.  Dayton Hudson Corp. launched a tender offer for seven million shares of its common stock, according to an advertisement in this newspaper.  The offer is at a price not greater than $65 nor less than $60 per share.  The offer expires at 12:01 p.m. EST on Oct. 18.  The board of the retailer has authorized creation of an Employee Stock Ownership Plan calling for the purchase of as many as seven million of its 77.7 million common shares outstanding.  House Democratic leaders are working on a proposal to raise the top tax rate on the nation's wealthiest individuals as a substitute for the capital gains tax cut approved by the House Ways and Means Committee last week.  A senior aide to House Speaker Thomas Foley (D., Wash.) said yesterday that imposing a new, 33% top tax rate is a "strong possibility" as a substitute for the capital gains measure when it comes up for votes on the House floor next week.  Revenue raised from such an alternative, the aide said, could be used either to give tax relief to middle-income taxpayers or to expand the deduction for individual retirement accounts in line with a plan being pushed by Chairman Lloyd Bentsen (D., Texas) of the Senate Finance Committee.  According to other leadership aides, another possibility under consideration is to restrict any benefits from a reduction in the capital gains tax to middle-income and upper-middle-income individuals.  A Ways and Means Committee aide added that if Democrats want to raise more money for deficit reduction or other purposes they may propose a speed-up in payment of payroll taxes by big corporations.  Against the wishes of the House Democratic leadership, the Ways and Means Committee last week voted 19-17 to reduce the top capital gains rate for 2 1/2 years to 19.6%.  After that the top rate would be 28%, with the gains indexed for inflation.  Capital gains are currently taxed at ordinary income rates, which go as high as 33%.  The vote was a victory for President Bush, who yesterday warned Democrats in Congress that they shouldn't seek to punish him on other issues because they are losing to him on capital gains.  Mr. Bush, speaking at a news conference in Helena, Mont., said that he hopes a "bipartisan spirit" will prevail as the plan progresses.  But he also said it wouldn't be "right," and would be unpopular with the American people, if lawmakers fighting a capital gains tax cut refused to back the administration on other issues.  Democrats haven't reached a decision on their strategy to try to defeat the capital gains tax cut.  But the Democratic leadership intends to pull out all the stops to fight the reduction on the grounds that it disproportionately benefits rich people and loses revenue over the long run.  Aides argued that many upper-income individuals already pay a 33% marginal rate -- the rate on the last dollar of income -- because of an anomaly in the tax code.  The top marginal rate for the wealthiest people is 28%.  Making 33% officially the top rate would affect mostly these wealthy taxpayers and wouldn't lose revenue over the long run, as a reduction in the capital gains tax would.  According to new congressional estimates released yesterday by House Majority Leader Richard Gephardt (D., Mo.), a leading opponent of a capital gains tax rate reduction, the Ways and Means tax cut would cost the Treasury $21 billion through the fiscal year ending Sept. 30, 1999.  In the first three years, the rate reduction would raise $9.4 billion, because of increased asset sales, but in later years the measure would lose revenue.  President Bush has opposed any rate increase as part of his no-tax-increase pledge.  And in the Ways and Means Committee, a long series of proposals that included the new top rate was narrowly defeated.  Arco Chemical Co. lowered its per-share earnings outlook for 1989 to between $4.25 and $4.50.  Previously, the Newtown Square, Pa., chemicals company had agreed with Wall Street estimates of $4.75 to $5.25.  The company attributed the revision to lower profit margins in its styrene monomers business, whose markets are the plastics and rubber industries.  In 1988, Arco Chemical earned $494 million, or $5 a share, on revenue of $2.7 billion.  Arco Chemical made its announcement after the stock market closed.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Arco Chemical closed at $39, down 12.5 cents.  Arco Chemical is 83%-owned by Atlantic Richfield Co., Los Angeles.  To American advertising people, Gilbert Gross is the man who invented "the French disease."  For years, established agencies in France derided Mr. Gross as a bargain-basement ad man who ruined client relationships.  They did all they could to stop him.  They failed.  Now the French disease is spreading to other European countries and, some believe, will eventually reach the U.S.  Mr. Gross's idea is based on simple economics.  By buying huge quantities of ad space from newspapers, magazines, television and radio, he reasoned, he could demand discounts as high as 50%.  Then he could resell the space to clients in customized cut-rate packages -- and still make a huge profit.  Over the past 20 years, Mr. Gross's success has been phenomenal.  Today, associates and industry insiders say, he controls 25% of the space and time sold in France and, through affiliates, more than 10% of the advertising market in West Germany and Spain.  "Media-buying is becoming the creative frontier of advertising," says Peter Scott, chief executive of Britain's WCRS Group PLC, which is helping Mr. Gross extend his influence through Europe.  "There is going to be a battleground in the marketplace."  For the moment, media-buying hasn't reached the U.S., partly because lawyers here believe some of its forms may constitute price-fixing.  But U.S. agencies have banded together to form media-buying groups abroad, and some insiders believe the practice may ultimately spread to both the U.S. and Asia.  This year, Omnicom Group Inc., together with WPP Group PLC's Ogilvy Group Inc. and J. Walter Thompson Co., joined together to form Paris-based Media Partnership.  Interpublic Group of Cos. has allied with the media-buying affiliate of France's Publicis SA. British firms, including Saatchi & Saatchi PLC, have created their own media-buying companies and alliances, and more are in the works.  Fighting to stay ahead, Mr. Gross now is negotiating the acquisition of his company, Carat Holding SA, by London-based WCRS, which already owns 50% of the company.  Mr. Gross, his brother Francis and a few other associates would become WCRS's largest shareholders -- eventually acquiring as much as 29.9% of WCRS.  Both Gross brothers would also join the WCRS board.  WCRS, in turn, is planning to sell a majority of its ad-agency business -- which includes Della Femina McNamee WCRS -- to Paris-based Eurocom, a move that would allow it to concentrate on the media-buying business.  WCRS's discussions with Eurocom may be concluded by late this week and would result in Eurocom raising its 20% stake in the ad business to 60% to 70%, say executives close to the discussions.  Carat says that following its alliance with WCRS in April 1988, its European business has exploded.  This year, Carat officials expect their subsidiaries' and affiliates' bookings in five European countries outside France to quintuple to more than 11 billion francs ($1.7 billion) -- surpassing for the first time their total business within France.  Mr. Gross, who is publicity-shy, wasn't available to be interviewed for this story, and closely held Carat won't disclose profits.  But trade publications claim his gross profit margins approach 10%, well above the industry norm.  "We have made all our acquisitions without having to use outside funding," says Charles Hochman, who heads Carat International.  "You can say that we make a good living."  But when Mr. Gross started in 1969, he had to form his own company; the established players refused to back him.  Ad agencies were accustomed to buying media space themselves, customer by customer.  They wanted to keep the business.  They warned customers that the bargain-priced air time and magazine space would be second-class -- the leavings that couldn't be sold at normal prices.  And they said a go-between like Mr. Gross could ruin the secrecy of planned ad campaigns.  "The idea was controversial for a long time, because clients and agencies were worried about strategic leaks," explains Barry Hill, Paris-based European vice president at McCann-Erickson.  But many high-volume advertisers -- notably retail stores and food companies -- were willing to take the risk to cut prices.  Eventually, Mr. Gross's volume and discounts won out.  Even prestige clients decided that as long as Carat kept secret the contents of their planned campaigns, they could buy their time more cheaply through him and get the same media slots delivered by their agencies.  "The agencies are like big hospitals: They treat all patients," says Mr. Hochman of Carat.  "We are like surgeons who only treat injuries of the finger."  Coca-Cola Co., for example, still uses McCann-Erickson to design ad campaigns, but it now hires Mr. Gross to buy French ad space and time.  Carat says its 1,200 other customers include Fiat S.p.A., BSN SA, Gillette Co., Colgate-Palmolive Co. and Eastman Kodak Co.  As his volume grew, newspapers, magazines and radio and TV stations began coming to Mr. Gross, begging him to include them in his packages and offering top display at even better discounts.  The process shook the world's ad agencies.  Beginning in France, the biggest threw in the towel and created their own bulk-buying groups.  Carat's planned merger with WCRS comes as the bulk-buying boom seems to be taking off in other parts of Europe.  With the deregulation of radio and television, there has been a proliferation of new stations in France, West Germany, Britain and Spain.  They need advertisers, and the bulk buyers are ready.  Led by Carat, bulk buyers now have one-quarter of the Spanish ad market, and 15% in Britain and West Germany, says Mr. Scott of WCRS.  Moreover, Mr. Scott says the growth of powerful, internationally expanding media groups -- Italy's Berlusconi, West Germany's Bertelsmann, Britain's Maxwell Communication -- means that media buyers also must be big and international.  "The development of these all-powerful media groups is a trend that is going to put massive power in their hands, against the advertisers {Carat's clients}," says Mr. Scott.  "That force has to be met with force."  When will this business get to the U.S.?  "Our ambitions go well beyond Europe," says Mr. Hochman.  But he doesn't have any immediate plans to move into the U.S.  And for now, U.S. ad people say, American customers remain leery of dealing with anything but individual ad agencies.  Furthermore, U.S. networks forbid customers from reselling air time after they have bought it.  But some Carat officials speculate that, as the U.S. networks suffer financial problems, even they might be lured by the idea of large-scale ad sales through middlemen like Mr. Gross.  ---  Circuit City Account  Circuit City, a giant consumer electronics specialty retailer, awarded its $25 million account to J. Walter Thompson, New York.  Greg Jones, the company's vice president of advertising, said a decision hadn't yet been reached, but people close to the review said the account had been awarded to the WPP Group unit.  The account had previously been handled by Admarketing, a Los Angeles agency, but the two agreed to part when there was a difference in the direction of the advertising, Mr. Jones said yesterday.  The Richmond, Va., retailer, which has more than 120 stores nationwide, began the search earlier this year and initially considered 16 agencies.  Circuit City finally narrowed the search to just J. Walter Thompson and Young & Rubicam, both of which completed extensive creative speculative work for the pitch.  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   NBC STUDY: In the latest example of a network aiming to demonstrate that more people watch TV than Nielsen ratings suggest, General Electric's NBC unit yesterday released a study showing TV reaches at least 96% of all college students during a typical school week.  Some TV executives say the college market is underreported because the Nielsen Television Index counts only in-home audiences, not dormitories on campuses.  In its study, NBC found that daytime serials reach nearly 47% of all students; late-night entertainment programming reaches more than 49% of all students.  WHO'S NEWS: Stephen Harty, 37 years old, was named general manager of Ogilvy & Mather New York, a unit of WPP Group.  Mr. Harty succeeds Kenneth Caffrey, 51, who will devote full time to his continuing responsibilities as O&M's world-wide media director.  In the past 30 years, the geologic equivalent of a millisecond, one of man's most devastating assaults upon nature has destroyed what was once the world's fourth largest lake, the Aral Sea in Soviet Central Asia.  In the course of a generation, its level has fallen 40 feet -- losing one-third of its area and 60% of its volume.  Measured another way, the lost waters of the Aral Sea (called a sea because of its size and fierce storms) would fill Lake Erie.  As recently as 1973, the Aral Sea, straddling the border between the Soviet Central Asian republics of Kazakhstan and Uzbekistan, supported commercial shipping and a thriving fishing industry that supplied 10% to 15% of the Soviet Union's freshwater catch.  The major ports of Aral'sk in the northeast and Muynak in the south were linked by steamships that traveled the 220-mile-route between them.  By 1987 these once active ports were 25 to 30 miles from the receding water.  Rusting freighters and fishing boats littered the newly formed sand dunes nearby.  Fishermen cast their nets out for the last time in 1983.  Salinity, which had more than doubled, killed off most of the sea's aquatic life.  To preserve employment in Muynak and Aral'sk, the desert-bound canneries now process frozen fish shipped from the Atlantic and Pacific oceans.  Each year 47 million tons of dust and salt from the exposed bottom are blown over and deposited in the cotton fields and deserts surrounding the sea.  The salt, combined with enormous quantities of pesticides applied to the fields, makes a poisonous mixture.  Everything from drinking water to mothers' milk is contaminated.  A pipeline to bring drinkable water from afar is frantically under construction.  Infant mortality in the region has climbed to the highest levels in the world.  One of the greatest ecological disasters of the 20th century, it turns out, was no accident.  In the 1950s and 1960s, the Kremlin decided to make the Soviet Union a leading producer of cotton by dramatically expanding the area in Central Asia under irrigation and cultivation.  Some outspoken scientists and engineers expressed serious reservations about the wisdom of this plan.  But the leadership openly proclaimed that the Aral Sea, an oasis in the Soviet Union's most arid region, was a dispensable resource that could be bartered at cost for crops, especially cotton and rice.  "Glasnost" and rising environmental consciousness in the Soviet Union have revealed the terrible consequences of this miscalculation.  Soviet engineers and scientists were taught by Stalin to "make no small plans."  Three large deserts, the Kyzyl Kum, the Kara Kum and the Barsuki, surround the Aral Sea.  To turn them into fertile and productive land, the engineers built the 800-mile-long Kara Kum Canal, the linchpin of a woefully ill-conceived water redistribution plan.  By the late 1970s, this giant irrigation ditch was fully operational and siphoning off enormous quantities of one of the sea's two source rivers, the Amudarya.  This canal has poured so much water into the desert that the city of Ashkhabad has resorted to flood-control barriers for protection.  Withdrawals from the Amudarya and Syrdarya increased so much that not a drop of their water reached the sea in 1985-86.  In the finest traditions of Soviet monumentalism, several years ago another "nature-conquering" proposal was approved to fix the damage from the first project.  Dwarfing anything conceived by the Tennessee Valley Authority, plans were drawn up to divert portions of north-flowing Siberian rivers through a long and broad canal -- the Sibaral.  The water was to be pumped down more than 600 miles from the Ob-Irtysh system far to the northeast.  A rough analogy would be pumping the Mississippi waters at New Orleans up to irrigate West Texas.  This canal was to provide relief to water-deficient parts of Soviet Central Asia and replenish the Aral Sea, the plight of which had become painfully obvious to the three million people living in its environs.  Mikhail Gorbachev canceled this project early in his tenure as Communist Party general secretary, a decision hailed as a major victory for the fledgling Soviet environmental movement.  However, the unfolding ecological disaster that prompted the diversion scheme would not abate.  It now seems likely that the part of the Aral Sea that escapes desertification will be a mere cluster of lifeless, briny lakes by the year 2010.  To its credit, the Soviet government has belatedly taken several steps to repudiate its earlier positions, such as that of a deputy minister who asserted that "the Aral should die beautifully."  First, it declared the region an ecological disaster area.  Next, a resolution was passed last September mandating measures aimed at halting the region's environmental decline.  Since then, the Aral region has hosted at least two high-powered, high-profile groups of Soviet politicians, writers, scientists and lawyers.  For example, the ARAL-88 Expedition completed its 69-day mission to Soviet Central Asia last October.  The expedition, led by writer Grigoriy Reznichenko, submitted its report this May.  Previewing its conclusions, in an interview following the expedition, Mr. Reznichenko stated that "as a biological object the Aral Sea has perished."  Other conclusions: Life expectancy is plummeting in the region; infectious diseases, especially hepatitis, are nearing epidemic levels; and unemployment is on the rise with the loss of traditional local trades and professions.  At the Congress of Peoples' Deputies in Moscow in late spring, the Aral Sea disaster was one of the most frequently cited items on a long list of Soviet ecological calamities.  It is clear that some help is on the way.  However, given the persistent, expensive aftereffects of the Chernobyl nuclear plant explosion and the Armenian earthquake, the Soviets will be hard pressed to finance the rescue effort, estimated at 25 billion to 30 billion rubles.  Perhaps it would be best to do what one impassioned speaker at the Congress suggested: Make the restoration of the Aral Sea a critical project of international disaster relief.  ---  Mr. McClave is a research analyst in Soviet and East European affairs at the Library of Congress.  MIDLANTIC Corp., Edison, N.J., boosted its quarterly dividend 15%, to 47 cents a share, payable Oct. 16 to shares of record Oct. 2.  The bank holding company previously paid 41 cents quarterly.  The increase reflects the company's "continued strong financial performance," officials said.  CENTERIOR ENERGY Corp. said its Cleveland Electric Illuminating Co. unit redeemed $25 million of 14% first mortgage bonds due Sept. 15, 1991.  The utility holding company said the redemption is expected to save more than $2 million in interest costs over the next two years.  The move is part of the Cleveland company's cost-reduction program.  Boeing Co. said it signed a $117 million, four-year contract with the Republic of Indonesia to upgrade its three 737 surveillance aircraft used to patrol its economic zone.  Boeing said its Aerospace & Electronics unit will outfit the aircraft with maritime surveillance equipment, and that the first airplane is scheduled to be redelivered to the government in 1993.  Sunbelt Nursery Group Inc. said it is offering to purchase shares from stockholders who own fewer than 100.  The nursery retailer said it will pay $6 a share or the average closing stock price between Sept. 15 and Oct. 30, whichever is higher.  Each shareholder also will receive $15 for selling the stock to the company.  A Sunbelt spokesman said that about 2,000 to 2,500 of its stockholders own fewer than 100 shares, most of which probably were received when the company was spun off from Pier 1 Imports Inc. in 1985.  The company has about 3.8 million shares outstanding.  Canada's consumer price index rose a seasonally adjusted 0.1% in August from July, Statistics Canada, a federal agency, said.  The August rise followed increases of 0.7% in July and 0.6% in June.  The August rise was down from previous months mainly because of lower food and transportation prices.  The Medicare catastrophic illness insurance program, already under attack for its high premiums, is generating cost overruns that make some Pentagon cost excesses look modest by comparison.  Just one benefit in the new law -- expanded access to care in skilled-nursing facilities -- will cost an estimated $2.5 billion this year, 150% above the $1 billion estimated when Congress passed the law last year, according to projections by the Health Care Financing Administration, the agency in the Department of Health and Human Services that administers federal health insurance programs.  In fiscal 1990, which starts Oct. 1, skilled-nursing facility costs could run as high as $4.2 billion, compared with the $1.4 billion initially estimated, HCFA says.  And over five years, the cost could be as high as $15.9 billion, more than double the initial projection of $7.3 billion, the agency projects.  Looking back, Thomas Burke, who was chief of staff at the human services department when the "catastrophic" law passed, says analysts mistakenly assumed "that there would be no significant change in utilization as a result of expanded coverage," even though the history of federal health benefits shows that more coverage leads to greater participation.  The skyrocketing cost of skilled-nursing care has put Congress in a bind; while senior citizens are hammering Capitol Hill to reduce the unpopular income-tax surcharge that helps pay for catastrophic illness coverage, the costs of the coverage are rising out of control.  "People on the Hill really are shellshocked," says Sen. John D. Rockefeller IV (D., W.Va.)  Sen. Rockefeller, who is chairman of the Medicare subcommittee of the Senate Finance Committee, currently is in the middle of negotiations to save as much of the catastrophic plan as possible while yielding to demands to cut the unpopular premium.  It's likely that the skilled-nursing home benefits, which are designed for people who need special care while recovering from strokes, accidents and other illnesses, will be trimmed by the Finance Committee this week.  The catastrophic law expanded skilled-nursing care by:  -- Eliminating a requirement that only beneficiaries who have been hospitalized for three days before entering a skilled-nursing facility can qualify for benefits.  -- Lengthening covered stays to 150 days a year from 100 days an illness.  -- Reducing co-payment requirements.  As a result of the changes, many people who were already in nursing facilities, but didn't qualify for benefits, suddenly became eligible.  According to Linda Keegan of the American Health Care Association, a nursing home trade group, 57% of the people who became eligible for skilled nursing home care Jan. 1, when the provisions took effect, were already in such institutions.  Many of these patients shifted from less generous coverage under Medicaid, a joint state-federal program for the poor, to the more generous, all-federal Medicare program.  In addition, program analysts apparently didn't take sufficient account of changes Medicare already had made in 1988 to make it easier to get into skilled-nursing facilities.  As a result, even before the expanded benefits took effect, the number of patients receiving Medicare reimbursement for skilled-nursing care jumped to more than 350,000 last year from about 290,000 in 1987, according to HCFA figures.  The agency hasn't yet disclosed estimates of the patient population for this year, but they are certain to be significantly higher still.  The leading option for dealing with the soaring cost of the program is to restore the requirement that only those who have undergone three-day hospital stays will be covered.  Congress also could lower the length of stays that are covered, but since the average stay in a skilled-nursing facility was 28.5 days last year, that change would have less impact.  KMW Systems Corp. said it agreed in principle to be acquired by Andrew Corp. of Chicago for $5.25 a share, or about $12 million.  The maker of computer parts said that holders of 44% of its shares have agreed to sell their stock to Andrew for $5.25 a share.  In addition, the company has preliminarily agreed to grant Andrew an option to acquire unissued shares at $5.25 a share and to pay a break-up fee if the transaction isn't completed.  Newsote Inc. completed the acquisition of Pantasote Inc. for $13.70 a share, or $56 million.  Newsote is controlled by Jeffrey S. Podell, a New York attorney.  Pantasote makes industrial plastic products, including gaskets for refrigerator doors; wall coverings, plastic packaging and polyvinyl chloride compound, which is used in wire and cable.  Alliance Well Service Inc. said it purchased from its former lending banks eight well-servicing rigs and related equipment that it had been leasing from them.  It also said it sold branch operations in El Campo, Texas, and Lovington, N.M., to Pride Petroleum Services Inc., another well-servicing contractor.  Terms of the two transactions weren't disclosed.  General Electric Co. will redeem $100 million of 12 3/4% notes of its RCA Corp. subsidiary four years before maturity.  The company will redeem the notes Oct. 16; their maturity date is Oct. 15, 1992.  It will redeem them at face amount plus one day's accrued and unpaid interest from Oct. 15 to the redemption date.  Accrued semiannual interest due Oct. 15 will be paid to holders of record Oct. 1.  The trustee for the notes is Bank of New York.  Italy's foreign trade balance showed a surplus of 1.704 trillion lire ($1.2 billion) in July, up from a surplus of 1.050 trillion lire a year earlier, Istat said.  The state statistical office said the July surplus compared with a deficit of 941 billion lire in June.  While the trade balance for July improved, the trade account for the year's first seven months still deteriorated sharply.  Istat said the trade deficit for the first seven months of 1989 widened to 12.464 trillion lire from 7.403 trillion lire a year ago.  Istat said the trade statistics are provisional and aren't seasonally adjusted.  Matuschka Group, a fast-growing West German financial services firm, has recruited an imposing array of international allies to better compete against West Germany's big banks in Europe's shrinking financial market.  Matuschka, based in Munich and one of West Germany's few finance firms not affiliated with a bank, last week signed accords ceding small equity stakes in the group to six foreign financial firms, each to form the basis of mutual market access.  Chairman Albrecht Matuschka, the feisty aristocrat who founded the group 20 years ago, and the firm's 32 other stockholding partners issued new capital to reduce their combined stake in the private firm to 75%.  The remaining 25% was then parceled out to the six outside companies, although no single stake exceeded 5%.  Said Mr. Matuschka in an interview, "this gives us tremendous firepower while also maintaining our independence; something very rare in Germany."  The roster of Matuschka's new stockholders explains how:  -- Nomura International PLC, a subsidiary of Nomura Securities Co., a huge financial services firm.  The Japanese securities house already has a 25.1% interest in Matuschka's MAT Main Anlage Trust G.m.b.H. investment unit, and links Matuschka to Japanese companies seeking financial services in Europe.  -- GE Capital, a subsidiary of General Electric Co. of the U.S., with which Matuschka is to work on corporate acquisitions in German-speaking Europe.  Matuschka also is in talks with Kidder Peabody International, a U.S. subsidiary of GE Financial Services, for cooperation in trans-Atlantic acquisitions.  -- Suez International S.A., a unit of Compagnie Financiere de Suez of France., with which Matuschka already has joined in a joint venture for German-French mergers and acquisitions and investment trusts.  -- Charterhouse Bank Ltd. of the U.K., through the merchant bank's Perchdale Ltd. subsidiary.  Charterhouse, which in turn is owned by Royal Bank of Scotland, would be helpful in gaining Matuschka a beachhead in U.K. corporate finance markets.  -- Willowbridge Investments Ltd., an affiliate of Botts & Co. of the U.K., a specialized London investment and corporate finance firm in association with Allen & Co. of the U.S.S.  -- Akros International Holding S.A., a unit of Akros Finanziaria S.p.A of Italy, a leading Italian investment firm with which Matuschka already jointly markets investments to Italian investors.  Both also are cooperating in German-Italian mergers and acquisitions.s.  The financial details behind the strategic alliances weren't disclosed, keeping in line with Matuschka's secretive policies.  Past inquiries regarding Matuschka's fee income or the sums held in its trusts were similarly greeted by Mr. Matuschka's stock reply of "no figures."  The strategic alliances help disarm the one often-heard criticism of the Matuschka Group, which has only 400 employees: that it doesn't have the financial resources, the manpower or the global connections to be anything more than a niche player in West Germany's investment and corporate finance markets.  The transactions also give Matuschka insurance against getting boxed out and eventually swallowed up as Europe's financial industry accelerates preparations for an integrated financial market after 1992.  "We thought we had better to position ourselves with some strong friends because of the megalomania going on elsewhere," said Mr. Matuschka, a titled count whose lineage reaches back to the early Middle Ages.  His reference is clear.  West Germany's big banks, led by Deutsche Bank AG, have been aggressively acquiring smaller banks and financial services firms and forging cooperation pacts with others.  Several have set up new insurance arms and home financing units to blanket the markets with financial supermarkets.  Both a careful strategist and an unabashed critic of the big banks, Mr. Matuschka has emerged as a maverick in West Germany's clubby financial sector with extensive contacts to middle-sized companies, the bedrock of German industry.  "Matuschka was an excellent window for us.  There aren't many private, independent firms like it in Germany," said Roger Pilgrim, a director in Charterhouse's corporate finance division, which had been looking to expand its development capital operations in Germany.  "They also have professional and enthusiastic people from the top on down," Mr. Pilgrim said.  Mr. Matuschka, who is 45 years old, began his investment company in a back alley office in Munich in 1970.  Banking on his aristocratic title and his family's links with wealthy society, he built up his TRV investment management firm piece-by-piece in the shadow of an established West German financial industry dominated by the big "universal" banks.  They are so termed because of their legally uninhibited activities covering retail and commercial banking, securities and corporate finance and lately including management consulting and insurance.  Rockwell International Corp. said its Collins Defense Communications unit will cut back production operations at its facility here over the next six to nine months as contracts are completed or consolidated into other locations.  The production operations, which currently employ 500 people, will be cut back to 200 employees and restructured to provide systems integration and engineering development support to the unit's other operations in Richardson.  Collins Defense employs more than 1,900 persons at its command and control systems programs facility here.  Regarding your Aug. 31 editorial "Drugs: Why Not?": The drug war was lost before it began.  In a free society, people get what they want.  And what many of them want are drugs.  I was a teen-ager during the last years of Prohibition.  In those days pushers were gangsters, and the drug of choice was booze.  Same problems, same old story: bribing government officials, paying off police, killing innocent people, etc. History is repeating itself.  The same issue of your paper had an article on government use of the military against the import of drugs.  What a laugh.  What a waste of taxpayers' money.  The plan is doomed to failure.  People get what they want -- drugs.  With profits of 4,000% from field to user, nothing will stop the flow.  One day a mule driver in Colombia, next day a multimillionaire.  Little kids make several hundred dollars a day in inner cities pushing what people want -- drugs.  Two drugs causing most of our trouble today are tobacco and alcohol.  Consider this: More than 400,000 deaths annually from smoking-related diseases.  Untold thousands of deaths, misery and illness from alcohol.  The answer to our drug problem?  Put all drugs on the shelves of the local liquor store; there's one on almost any corner of any city.  Tax them, inspect them, guarantee dosages, ensure purity, and then use the profits from legitimate sales to educate the public to their dangers.  Byron E. Dillon  Downey, Calif.  ---  You claim that the poor are capable of governing themselves.  How about the people who aren't poor?  Are they capable of governing themselves?  Did those involved in the HUD, S&L and insider-trading scandals govern themselves?  Every culture has institutions that people look up to for leadership and guidance.  Some of the people this society rewards and looks up to have been CPAs, lawyers, managers of our banks, managers of the S&Ls, investment bankers and managers of brokerage houses.  We also have looked up to the institutions that regulate and govern these individuals.  Did they govern themselves properly?  How can you editorialize that the poor can govern themselves?  The poor do not read the Journal -- those who do read the Journal apparently cannot govern themselves.  Ray Stahl Port Angeles, Wash.  ---  You assert an interesting premise, i.e., "Instead of blaming foreigners and drugs for the drug problem, Mr. Bush could be the first President to hold drug users responsible for their immoral behavior."  Agreed.  You err, however, when you interpret the logical methodology for the implementation of this philosophy to be stricter enforcement.  If drug use is as onerous as you imply, is not the user's self-inflicted devastation a sufficient punishment?  And what if such self-destruction does not provide a satisfactory deterrent; does it make sense to try to find a jail sentence cruel enough to impede one's urge to use drugs?  This nation's neurotic obsession with saving drug users from themselves by use of force is a far greater threat to everyone's life, liberty and pursuit of happiness than any Colombian drug lord profiteering from the black market our government has created.  Randy Young  Santa Ana, Calif.  ---  Let me get this straight.  You write, "It is simply ridiculous to say that people are incapable of governing themselves."  And at the same time you advocate having government make decisions for people by "forcing users into treatment programs and dealers into boot camps."  So make up your mind.  Are people responsible for their own lives or not?  David R. Henderson  Pacific Grove, Calif.  The New York Stock Exchange said a seat was sold for $500,000, down from $525,000 in the previous sale Sept. 6.  Seats currently are quoted at $450,000 bid and $575,000 asked.  Separately, the American Stock Exchange said a seat was sold for $165,000, down from $180,000 in the previous sale July 28.  Amex seats currently are quoted at $160,000 bid and $180,000 asked.  Time Warner Inc. said it will create its first trade magazine by spinning off a physicians' version of its 50%-owned bimonthly consumer health and fitness magazine, Hippocrates.  Time Inc. Magazine, the wholly owned subsidiary of Time Warner, said that, starting with its January 1990 issue, the consumer version of Hippocrates will change its name to In Health magazine.  The company will publish Hippocrates as a more specialized trade magazine directed at physicians and drawing primarily pharmaceutical advertising.  Both will be monthly by 1991.  Time Warner owns a 50% share of the Sausalito, Calif.-based Hippocrates, and has an option to buy the other half in 1991.  Three-year-old Hippocrates is one of several Time Warner publishing joint ventures, but it is the first magazine joint venture that has produced a spinoff publication.  The creation of Hippocrates as a trade magazine is a move by Time Warner to cash in on the lucrative pharmaceutical advertising market.  According to Medical Marketing & Media, a trade publication, in 1988 medical advertising in trade magazines totaled $550 million, of which pharmaceutical ads represented $400 million.  The consumer market for prescription drugs is estimated at $50 billion.  Pharmaceutical advertising by product is barred by federal law in consumer magazines, though Hippocrates and other consumer magazines are allowed to carry corporate-image ads from the companies.  Time has avoided trade-magazine publishing, considering it reliable but not as financially rewarding as consumer magazines.  Christopher Meigher, executive vice president and group publisher of Time magazines, said spinning off Hippocrates wasn't an indication Time Warner was making a wholesale move into trade magazines.  However, he said Time Warner could explore trade spinoffs of existing titles, such as a magazine for top financial executives derived from Time Warner's Money magazine.  Although Hippocrates has won two National Magazine awards in two years, the name has generally been a difficult sell to a wide consumer audience.  Mr. Meigher said he is hoping to accelerate the circulation growth with the In Health name.  Hippocrates, subtitled "The magazine of health & medicine," has paid circulation of about 400,000, in addition to 125,000 copies sent free to doctors' waiting rooms.  "You hate to mess with a success, but we think that with the name In Health we'll have greater success in developing circulation," said Mr. Meigher.  "We can go further with that name than with Hippocrates.  In Health gives us more accessibility."  In Health will have stiff competition from a group of more established health-related magazines, such as American Health Partners' American Health, Family Media Inc.'s Health, Rodale Press's Prevention, Conde Nast Publications' Self, and Weider Publications' Shape magazine.  Hippocrates will carry largely pharmaceutical ads directed at 120,000 physicians -- including general and family practitioners, internists, and cardiologists -- who will receive it free.  The new Hippocrates will have editorial matter similar to In Health, but with some added features that address physicians' interests.  "We found physicians were reading our magazine like crazy because it helped them keep up with patients," said Eric Schrier, Hippocrates' founder and editor.  "We had a great franchise with the consumer, but we found we could expand it by using the Hippocrates name to attract doctors."  Switzerland's trade deficit widened sharply in August to 1.44 billion Swiss francs ($846.2 million) from a revised 662 million francs in July, the government said.  In August 1988, the deficit was 1.21 billion francs.  Imports in August slipped to 7.07 billion francs from a revised 7.64 billion francs in July, while exports tumbled to 5.63 billion francs from a revised 6.97 billion francs in July.  Panhandle Eastern Corp. said it agreed to sell its downtown real estate for about $400 million to JMB Realty Corp. of Chicago, capping off more than $2.4 billion of asset disposals.  Panhandle inherited the real estate -- including three office buildings, a shopping mall and a hotel -- from Texas Eastern Corp., which Panhandle acquired earlier this year for $3.22 billion.  Since then, Panhandle, a large natural-gas pipeline company, has been selling off assets to reduce debt.  The largest single asset shed was a package of North Sea oil properties that went for $961 million.  "We're done with the big-ticket items," Panhandle Chairman Robert D. Hunsucker said in an interview following announcement of the real-estate sale.  "We've got some other things to sell but not of that magnitude."  Mr. Hunsucker said Panhandle plans to sell by year end smaller assets he valued at about $150 million -- the largest of which is a 50,000-barrel-a-day oil refinery.  He expects that sale to close by Oct. 1.  Panhandle recently pre-paid a $1.7 billion bridge loan used for the Texas Eastern acquisition, leaving it with about $1.2 billion of takeover-related debt.  "We'll be chipping away on that," Mr. Hunsucker said.  Panhandle's Houston real estate, which includes large undeveloped acreage fronting the city convention center, sold much quicker than expected.  Panhandle said the long-depressed Houston market improved enough this year to generate more interest than anticipated.  Some real-estate experts suggested that with Houston real estate showing signs of recovery, it wouldn't be sensible for the company to be a seller now.  "It wouldn't if we were in the real-estate business," Mr. Hunsucker countered.  "But we're in the pipeline business."  He added, "We just did not have the luxury of time."  Panhandle's only sizable asset not part of the gas-pipeline business is a petroleumproducts pipeline.  Although Mr. Hunsucker maintained that wasn't for sale, he said he has had many inquiries about it.  He placed its value "probably north of $600 million."  The buyer of Panhandle's Houston properties, JMB Realty, is a real-estate investment, development and management firm.  Assets in its own portfolio and those it manages for affiliates total more than $20 billion, Panhandle said.  Texas Eastern's corporate headquarters has been in one of the sold office buildings.  Panhandle said it will relocate personnel there to its headquarters during a three-year period.  The merged company will have reduced the number of employees by around 600 people to 2,200 by year's end, Mr. Hunsucker said.  Mr. Hunsucker said the company is open to other acquisition possibilities but wasn't looking under rocks to find them.  "I'm like one of those big snakes," he said.  "I don't need to eat every month.  I need a little time for the digestion process."  I was very concerned to see a table entitled "The World-Wide Tax Revolution" showing an inaccurate figure for the top rate of personal income tax in the U.K. (editorial page, Aug. 29).  The past five years have seen a dramatic reduction in U.K. tax rates.  The main rate of corporate tax has been reduced to 35%, which is one of the lowest rates in the industrialized world.  The rate is even lower for small companies with taxable profits of up to #750,000.  There also has been a significant reduction in personal tax rates in this period.  The basic personal tax rate is 25% with a single higher rate of only 40%.  This top rate of 40% is the lowest top rate in the European Community.  Nicholas Mc Innes  Consul (Inward Investment) Invest In Britain Bureau  British Consulate-General  New York  Northern Telecom Ltd. said it signed a $38 million contract to supply Jamaica Telephone Co., Kingston, Jamaica, with telecommunications equipment.  Installation is scheduled to begin before year's end and to be completed by August 1991.  Northern Telecom supplies digital telecommunications systems.  Investor Russell C. Chambers raised his stake in Gencor Industries Inc. to 9.56% of the common shares outstanding, a Securities and Exchange Commission filing said.  In Orlando, Fla., Gencor Vice President John Elliott said Mr. Chambers had been purchasing stock all summer and that he was "not surprised" that Mr. Chambers's stake had reached 9.56%.  In May, Chambers disclosed he held a 5.45% stake in Gencor and said he had requested information from the company, including a list of shareholders.  Chrysler Corp. slapped discounts as high as $2,000 on 1990-model pickup trucks that still lack final prices and are only now arriving in dealer showrooms.  The move illustrates how irrelevant final sticker prices are becoming on new cars and trucks.  For several years, the Big Three auto makers have inflated new model-year prices to account for later rebates.  But rarely have rebates hit new vehicles before the model year begins or official prices are announced.  General Motors Corp. set a $750 cash rebate on its 1990 Chevrolet Lumina sedan, and an $800 rebate on its 1990 Geo Prizm car earlier this month.  But both models were introduced as 1990 models in the middle of the 1989 model year.  Although Chrysler has enjoyed considerable success with its Jeep sport utility vehicles and minivans, its Dodge pickups have lagged behind GM's recently redesigned full-size pickups and Ford Motor Co.'s F-series light trucks.  The rebates on the 1988, 1989 and 1990-model Dodge trucks range from $500 on the Dakota S pickup to $2,000 on the two-wheel and four-wheel drive Dodge 100, 150, 250 and 350 pickups.  Chrysler also sweetened rebates on several 1988 and 1989-model cars and trucks, including many of the imported cars and trucks it sells.  The increased rebates range from $500 on some Plymouth and Dodge Colt imported subcompacts to $2,500 on the Dodge Raider imported sport utility vehicle.  Previous rebates on those models had been $300 and $2,000 respectively.  Rebates increased to as much as $2,000 on two of Chrysler's U.S.-built 1988 and 1989-model cars.  Under the new incentive program, which began Saturday, rebates on the Chrysler LeBaron, excluding the convertible model, jumped to $2,000 from $1,500; rebates on the Dodge Daytona coupe increased to $1,500 from $1,000.  Chrysler said it will continue to offer cut-rate financing ranging from interest-free, 24-month loans to 11.9% on 60-month terms.  The U.S. Food and Drug Administration approved Merck & Co.'s new ulcer drug, Losec, for limited use in treating rare disorders caused by gastrointestinal acid.  The FDA decided to initially restrict Losec's use until Merck conducts extensive studies regarding the drug's long-term safety.  Losec is expected eventually to gain wide use in treating mild to severe ulcers and to provide an alternative to Tagamet and Zantac, the most commonly prescribed medicines, which have combined world-wide sales of about $3 billion.  The FDA approval for Losec only allows its use in treating inflammations of the esophagus and stomach lining, which cause a symptom similar to severe heartburn, and in treating a rare condition, known as Zollinger-Ellison Syndrome, caused by excessive secretion of gastric acids.  In March, an advisory committee to the FDA recommended the restricted approval because an early study of the drug in laboratory animals produced some cases of cancer.  Human studies have yet to uncover such problems, but the FDA advisory group said it nonetheless wanted lengthier safety studies.  Analysts who follow the pharmaceutical industry expect Losec eventually to gain approval for wider use.  Merck said it expects to present safety data to the FDA next year.  Robert Uhl, an analyst with Salomon Bros., said that even with the FDA restrictions, many doctors will begin using the drug to treat patients whose ulcers don't respond to Tagamet or Zantac.  Once a drug is approved for sale, doctors could prescribe it for ulcers.  Merck, however, isn't permitted to market Losec to doctors as a common ulcer treatment.  Mr. Uhl said Losec may generate $100 million in sales for Merck in 1990, rising to $400 million by 1992 if the FDA lifts its restrictions.  Losec, known also by the generic name omeprazole, was developed by a division of Swedish drug maker AB Astra, which sells the drug in about 10 European countries.  Rahway, N.J.-based Merck holds only the U.S. marketing rights to the drug.  A European study, published January in the New England Journal of Medicine, said Losec healed a greater proportion of ulcers faster and kept them healed longer than Zantac, which is sold by Glaxo PLC of Great Britain.  Sources close to the FDA said the agency is impressed by Losec's effectiveness and is worried that if the FDA granted an unrestricted approval, doctors might use the drug in great numbers before a fuller safety profile is produced.  The FDA "hopes the limited label will keep use down until everyone is more comfortable with the drug," the FDA source said.  Amcor Ltd., a paper and packaging concern, said it is buying three Australian corrugated cardboard box plants from Smorgon Consolidated Industries, a closely held concern.  The price wasn't disclosed.  Garry Ringwood, general manager of Amcor's APM Packaging division, said the three new plants will lift Amcor's production to about 315,000 metric tons of corrugated cardboard a year from around 250,000 currently.  Two of the plants are in Melbourne and the other is in Sydney.  The Treasury plans to raise $75 million in new cash Thursday by selling about $9.5 billion in 52-week bills and redeeming $9.42 billion in maturing bills.  The bills will be dated Sept. 28 and will mature Sept. 27, 1990.  Tenders for the bills, available in minimum denominations of $10,000, must be received by 1 p.m. EDT Thursday at the Treasury or at Federal Reserve banks or branches.  Designcraft Industries Inc. said its annual shareholders meeting was adjourned until Oct. 13 because of a lack of a quorum.  Holders had been scheduled to vote Friday on proposals to increase the authorized shares of the maker of jewelry parts to 10 million from four million, to authorize 500,000 shares of $50 par value preferred, to give directors the power to adopt, amend or repeal its bylaws, to appoint BDO Seidman as an independent accountant and to vote on director candidates.  A Wesleyan University student filed suit against his school and 11 other private colleges seeking damages on behalf of thousands of students hurt in an alleged tuition price-fixing scheme.  The suit, filed in U.S. District Court in New York, was the first in what could be a series of actions by students at schools whose practices of setting tuitions, financial-aid awards and salaries are under Justice Department scrutiny.  The legal action complicates the settlement hopes of some of the schools, who have been counting on resolving the federal case without a trial.  The student, Roger Kingsepp, said the defendants, representing "the market of Ivy League and upper-echelon schools," have "engaged in a conspiracy to fix or artificially inflate the price of tuition and financial aid."  The suit seeks triple damages under federal anti-price-fixing laws for overcharges, on behalf of a class of all students who were allegedly harmed by the scheme.  The defendants named by Mr. Kingsepp -- including all eight Ivy League schools -- have each received civil investigative demands for financial information from the Justice Department.  The 12 defendant schools enroll about 125,000 students.  They include Wesleyan and Yale University, both in Connecticut; Amherst College, Harvard University, and Williams College, in Massachusetts; and Columbia and Cornell universities in New York.  Also named were Brown University, Providence, R.I.; Dartmouth College, Hanover, N.H.; Princeton University, in New Jersey; Stanford University, Palo Alto, Calif.; and the University of Pennsylvania, in Philadelphia.  Late Friday, a Wesleyan spokesman said the university hadn't seen the suit, but believed it "to be without merit" based on a description of the allegations.  All the other defendants either couldn't be reached for comment, or declined comment because they hadn't seen the suit.  Mr. Kingsepp charged that the defendants engage in exchanges of information "that are routine, systematic and designed to eliminate any real price choices" for students.  The lawsuit heavily cited practices and documents disclosed originally in this newspaper, including an internal Wesleyan rundown of proposed 1988-89 charges at competitor schools.  The document stated that the information was confidential and obtained before schools made their final decisions on tuition charges.  Except Stanford, every school named in the lawsuit also participates in an "overlap" practice that establishes financial aid awards for students who are admitted.  The lawsuit called the practice, which results in identical family expenses no matter where the student goes, as "unlawful."  It didn't set a specific figure for the damages it seeks.  The Justice Department, meanwhile, has widened the scope of its probe significantly -- and may broaden it even further.  Last week, it acknowledged sending a second wave of civil-investigative demands, after disclosing in August that the requests had gone to about 20 schools.  A Justice Department spokesperson said more requests may still be made.  So far, at least 27 schools have acknowledged getting the requests, including the defendants in Mr. Kingsepp's suit, the University of Chicago, Johns Hopkins University in Baltimore, and several women's colleges.  Consolidated Edison Co. of New York said it would remove all asbestos from steam system manholes by late 1990 following a recent pipe blast here that spewed the cancer-causing substance into the air.  The utility said it was acting on the recommendation of a team investigating the accident in the Gramercy Park area of Manhattan.  About 1,000 of the 1,700 manholes in the steam system already have been cleared of asbestos since the company stopped using it as an insulator in 1975.  Con Edison said it usually replaces the asbestos with calcium silicate.  Greyhound Corp.'s Dial unit said it reached an out-of-court settlement with Softsoap Enterprises Inc., the Colgate-Palmolive Co. unit it had sued for false advertising last week.  Dial alleged Softsoap had made false claims about the mildness of its antibacterial liquid soap compared with Dial's.  Terms of the settlement weren't disclosed.  Colgate-Palmolive officials couldn't be reached for comment.  South Korean businesses substantially increased their overseas investments during 1989 in efforts to find new export markets, the Bank of Korea said.  The bank said overseas investment for the first eight months of this year reached $453.8 million invested in 235 projects.  That compared with $180.3 million invested in 149 projects during the whole of 1988, the bank said.  Among the various projects, Southeast Asia, mainly Indonesia and Thailand, attracted 120 projects worth $148.5 million, the bank said.  South Korean firms invested $158.4 million in 49 projects in North America and $62.8 million in 25 projects in Latin America, it said.  Europe attracted 16 investment projects worth $19.4 million, the bank said.  The government, which must approve overseas investment, has relaxed its regulations, allowing greater overseas investment, the bank noted.  South Korean businesses increased overseas investments seeking new markets to help offset export losses caused by the rising value of the South Korean won, the bank said.  Most of the investments involved manufacturing and trading companies, it said.  First Union Real Estate Investments said it would post a third-quarter gain of $8.9 million, or 50 cents a share, on the sale of an Atlanta office building.  The trust earned $5.4 million, or 29 cents a share, in the third quarter last year.  First Union said proceeds from the sale will be used to improve the company's borrowing position by reducing outstanding short-term debt.  France and other European Community countries are hoping for a breakthrough today on the controversial issue of widening EC Commission powers over corporate mergers.  Officials said that although a final accord may not come before year end, the 12 EC governments have reached broad agreement on the size of the mergers that would be subject to approval.  Despite reservations on some parts of the plan, a compromise could be reached at today's Council of Ministers meeting, a commission spokesman said.  The plan, which was first put forth more than 15 years ago, would give the commission power to review and block large transborder mergers.  Currently, the commission can intervene only after the merger has taken place and if a complaint is filed under the Treaty of Rome's antitrust rules.  Under the compromise pushed by France and the commission, the commission would review mergers of companies with global combined revenue of more than five billion European currency units ($5.27 billion).  That threshold would be reduced to two billion ECUs by the end of 1992.  If two-thirds of the combined revenue is in a single EC country, the country would retain its regulatory powers over the merger, a commission spokesman said.  The commission would give an initial opinion within one month and issue a definitive decision within two months.  Air France and Lufthansa of West Germany unveiled a wide-ranging cooperation accord apparently aimed at reinforcing their mutual market positions ahead of Western European airline deregulation.  In announcing the pact, which they termed a "commercial agreement," the two carriers said they will begin talks with the Spanish state airline Iberia about reaching a similar accord.  In Brussels, a spokesman for the European Community Commission said the commission "certainly will be looking for notification" of the terms of the agreement "so we'll know for sure whether it raises questions" in the field of EC antitrust law.  Air France and Lufthansa announced they will look for ways to work together in cargo, pilot training, aircraft acquisitions, marketing, catering and duty-free sales.  Sharing of traffic rights on some joint flights wasn't ruled out, but cross-shareholdings were.  The carriers stressed that the accord "doesn't exclude any alliances with other airlines in the world," and they claimed it will result in benefits for consumers.  Bernard Attali, Air France chairman, dismissed any potential problems with EC competition law.  "It's our right to work with a privileged partner," he said.  Similarly, Lufthansa Chairman Heinz Ruhnau said he doesn't foresee any need to seek the blessing of the EC for such joint activities.  Ferruzzi Finanziaria S.p.A. said it is reorganizing its international commodity trading operations in Paris, two months after being forced to liquidate multimillion dollar soybean futures positions at a loss on the Chicago Board of Trade.  The Italian conglomerate said it named Romano Venturi, managing director of the company's Ferruzzi Italia unit, head of the new trading operations.  Ferruzzi also said that as part of the restructuring the trading unit would work more closely with Ferruzzi's agricultural businesses, including Central Soya, a U.S. soybean processor it purchased in 1987.  Ferruzzi confirmed that three officers of Ferruzzi France have announced their resignations as a result of the reorganizations.  The three, as previously reported, are Rolland Gagliardini and Frank Gleeson, the former head of trading and the top trader in Paris, respectively, and Maurice Elbaz, another trader.  Ferruzzi was at the center of an international trading controversy in July when it lost a showdown with the Board of Trade and was forced to sell off huge futures holdings that called for the delivery of 23 million bushels of soybeans.  Ferruzzi has denied that its traders were trying to manipulate soybean futures and cash prices upward by holding such a large futures position.  Jean Claude Leny, chairman and chief operating officer of Framatome S.A., a French nuclear power engineering concern, said the company will invest more than $50 million in a new U.S. joint venture that will provide high-technology products and services for U.S. nuclear power plants.  At a news conference here, officials of Framatome and Babcock & Wilcox, a subsidiary of McDermott International Inc., announced the formation of B&W Nuclear Service Co., based in Lynchburg, Va.  Officials of Babcock & Wilcox declined to say how much capital the U.S. company would provide, but they acknowledged that Framatome is, in effect, buying "a piece" of the McDermott affiliate, which has contracts with a number of utilities to provide nuclear power plant engineering services.  Babcock & Wilcox already has an agreement wth Framatome and other companies in the French nuclear power industry to market fuels for light-water reactor power plants through B&W Fuel Co., which was formed in 1987.  Charles W. Pryor, Jr., vice president and general manager of the Babcock & Wilcox nuclear power division, will be president of the new nuclear service company.  He said B&W plans future cooperative efforts with French and West German companies to develop and market commercial reactors in North America.  This cooperation will involve B&W and Nuclear Power International, a joint venture that Framatome set up last April with the KWU Group of Siemens AG of West Germany.  Mr. Pryor said the partnership with Framatome in B&W Nuclear Service Co. will involve shared investments in new products and technologies, coordinated research and development programs, and use of Framatome's experience in the construction and servicing of nuclear power plants.  Mr. Pryor said 54 U.S. utilities currently are operating 113 licensed nuclear power plants with more than 100,000 megawatts of installed capacity and another 10 plants are under construction.  "We estimate that over $2.5 billion was spent last year on purchased nuclear services," he said, adding that about $1 billion of that was spent for the type of services "for which our new company will compete."  Several other U.S. companies, including Westinghouse Electric Corp., General Electric Co. and Combustion Engineering Inc., as well as several engineering companies and numerous medium-sized specialty concerns, also are competing for contracts to provide products and technical services required in the operation of commercial nuclear power plants.  Frequent-flier programs are about to take another hit.  In a surprise move, Hertz Corp. said it is dropping out of the programs, and other major car rental companies said they are considering following the industry leader.  The move further dilutes the value of these once lucrative programs; airlines and their hotel partners have been cutting back on awards and imposing new restrictions.  "This is just going to make the programs even less attractive," said John Holland, publisher of the Business Flyer, a trade newsletter.  "You used to be able to get a whole vacation package.  Now it's a lot less."  Currently, most car rental companies and hotels have marketing agreements with airlines under which frequent fliers earn awards not only by flying but also by renting cars and staying in hotels.  The awards include free or discounted airline tickets, hotel stays and rental cars.  But airlines started cutting back on the programs a few years ago because they were forced to give out too many free trips as the programs grew in popularity.  Hertz said it is having a similar problem.  It said the rate of growth of mileage points issued has doubled in each of the past two years.  The value of those redeemed awards topped $15 million last year.  In addition, Hertz said it paid $20 million in fees to airlines to participate in the programs.  With such costs, there was "no payback" from the program, said Brian J. Kennedy, Hertz's executive vice president, marketing and sales.  The New York company said that at year end it will drop its marketing agreements with Delta Air Lines, America West Airlines, Continental Airlines and Eastern Airlines.  Frequent fliers have until Dec. 31 to earn mileage from these carriers for Hertz coupons, and will have a year after that to use those coupons.  Hertz also plans to discontinue its other partnerships -- with American Airlines, United Airlines and USAir -- after Dec. 31.  The company wouldn't say when those partnerships will be discontinued, although it said it wouldn't be soon.  Hertz's decision surprised some airlines.  America West's agreement with Hertz had just gone into effect this month.  "Obviously, senior management made a decision to abruptly do an about-face," said Michael Leonard, director of sales programs at America West, a regional carrier based in Phoenix, Ariz.  Still, most airlines said they would replace Hertz with another partner, or noted that they already have several car rental partners.  But while some smaller car rental companies plan to stay in the programs, it is no longer clear what the majors will do.  Avis Inc.'s chairman, Joseph Vittoria, said the company is rethinking its plans and "isn't interested in picking up what they {Hertz} discard."  Budget Rent a Car Corp. said it is evaluating its options and a spokesman for National Car Rental System Inc. said it is "studying the implications" of Hertz's plans.  Analysts said Hertz's decision to abandon frequent-flier partnerships is part of an effort among most major car rental companies to cut costs.  Many of these companies carry heavy debt because of buy-outs in the past few years.  What's more, the car rental business hasn't been strong this year because high air fares cut down on airport customers.  Boeing Co. is in negotiations with the Turkish government to build between 50 and 100 Chinook helicopters in that country, the Puget Sound (Wash.) Business Journal reported.  The newest version of the Chinook, the CH-47D, costs about $15 million each, giving the total deal a potential value of $750 million or more.  The U.S. Army has purchased 472 of the twin-rotor helicopters, or about half the world fleet, during the past two decades.  But as the cost of the Chinook has risen, the Army has been refurbishing its existing helicopters rather than purchasing new ones, and the aerospace firm has had to look elsewhere for buyers.  The talks were disclosed by Turkish Ambassador Nuzhet Kandemir, who was in Seattle earlier this month for a trade conference.  Burl Zorn, Boeing Helicopters' area-sales director for the Middle East, also confirmed that the Turkish government had inquired about building the helicopters under some form of co-production agreement, the newspaper said.  Boeing already has an agreement under which F-16 fighter planes are being built in Turkey.  A version of the Chinook is being built in Japan under a co-production agreement, but it is limited to the Japanese market.  However, Mr. Kandemir said he hopes any agreement with Boeing would allow Turkey to eventually export Chinooks built there, the newspaper said.  Officials in Beijing have intensified their efforts to regain authority over China's two most independent-minded and economically liberal provinces, Guangdong and Hainan.  The officials are using two tactics.  One is to offer Guangdong's governor a job in Beijing that would represent a promotion but would at the same time remove him from a position in which he was ignoring central-planning directives.  The other is to step up a drive that is aimed ostensibly at fighting graft at the highest levels in Guangdong and Hainan but that several sources say is actually geared to removing cadres who have opposed the central government's hard-line stance on political and economic policy.  Last week, Beijing dismissed Liang Xiang, the boldly reformist governor of the island province of Hainan, supposedly for abusing his office for personal gain.  But the 70-year-old Mr. Liang was closely associated with ousted Communist Party chief Zhao Ziyang, who named him governor of Hainan last year.  He had been a zealous advocate of Mr. Zhao's liberal economic reforms, often moving ahead of Beijing in innovative development programs.  More than any other provinces, Guangdong and Hainan have benefited from the decentralization policy carried out by Mr. Zhao, who lost his job in June after refusing to use force against pro-democracy demonstrators in Tiananmen Square.  Several provinces have been allowed to retain a bigger share of profit tax instead of handing over most of their income to the central government.  Profit distribution between these provinces and Beijing has long been a source of conflict and is especially so now because the central government is strapped for cash.  These provinces also have been allowed to raise funds in Hong Kong and elsewhere, with Hainan and Guangdong taking the most advantage of this.  Instead of relying on allocations from Beijing, the two provinces have generated their own funds to finance development and increasingly looked to capitalist Hong Kong, not Beijing, as their beacon of development.  Such stirrings of regionalism trouble Beijing's hard-liners, who have consolidated power after the democracy movement was suppressed in June.  They are moving to bring these provinces back into the socialist orbit.  "The signs are there that the tension between Beijing and Guangdong is escalating," says a Hong Kong businessman with access to senior officials in the province.  "Beijing leaders apparently want to remove cadres they don't like and replace them with their cronies in order to whip the province into line."  The action in Guangdong also is viewed by analysts as the Beijing hard-liners' pre-emptive strike against a possible alliance between dissenting generals in the province, one of China's seven major military bases, and influential regional leaders.  Dissenting voices in the south have grown since the June 4 Tiananmen massacre, but they are too weak for any open confrontation, and Chinese analysts say Beijing is taking steps to quiet even those voices.  According to two sources familiar with Guangdong affairs, Beijing leaders last month offered Ye Xuanping, Guangdong's governor, a more-senior post in the capital.  Several jobs were offered, including a place in the cabinet, a post that would have brought with it responsibility for overseeing Hong Kong and Macao.  Beijing's offer was aimed at removing the governor from his lock on power in Guangdong, the sources say.  Son of the late Marshal Ye Jianying, the man who paved the way for Deng Xiaoping's re-emergence to power in 1977, Mr. Ye maintains close ties to the military.  It is because of this that Beijing feels the need to tread softly in removing the governor from his power base.  "Keeping Ye in the south is like feeding a tiger at your doorstep," says one of the two sources.  Both sources say Mr. Ye is reluctant to accept the offer and is likely to use his influence to turn it down.  If that happens, it isn't clear whether Beijing would force the governor to resign or offer him an even better job.  Under the autonomous four-year rule of Mr. Ye, Guangdong has flourished by ignoring central-planning directives.  More recently, Mr. Ye has told Guangdong officials that he favors lifting martial law in Beijing, arguing that it is bad for business in the south.  Last month, he made an unsuccessful pitch to Premier Li Peng to end martial law.  Within Guangdong -- and in contrast to Beijing and Shanghai -- the governor has shown tolerance and restraint toward dissidents.  There were no sweeping arrests in the province of dissidents for organizing the mass pro-democracy demonstrations in June and July.  Apparently dissatisfied with the governor's liberal stand, Beijing sent a team of officials to Canton's Zhongshan University last month to investigate students and teachers.  Meanwhile, Beijing is stepping up what it describes as a nationwide drive to combat graft at the highest level of government.  While Beijing is keen to restore the government's credibility, which was badly eroded by the June massacre, several Chinese sources say the campaign is aimed primarily at removing cadres who have flouted the central government's directives.  And nowhere in China have provincial officials operated with more autonomy than Guangdong and Hainan.  Liang Xiang, Hainan's governor, provides a striking example.  Chinese sources said Beijing was especially angered by Mr. Liang's open support for Mr. Zhao's liberal stance toward the student pro-democracy movement.  Xu Shijie, the Hainan party secretary, disclosed the decision by the State Council, China's cabinet, to oust Mr. Liang at a meeting of the provincial People's Congress on Wednesday, according to the official China News Agency.  In an apparent attempt to dampen speculation about the motive for the firing, Hainan party secretary Xu Shijie took pains to explain that the dismissal involved Mr. Liang's "personal" problems and wasn't related to the ouster of Mr. Zhao.  The State Council said Mr. Liang had allowed his wife and children to rake in huge profits from their businesses in Hainan.  Mr. Liang also abused his power by obtaining a permit for his son to stay in Hong Kong, the council said.  Mr. Liang had experimented with aggressive economic reforms on the tropical island province, including leasing a large tract of land for development to Kumagai Gumi (Hong Kong) Ltd., which is 35%-owned by the big Japanese construction company Kumagai Gumi Co.  The project, which has faced stiff opposition from party conservatives in Beijing, who deem it a form of colonial subservience, has been delayed.  Central government investigators have centered their probe on Mr. Liang's ties to Zhao Erjun, the second of the former Communist Party chief's four sons.  Mr. Zhao operated a real estate company that had allegedly speculated in Hainan property, another Chinese source says.  Mr. Liang is suspected of approving the speculation.  A second probe instigated by Beijing involves Yu Fei, one of Guangdong's six vice governors.  He is being scrutinized for his alleged tilt toward "bourgeois liberalism," or corrupt Western influences, which hardliners blame for China's political turmoil.  Mr. Yu, who has a reputation among foreign businessmen of being a born deal maker, is renowned for pushing ahead with bold reform measures even when Beijing hasn't declared its position.  Mr. Yu also is being investigated for allegedly accepting bribes and for his links to his chief economic aide, Xu Yunian.  Mr. Xu, Guangdong's top foreign-trade official, was sacked earlier this month for squandering public funds on luxuries such as Volvo cars and mobile telephones.  Chinese analysts don't expect the anticorruption purge to be sweeping, but those few people from whom Beijing is gunning are prominent figures.  "It's not accidental that those being purged fall in the same category; that is they have owed their ascent to either Mr. Zhao or his liberal economic reform policies," says a Hong Kong businessman.  The torrid Mojave sun must have addled Eileen White Read on her visit to the new Patton museum ("The Gallery: Celebrating the Frontier Fable," Leisure & Arts, Aug. 31).  Field Marshal Erwin Rommel was the "Desert Fox," not "Hitler's Desert Rat."  Also, Patton's two pistols, a Colt .45 automatic and a .357 Magnum Colt Python revolver, had grips made of ivory, not pearl as described by Ms. Read.  According to Patton, "Only a pimp in a two-bit New Orleans cathouse would carry a pearl-handled pistol."  John A. Lankford II  Meriden, Conn.  ---  Patton did not "vanquish" anyone in Africa: The British Eighth Army did it, with only some assistance from American forces.  "Desert Rats" refers to the British Eighth Army soldiers, not to the German Afrika Corps.  Kevin J. Kearney  Instructor, World War I  Georgetown University  Washington  Mythical Party Animal  Half-man, half-horse this creature was,  A strain on all convention  When he walked in, he must have been  The centaur of attention.  -- Dick Emmons.  ---  Consumer's Complaint  What do you call it when you have to go at today's packaged products with a knife to get them open -- plastic surgery?  -- Wanda Cunningham.  ---  Candid Comment  A newly appointed judge offered this excuse for imposing a lenient sentence: "I didn't throw the book at the defendant because I wasn't through reading it."  -- John Dromey.  U.S. auto makers, in a mood of caution, are planning to build fewer cars in this year's fourth quarter than in any last quarter since the recession-plagued final period of 1982.  While a shift toward van and light-truck production accounts for some of the drop in car assembly, the factory schedules nonetheless indicate that the economy's "soft landing" hasn't yet erased fears of a slump in Detroit.  "The other side of a soft landing is a soft recovery," said Mary Ann Keller, an auto industry analyst with Furman Selz Mager Dietz & Birney in New York.  "We haven't created the pent-up demand," necessary for a sales boom, she added.  The Big Three's cautious year-end production plans sharply contrast with the aggressive production schedules they set and mostly kept earlier this year, despite criticism by analysts that those schedules were unwarranted.  Meanwhile, foreign-based U.S. auto makers are continuing their trend of boosting car production.  The U.S. operations of Japanese auto makers continue to account for a growing portion of U.S. car production.  Plants owned by foreign auto makers or operated as joint ventures with U.S. companies plan to build 312,609 cars in the fourth quarter, or 18.3% of the total, up from 205,875 cars, or 10.9% of the total a year ago.  Overbuilding earlier in the year caused auto makers to trim their bulging inventories of vehicles by sponsoring aggressive sales promotions, including cash rebates to consumers.  That helped reduce inventories but, analysts say, it also prompted consumers who were considering purchasing later in the year to do so before then.  The effect will be fewer car and truck sales in the coming months.  Consumers also will be slow to purchase the 1990 models because some of the models carry the sharpest price rises in recent years.  Auto inventories remained high at the end of August, even though sales for the month were 13% higher than a year ago because of unusually high rebates.  The Big Three auto makers ended last month with 98,000 more cars than they did a year ago.  Industrywide, inventories were up 13.6% at the end of August, to 685,365 cars, according to Ward's Automotive Reports, an industry trade publication.  Industry sources say the nine domestic car makers plan to build 1,705,283 cars in the fourth quarter, down 10.1% from the 1,897,462 cars they built last year.  That's the lowest industrywide fourth quarter production level since 1982, when U.S. auto makers assembled 1,203,260 cars.  Here are what industry sources say auto makers will build during the fourth quarter:  CARS  @ 1989 1988 %Chg.  @ GM .................... 752,000 946,732 - 20.6  @ Ford .................. 394,000 447,121 - 11.9  @ Chrysler .............. 246,674 296,120 - 16.7  @ Honda ................. 85,185 88,307 - 3.5  @ Mazda ................. 55,000 61,473 - 10.5  @ Nissan ................ 26,046 25,510 + 2.1  @ Toyota ................ 47,000 14,422 +226  @ Nummi ................. 43,300 16,000 +171  @ DiamStar .............. 56,078 163 +343  @ Total ................. 1,705,283 1,897,462 - 10.1  TRUCKS  @ GM .................... 393,000 412,965 - 4.8  @ Ford .................. 340,000 376,783 - 9.8  @ Chrysler .............. 148,563 165,688 - 10.3  @ Nissan ................ 31,746 24,908 + 27.5  @ Total ................. 913,309 979,869 - 6.8  Ford has scaled back third-quarter car production by 22,669 vehicles since a month ago.  "We're trying to help dealers adjust their inventory levels," a Ford spokesman said.  Nevertheless the auto maker plans to run several of its truck plants on overtime in the fourth quarter.  Here are the industry forecasts for third-quarter output:  CARS  @ 1989 1988 %Chg.  @ GM .................... 602,000 729,729 - 17.5  @ Ford .................. 340,037 360,000 - 5.5  @ Chrysler .............. 186,373 194,200 - 4.0  @ Honda ................. 80,722 88,656 - 8.9  @ Mazda ................. 45,852 54,083 - 15.2  @ Nissan ................ 29,359 30,760 - 4.6  @ Toyota ................ 46,000 4,000 +1,050  @ Nummi ................. 48,810 29,340 + 66.4  @ DiamStar .............. 29,373 163 + 17,920  @ Total ................. 1,408,526 1,491,768 - 5.6  TRUCKS  @ GM .................... 400,000 407,281 - 1.8  @ Ford .................. 306,151 316,831 - 3.4  @ Chrysler .............. 135,449 141,604 - 4.3  @ Nissan ................ 27,409 14,989 + 82.9  @ Total ................. 869,009 880,705 - 1.3  After a four-month investigation, police still haven't gotten to the bottom of Norman Tremblay's fish story.  It started May 21, when the New Hampshire angler entered a 6.28-pound salmon in the annual fishing derby at the state's Lake Winnipesaukee.  He told contest officials he had reeled it out of the lake early that morning.  But a state fish and game biologist at the derby smelled a rat.  The fish had a fin clipped with a marking like those put on fish in the state's hatcheries, but the marking wasn't the one usually found on fish in this lake.  The biologist tipped off the contest's officials who, after mulling it over, called the sheriff.  Meanwhile, Mr. Tremblay's fish had won second place in the derby, and he drove home to his log cabin in the woods with $12,000 of prizes, including a 16-foot boat, an outboard motor and a trophy.  When visiting a neighbor two days later, he looked up to see his boat being towed behind somebody else's truck.  After a hot pursuit, he caught up with the thieves, only to find they were deputies in unmarked vehicles.  Armed with a search warrant, they had seized his boat, trophy and other prizes, pending an investigation of possible fish fraud.  The fish, which had been sent to a taxidermist's, was taken into custody later.  Now, law-enforcement officials are in the fourth month of a criminal investigation of a case that is "one of the most complex things I've ever seen," says Belknap, N.H., County Attorney Edward Fitzgerald.  He won't elaborate on the case or possible charges, except to say the salmon is being analyzed for clues at the University of New Hampshire.  Fish researchers there decline to comment.  But an expert in fish forensics at the University of Washington, in Seattle, says detectives probably will have to collect tissue samples from salmon in the state's many hatcheries for comparison with the suspect fish.  DNA probes may have to be brought in.  They may need a federal grant to complete the investigation, says the expert, biologist Robert Walker.  Mr. Tremblay won't comment.  But his attorney, Dan Harkinson, says high-powered forensics aren't needed to show there's nothing fishy about his client's salmon.  "I've examined another frozen salmon from the lake, and it looks a lot like the fish Tremblay caught," he says.  A congressional plan to cut the tax on capital gains could create a bumpy ride for stocks.  The tax cut would be good news for individual investors, who would keep more of the gains when they sell investments at a profit.  But at least in the short run, it would be bad news for the stock market, prompting cautious investors to take their profits from the post-crash rally and run.  That's the reading market professionals give to the capital-gains measure approved by the House Ways and Means Committee late last week.  The bill would cut taxes on profits from the sale of stocks and other investments.  A competing Senate proposal to expand the deduction for individual retirement accounts would be a clear boon for the market, as well as investors, experts say, luring new dollars into long-term savings and investments.  But while the IRA plan has broader appeal, it isn't seen as a realistic rival to a capital-gains tax cut.  Budget constraints would rule out revenue-losing IRA tax breaks for the foreseeable future, legislative insiders say.  The controversial capital-gains proposal, meanwhile, still must survive a full congressional vote before it becomes law.  But the odds are very good that some capital-gains tax cut will be passed before the end of the year.  In its present form, the capital-gains proposal has two phases: For twenty-seven and a half months, it would allow investors to exclude from taxes 30% of any gain they realize from the sale or exchange of stock, bonds, real estate or other capital assets they have held for more than one year.  Gains from artworks, antiques, coins and other collectibles wouldn't qualify, however.  The exclusion, which applies to assets sold between Sept. 14, 1989, and Dec. 31, 1991, would effectively cut the top capital-gains rate during that period to 19.6%.  The top rate for taxable investors currently runs as high as 33%.  Pension funds and other tax-exempt institutional investors, which make up 70% of the market, wouldn't be affected by the proposal.  After that first-phase window closes, a different provision would kick in that would allow investors to exclude from taxation any gains attributable to inflation.  Although investment professionals applaud this part of the plan as a likely long-term plus for the market, they fear the initial phase would do more harm than good.  "To jack the {capital-gains} rate around like this distorts" investor behavior, says Tony Brush, partner in Bradley, Woods & Co., a public-policy research firm.  "If you're trying to encourage people to invest long-term, this just isn't going to do it."  Of course, the rationale in Congress for the temporary 30% exclusion isn't so much that it will help investors, but that it will raise new tax revenues to help reduce the budget deficit.  That means spurring investors to sell assets and take profits -- which is precisely what worries many market professionals.  For instance, when President Bush proposed cutting capital-gains taxes to 15% earlier this year, the Treasury figured that reduction would boost asset sales 91% in fiscal 1991 to a total of $349 billion.  Those sales would have included not only stocks, but also bonds, depreciable real estate and other capital assets.  Although nobody knows exactly what kind of selling the current proposal might promote, many professionals see the stock and real-estate markets as being vulnerable.  "I'm disturbed by the near-term impact, which is negative" for these markets, says Abby Joseph Cohen, senior investment strategist at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  The proposal "creates a narrow window for investors to take their gains and run."  That incentive is especially ticklish, she says, in the light of the strong rally in stock prices since the October 1987 crash.  "People who are sitting on gains of 50% or more are going to say 'Forget about the long term, let me sell it now' -- especially when you give them the added incentive of a temporary capital-gains cut," she says.  That could put pressure on such stocks as AT&T, regional telephone companies and many over-the-counter shares, issues for which tax-paying individuals are the dominant shareholders, she adds.  Many market analysts see the new proposals prompting a wave of selling similar to the one that occurred in late 1986, when investors rushed to realize profits before tax reforms eliminated preferential capital-gains tax rates.  "It's entirely possible you could see a similar sell-off" if the current proposal is passed, says Richard Bernstein, senior quantitative analyst at Merrill Lynch & Co.  But although the 1986 wave of profit-taking was quickly followed by a stock-market buying spree in early 1987, producing some of the biggest monthly gains in history, few professionals see such a quick recovery today.  The crucial difference is that "the economic fundamentals {supporting the market} were much more positive" in 1986 than they are now, says Drexel's Ms. Cohen.  Even so, many professionals do expect the long-term appeal of the inflation exclusion to mitigate the plan's negative near-term impact on the market.  Steven Einhorn, co-chairman of the investment policy committee at Goldman, Sachs & Co., says, "While you can't dismiss the possibility of a sell-off, my sense is that it would be moderate and containable" because the second phase, when the inflation exclusion takes effect, "would be recognized as something positive and would offset the selling pressure."  By taxing only real -- or inflation-adjusted -- capital gains, the second phase of the proposal would effectively add 1.5 percentage points a year to individual investors' after-tax returns in the stock market, Mr. Einhorn estimates.  That extra after-tax return would make stocks more attractive relative to bonds and other income-paying investments, which wouldn't benefit as much from the capital-gains cut.  As a result, "it could encourage individuals -- who have been steady and massive liquidators of common stocks in recent years -- to slow that liquidation or even become net buyers of stock," says Mr. Einhorn.  The effect would be especially positive in growth-oriented sectors of the stock market, "because it would reward people for building plant and building a business," says Howard Stein, chairman of Dreyfus Corp.  These are the kinds of activities that tend to create capital-gains for investors.  For example, he says, long term such as capital-gains cut "would have a very positive effect on environmental investments," such as companies involved in the fast-growing business of cleaning up water and air pollution.  Meanwhile, the Bush administration is expected to lobby heavily to extend the initial 30% capital-gains exclusion beyond the proposed 1991 deadline.  If those efforts succeed, that could give a major boost to small stocks and secondary markets, such as the over-the-counter market -- both favored playing fields for individual investors.  A recent study by Merrill Lynch's Mr. Bernstein, for instance, estimates that every five-percentage-point reduction in the capital-gains tax would cause small stocks to outperform the broad stock market by 12.5 percentage points.  That means that if the top capital-gains rate remained at 19.6%, "small stocks could gain an average of 25 percentage points a year relative to the Standard & Poor's 500 index," he says.  Wyoming's pristine mountains provide an appropriate setting for this week's meeting between Secretary of State James Baker and his Soviet counterpart.  The U.S. has pushed to put environmental issues on the superpower agenda, and Moscow desperately needs help cleaning up its despoiled landscape.  The Bush administration is working on some minor environmental initiatives in advance of the meeting.  These could include proposals for joint cooperative research on how global warming affects arctic regions, and steps to try to clean up ocean pollution.  The Soviets also want technical anti-pollution assistance, and the U.S., citing the meeting's theme of "openness," will ask Moscow to begin publishing extensive environmental statistics so that both sides can assess the magnitude of the problem.  Environmental issues still are a minor sideshow compared to arms control whenever senior officials from the two nations meet.  But one U.S. analyst says that if the superpower relationship continues to improve, issues such as the environment and international economics will become a permanent and significant part of the U.S.-Soviet agenda.  "If you're looking to the 1990s and beyond, in a sense, arms control is fighting the last war," this analyst says.  For the U.S., the easing of the Cold War era means national security concerns are being defined less in military terms and more in economic and environmental ones.  The issue is even more pressing in the Soviet Union.  Regional and ethnic groups across the Russian empire are using environmental gripes to express growing anti-Moscow feelings.  Soviet leaders worry that this anger will further fuel efforts to pull away from Moscow's central control.  In the Soviet republic of Moldavia, an environmental group called the Moldavian Greens, formed in late 1988, blames Moscow for forced industrialization and indiscriminate use of chemicals in agriculture, which have produced widespread air and water pollution.  The Aral Sea in Soviet Central Asia and Lake Baykal in Siberia, the world's largest body of fresh water, have become lifeless, and air pollution in the Ukraine is eight times worse than it is in U.S. industrial cities.  "The Soviet people have become acutely aware that they face an ecological crisis that dwarfs any other in the world," says a U.S. official who specializes in Soviet affairs.  "They are trying to figure out what to do about it at the same time that they restructure their economy.  They don't have the resources for either."  Andrei Kortunov, who is chief of the international security section of Moscow's Institute of the USA and Canada, says many newly elected members of the Soviet Congress of People's Deputies cited environmental concerns as the country's No. 1 problem when they met in June.  He suggests these mounting problems offer President Bush an opportunity to score public relations points in the Soviet Union at minimal cost to the U.S.  "Some of the American technology could be used very effectively," Mr. Kortunov said during an interview here this summer.  "It would create a very favorable public reaction, especially in some rural and provincial areas where the preoccupation with ecology is very drastic and where, I would say, the ecological problem is perhaps more acute than the problems of consumption."  Secretary Baker, an active outdoorsman, has a keen interest in environmental issues.  His first public appearance as secretary of state was before a Washington conference on environmental problems.  And Soviet President Mikhail Gorbachev, in an article published in Pravda in 1987, talked about the importance of "ecological security."  Referring to the disastrous 1986 nuclear accident at Chernobyl, Mr. Gorbachev said, "They say that one thorn of experience is worth more than a whole wood of instructions.  For us, Chernobyl became such a thorn."  If the Soviet leader forgets, his people will remind him.  Earlier this month, a senior Soviet official visited Chernobyl, where he was berated by a resident: "Tell me, please, how are we supposed to live?  We are afraid of the water.  We are afraid of the sun.  We are afraid of the grass.  We are afraid of the soil."  Texas's biggest thrift-fraud case, encompassing a five-year investigation and a six-month trial, ended last week with a hung jury and an unhappy lesson for prosecutors.  The prosecutors had gambled that a jury could follow a web of alleged thrift-fraud on the part of seven defendants through an 88-count indictment.  But the jurors' failure to reach a unanimous verdict on even one of the 352 questions before them confirmed the government's long-held doubts about bringing massive conspiracy and racketeering cases against numerous defendants.  "We'll be very sparing in bringing {more of these} large and complex cases," said U.S. Attorney Marvin Collins of Dallas, whose office originated the case.  The indictment, issued almost two years ago, accused real estate developers David "Danny" Faulkner and James Toler of conspiring with former thrift executives Spencer H. Blain Jr. and Paul Arlin Jensen to defraud five thrifts of more than $166 million through fraudulent loans for condominium developments along Interstate 30 east of Dallas.  Two real estate appraisers and a condominium salesman were also charged in the case.  The size and complexity of the case has made it an Edsel among Texas thrift-fraud cases.  Prosecutors currently pursuing the perpetrators of Texas's savings and loan crisis are going for indictments against one to three defendants on charges that don't require educating a jury about the fine points of real estate appraisals and thrift disclosure statements.  Several recent indictments obtained by the Dallas Bank Fraud Task Force have charged former thrift executives with misapplying their institutions' funds by reimbursing employees for political contributions to well-known members of Congress.  In another case, task force prosecutors won the conviction of a former president of Vernon Savings & Loan Association who was charged with using thrift funds to pay for female companions for his colleagues and the state savings and loan commissioner.  "You always look for something easier to present and more appealing to a jury," Mr. Collins said.  Defense lawyers say they too prefer the less-complicated cases because of the burden a lengthy trial places on their clients.  Sitting through a six-month trial as a defendant is "punishment as severe or more severe than being in the penitentiary itself," said defense lawyer Robert E. Davis of Dallas.  But the prosecutors' trend toward bringing more succinct cases with a scandalous edge to them worries some defense lawyers.  Abbe David Lowell of Washington, D.C., said allowing prosecutors to pick and choose among the charges in a bank-fraud case provides "an enormous amount of power" for the government lawyers to target a suspect and then select a crime to prosecute.  "If a person is accused of bank fraud, let him be tried for that," said Mr. Lowell, who successfully defended Texas thrift owner Thomas M. Gaubert against charges that he misled the officers of an Iowa thrift about his interest in a real estate deal they were financing.  Prosecutors in that case didn't touch on Mr. Gaubert's fund-raising efforts on behalf of former U.S. House Speaker Jim Wright and other Democrats.  Tales of political glad-handing and extravagant spending were part of the case that ended in a mistrial last week, but they were nearly obscured by more tedious testimony from the government's 120 witnesses.  The defendants' lawyers, who are expected to ask U.S. District Judge Sam Cummings to order an acquittal of the defendants, didn't present any witnesses.  The case "absolutely" will be retried, said lead prosecutor Terry Hart.  Mr. Collins, the Dallas U.S. attorney, agreed.  "Whatever the expense, and it's been large, it's unfortunately a drop in the bucket compared to the huge dollar losses these five institutions suffered," he said.  "A retrial . . . is fully justified."  Scientists have long known that breathing ozone on especially smoggy days is bad for people and can cause coughing, chest pains and temporary respiratory ailments.  But now concern is growing that ozone at levels occurring regularly in big cities may cause permanent damage, chewing up lung tissue little by little over many years.  This could make many people prone to a precipitous and irreversible loss of breathing power in later life.  Research on the matter is far from conclusive.  But some recent animal tests suggest that permanent changes occur in human lungs exposed to big-city ozone levels over long periods.  In a study by researchers from Duke University and the Environmental Protection Agency, rats exposed to ozone for 18 months developed lung-tissue abnormalities resembling the early stages of fibrosis, a disease that can fatally narrow air passages.  Such studies are notoriously tricky; in fact, one other recent animal study showed no signs of long-term ozone damage.  But "there are many reasons to strongly suspect that ozone's mechanism of action on cells, if repeated many times, would lead to chronic lung disease," says Bernard Goldstein, former EPA research director.  "Now we are starting to see studies suggesting that ozone {at big-city levels} accelerate lung-function decline as we get older."  Dr. Goldstein now heads the New Jersey Environmental and Occupational Health Sciences Institute in Piscataway.  The research is important because more than a decade of efforts to stem ozone pollution have failed.  About half of Americans live in areas where ozone levels exceed the federal ceiling at least once a year, ranging from Los Angeles to rural Maine.  Ozone, a highly corrosive form of oxygen, blocks harmful solar rays at high altitudes but is a problem at ground level.  It forms when sunlight hits auto exhaust and smoke from power plants and factories.  Auto makers have slashed their engines' ozone-forming emissions since 1970, but the gains have been offset by rising numbers of cars traveling more miles than ever.  "Most air pollutants are at levels thousands of times below what would be lethal," Dr. Goldstein says.  "But in some cities on the worst days, ozone is only 10 or 20 times below lethal levels."  President Bush's recently proposed clean air package would further clamp down on ozone precursors.  But in July, the congressional Office of Technology Assessment projected that without new technologies and life-style changes, dozens of U.S. cities will remain in violation of the federal "safe" level of 0.12 parts per million.  Surprisingly little is known about ozone's chronic effects.  That's partly because smog only became a serious public-health problem in the past 20 years or so.  The picture is further confused by countless common chemicals that also hurt lungs.  And lung diseases tend to develop insidiously, often causing marked breathing difficulties only after knocking out a critical mass of lung tissue -- about 25%.  Only one study has traced the impact of long-term ozone exposure on humans.  Conducted by researchers at the University of California at Los Angeles, the study suggested that in Glendora, Calif., a smoggy town east of Los Angeles, lung functions develop more slowly in youngsters and decline faster in adults than in Lancaster, Calif., a town with cleaner air.  But the study wasn't conclusive, partly because some initial participants dropped out.  In Los Angeles, researchers are studying the lungs of people who have died from various causes in their late teens and early 20s -- members of the first generation to grow up breathing heavy smog.  "We're seeing lung disease more serious than I'd have expected in these kids," says Russell Sherwin, a University of Southern California researcher leading the study.  But he isn't yet sure whether ozone is to blame.  That leaves animal research, which has yielded conflicting results.  The Duke University-EPA study followed research with monkeys at the University of California at Davis that also showed tentative evidence of long-term ozone damage.  But a recent rat study, conducted by General Motors Corp. researchers, didn't show such signs.  In fact, "we were surprised at how little effect we could see" after 18 months of ozone exposures far higher than people get in big cities, says Elaine Wright, co-author of the GM study.  The Duke-EPA study, however, used an especially sensitive technique to spot lung abnormalities that may have been missed in the GM study, some researchers say.  In another recent study, scientists exposed rats to city-like ozone for six weeks, then to airborne asbestos for five hours.  A month later, the ozone-exposed rats had retained twice as many asbestos fibers in their lungs as had a control group exposed to asbestos after breathing pure air.  That indicates ozone may impair the lungs' ability to clear toxic substances, increasing risks of cancer and other diseases, says Kent Pinkerton, who led the research at the University of California at Davis.  Scientists agree, however, that the ozone-cancer link remains weak.  More worrisome, they say, is that ozone may be quietly compounding effects of viral attacks and other respiratory insults.  Such factors wipe out lung tissue in all people as they age.  Accelerated by ozone, these factors may wipe out reserves that normally provide a protective cushion against breathing problems.  Scientists add that children's developing lungs are particularly susceptible to permanent damage.  And short-term studies indicate that children's lungs are irritated by ozone at levels below the federal standard.  Integrated Resources Inc. is working against an Oct. 15 deadline to complete the sale of its core businesses while facing the potential loss of its sales force and continued pressure from creditors.  The financial services company has been trying to avoid a bankruptcy-law filing since it failed to make interest payments in June on nearly $1 billion of debt.  In late August, Integrated signed a letter of intent to sell most of its businesses to Whitehall Financial Group, a partnership of a branch of the Bronfman family and Mandy Moross, a London investor, for $310 million.  Integrated hopes to reach a definitive agreement with Whitehall by Oct. 15; creditors and sales representatives agree that it must be done by then if the field force is to remain intact.  Otherwise, the vital sales force may unravel, and creditors will grow more restive.  "If this deal is signed, sealed and delivered on or before the 15th, they will keep 90%" of the sales force, said one managing executive who was at a recent meeting of Whitehall and about 350 managing executives here.  On the other hand, he said, "everybody I know" will sever its relationship with Integrated if the Whitehall transaction fails and nothing else comes along by that date.  Whitehall in late August agreed in principle to pay $310 million for Integrated Resources Equity Corp. and several other of Integrated's core financial services companies.  Equity Corp. is a loosely constructed group of independent brokers and financial planners who sell insurance and annuities, limited partnerships, mutual funds and other investments for Integrated and other companies.  When the sale accord was announced, Integrated said its investment banker, Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., would continue to solicit bids for the units.  "Drexel has received a number of firstround bids" from other interested parties, said Stephen D. Weinroth, Integrated's chairman and co-chief executive.  Mr. Weinroth last month took a leave of absence from Drexel to work full time at Integrated in the debt restructuring effort.  "We expect to hold to the timetable," said Whitehall's managing partner, B. Lance Sauerteig.  Mr. Sauerteig said so far there aren't any major obstacles to its offer, which also includes buying Integrated Resources Life Insurance Co., Integrated Resources Asset Management Corp., Resources Trust Co. and Financial Clearing & Services Corp.  The agreement didn't include Integrated's Capitol Life Insurance Co., and Integrated is expected to continue to administer the remaining real estate and other partnership businesses.  Mr. Sauerteig said he understood that sales representatives reacted favorably to the meeting.  "The reality of it is that these are very smart people . . . (who) clearly have been hurt by this and want to see a deal go through," Mr. Sauerteig said.  "Everybody's banking on the Bronfmans" concluding the deal, the Integrated managing executive said.  Mr. Weinroth declined to identify the other parties he said had sent bids to Drexel.  The Coors family was rumored to be interested, but a spokesman for Adolph Coors Co., its Golden, Colo., beer company, said no one at Coors has any knowledge of any such bid.  Kaufman & Broad and Texas investor Robert Bass also had been rumored to be interested.  But sources familiar with Mr. Bass say that after reviewing the assets he lost interest.  "I'm certainly hopeful" that a higher bid will come along, Mr. Weinroth said.  "Obviously a buyer who will take everything would make our life easier."  Asked whether Whitehall would consider getting into a bidding war for the Integrated units, Mr. Sauerteig said, "We made our bid, and we think it was a fair proposal."  Meanwhile, Mr. Weinroth dismissed speculation that a bankruptcy-law filing is imminent for Integrated.  "We certainly don't have any intention of filing in the immediate future," Mr. Weinroth said.  He said he isn't under any increased pressure from creditors, who are owed a total of about $1.8 billion.  Senior Integrated creditors, who hold claims of about $1 billion, would receive proceeds from the sale of the Integrated core businesses.  They and other creditors then would receive a stake in Integrated's remaining real estate and other partnership assets, which Integrated currently values at about $700 million.  The partnership assets, which would have a long-term value of $2.5 billion, will gradually be liquidated.  Mr. Weinroth declined to speculate on what would happen to the discussions with other bidders or the agreement with Whitehall if Integrated were forced into bankruptcy.  "We don't have a definitive agreement with them (Whitehall), so that isn't addressed," he said.  "I'm sure it's one of the issues that will be covered" in a definitive agreement.  Mr. Weinroth also said the company is preparing its second-quarter financial report.  "We found something we had to write down that was big, but we will probably find something else" that would help balance it, he said.  "It's going to hurt the cash flows a little bit."  He said he doesn't think the report will substantially alter a restructuring plan that Integrated expects to file with the Securities and Exchange Commission in three weeks.  The plan apparently offers senior creditors a little more than 70 cents on the dollar for their claims and junior creditors half that much.  Integrated junior junk bonds are trading at about eight cents on the dollar, while senior debt is trading at about 38 cents on the dollar, according to R.D. Smith & Co.  Mr. Sauerteig of Whitehall said he isn't sure how a bankruptcy-law filing would affect the agreement with Integrated.  "It would make some difference if we've already negotiated a definitive agreement," he said.  Lee Walzer, an analyst with R.D. Smith, which trades in distressed securities, said he doesn't think a bankruptcylaw filing is a short-term probability.  "It's hard for me to think of an interest group who would benefit" from a filing before the sale of the core companies is closed, he said.  Robert Miller, an attorney representing senior Integrated creditors, said that although his group feels a bankruptcy-law filing is "always an available" alternative, "we've been urging bondholders to hold the course while we conduct due diligence."  He said the bondholder group hired the firm he works for, Berlack, Israel & Liberman, and Merrill Lynch & Co. to evaluate Integrated's assets.  Mr. Miller said, "Our position is that in bankruptcy the chances are very, very great that there will be less value to distribute."  He cautioned that the sales force is "a bunch of indpendent people" and said "the fear is that in a bankruptcy proceeding these people would abandon" the company.  But Mr. Miller conceded that some junior bondholders who are "looking at eight to 10 cents on the dollar" are angry.  "Some of them are very indifferent about whether this thing goes into Chapter 11" of the federal Bankruptcy Code, he said.  Giant Group Inc.'s recent agreement to acquire Aspen Airways Inc. is at first glance puzzling: Why would a company involved in cement making, newsprint recycling and fast-food hamburgers buy a regional airline?  But the move is characteristic for former entertainment magnate Burt Sugarman, who holds about 31.8% of Giant.  Mr. Sugarman, who is Giant Group's chairman, has always had a propensity for overseeing an eclectic mix of businesses.  And this most recent acquisition simply makes it a new hodgepodge.  Meanwhile, a new emphasis for Giant may be emerging.  Last week Giant said it would study the feasibility of building a major recycled newsprint mill that could triple the output of its current facility in Pomona, Calif.  A glut of old newspapers across the country mean that raw material for this business is cheap and plentiful; if demand for recycled newsprint from newspaper publishers improves, Mr. Sugarman could be expanding at the right time.  Giant acquired the newsprint operation earlier this year from Media General Inc. as part of a settlement resulting from a hostile takeover attempt.  It didn't seem like a good fit for a company, which also held a big stake in an entertainment concern, Barris Industries Inc., best known for "The Gong Show."  But Giant's core business in cement making in fact had been involved in resource recovery for years by burning waste materials to fuel its Pennsylvania and South Carolina plants.  Mr. Sugarman has made noises about selling the cement operation since 1987.  Mr. Sugarman has said that his businesses relate to each other because they are all low-cost operations in some sense geared to a mass market, whether game shows, the 22%-owned Rally's fast-food chain or even cement.  Giant sold its stake in Barris earlier this year, severing its ties with the Guber-Peters production company, makers of "Rain Man" and "Batman."  But the 50-year-old Mr. Sugarman got his start producing television specials, went on to produce such movies as "Children of a Lesser God," and has never indicated he's finished with the entertainment business.  Mr. Sugarman couldn't be reached to comment.  McDonnell Douglas Corp., calling it an "obvious improvement to be made," recommended that airlines add a few simple parts to the DC-10 that could prevent an accident like the July crash in Sioux City, Iowa, that killed 112 people.  During that disaster, the rear engine on United Airlines flight 232 exploded, severing all three hydraulic lines on the tri-jet.  The lines, a series of half-inch, fluid-filled tubes raddled through the plane, are connected to devices on the wings and tail called actuators; they, in turn, direct movable flaps that give the pilot control of the aircraft.  But if the No. 3 hydraulic line became ruptured with the new design in place, a shut-off valve would automatically close.  That would keep the fluid from draining and preserve enough pressure in the system for the plane to be landed safely -- even if the other two lines were also crippled.  If such a valve had been present on flight 232, the crew "would have had a relatively easy time to arrive at the end of the runway," said Dale Warren, a vice president at the company's Douglas Aircraft Co. subsidiary here.  The Federal Aviation Administration is expected to soon make the alteration mandatory on domestic DC-10s, and international regulatory bodies would probably follow suit.  About 400 of the planes are in service around the world.  Mr. Warren likened the introduction of the valve to adding airbags in automobiles, calling it something "over and above the basic industry standard."  He said the catastrophic failure of the No. 2 engine on Flight 232 was "unprecedented," adding that the chances of such a thing happening "are less than one in a billion."  But, clearly, McDonnell Douglas has been under fire since the Sioux City crash to better protect the DC-10's hydraulics.  Indeed, the company has been walking a tightrope -- asserting that the plane is safe as is, while trying to figure what action might assuage the public's growing fears about flying on it.  In a front-page story in this newspaper after the July accident, aviation experts questioned the configuration of the DC-10's hydraulics and said other planes have more fail-safe systems, including the use of shut-off valves.  Following the article, the International Airline Passengers Association, a travelers' advocacy group, called for the grounding of the DC-10 fleet.  And Sen. Howard Metzenbaum (D., Ohio), citing The Wall Street Journal story, wrote to FAA Administrator James Busey, questioning whether the crash "might have been averted if the hydraulic system was designed differently."  After the Douglas announcement about the modification, Mr. Busey said in a statement that the change will "make a good airplane even better."  Still, for some, the addition of the shut-off valve seems unduly belated.  "It was either completely overlooked or else they were dead set against changing a damn thing," said Rick Clarke, a pilot and president of an Annapolis, Md., consulting firm called Air Safety Planning Associates.  A spokesman for the airline passengers association added, "We're delighted that they're taking steps without waiting for regulatory intervention . . . but we're saddened that time and events seem to have been the final catalyst."  Mr. Clarke pointed out that the hydraulics on Lockheed Corp.'s L-1011 tri-jet include a shut-off valve.  An L-1011 design manual, in fact, says that in the event of "an explosive failure of the No. 2 engine . . . a shut-off valve closes, protecting against the loss of system fluid."  In addition, Boeing Co. put shut-off valves on some of its aircraft after the 1985 crash of a Japan Airlines 747 in which the plane's rear bulkhead broke loose and tore hydraulic lines.  But Mr. Warren -- noting many safety features on the DC-10, including the employment of backup, or "redundant" hydraulic systems -- insisted that until the Sioux City accident, the possibility of such a large failure of the No. 2 engine was something "that probably nobody has recognized."  He also discouraged comparisons to the L-1011, explaining that the DC-10's tail is designed very differently and includes some superior handling features.  "There is no valve such as this on an L-1011 to our knowledge," Mr. Warren maintained.  The installation of the valve -- as well as a pair of switches in the hydraulic fluid reservoir that can shut the device if they sense the liquid level getting too low and an indicator light in the cockpit to signal a problem -- is a relatively simple and inexpensive procedure.  It's expected to cost about $10,000 a plane, and the entire fleet could be retrofitted within 21 months.  It isn't clear yet who will pay for the new equipment, but typically the carriers bear the financial burden in situations such as this.  McDonnell Doulgas indicated it's also likely to introduce the valve on its MD-11, the scion of the DC-10 and a cornerstone of the company's financial health.  Mr. Warren added that the changes already have been endorsed by several airlines and an industry task force formed last month to study whether any redesign is needed to improve the survivability of wide-body jets damaged during flight.  Meanwhile, The National Transportation Safety Board is still examining the Sioux City crash.  Investigators suspect the engine broke up after the fan disk -- a huge hunk of titanium that holds the fan blades in place -- failed, possibly because of a tiny imperfection.  But they aren't certain because the disk is still lost amid the corn stalks in Iowa and probably won't be found until the autumn harvest.  Earlier this month, the FAA said it was preparing to order expensive new tests on the DC-10's engines.  Mr. Warren hinted that some official action could come "within a matter of days."  A spokesman for General Electric Co., which makes the engines, said it was premature to comment.  Plunging energy prices are restraining inflation, and a spurt in auto production is buoying the industrial sector, as the economy's streak of good luck continues.  An enormous 7.3% dive in energy prices pushed producer prices down 0.4% in August, the Labor Department reported Friday, an extraordinary third consecutive month of decline.  Meanwhile, industrial production grew at its fastest pace since April, the Federal Reserve said.  At the same time, the operating rate at the country's factories, mines and utilities remained at 83.8% of capacity, the Fed said -- high enough to represent efficient use of facilities but not so high as to cause inflationary bottlenecks or production snags.  "Overall the statistics today paint a very pretty picture of the economy and inflation," said Allen Sinai, chief economist for Boston Co. in New York.  But it is a picture skewed by special circumstances.  If it weren't for the decline in energy prices, the producer price index for finished goods would have climbed 0.4% last month.  Excluding food as well -- another category where wide and frequent price swings can distort trends in overall price levels -- producer prices grew 0.5%.  Oil prices recently have begun to rise.  Consequently, Carl Palash, senior economist at McCarthy, Cristini & Maffei, a financial market analysis firm in New York, said: "I don't see inflation abating."  The 0.3% growth in industrial production resulted almost entirely from two factors: a jump in automobile production, as factories churned out their new 1990 models for introduction this fall, and a rebound in production of coal mining equipment after widespread miners' strikes ended.  "Those are temporary factors," Mr. Palash said.  Production actually declined for a wide range of consumer goods.  In other areas, it has slowed considerably through the summer.  Still, analysts generally believe the economy is in pretty good shape.  "The picture is about as good as anyone has any right to expect at this stage of a business cycle, " Mr. Sinai said.  "It's a picture that says to Washington: If it ain't broke, don't fix it."  Many economists believe the Federal Reserve will conclude precisely that and refrain from changing policy.  In March 1988, the central bank began nudging interest rates higher in an effort to slow economic activity so that prices would moderate.  But this spring, after allowing short-term interest rates to climb three percentage points, the Fed reversed course and started pushing rates down to protect the slowing economy from a recession.  Now, after easing its clamp in late July, the Fed is sitting tight.  "The economy continues to go forward," President Bush said, speaking to reporters at a White House luncheon.  But he added, "I'm not totally relaxed on all corners of the economy."  To some analysts, inflation remains a question.  The producer price index, which measures prices producers pay for goods, previously hadn't declined for three consecutive months since 1986.  But just as soaring energy prices pushed producer prices up at an alarming rate last winter -- and spawned fears of an inflationary spiral -- recent steep drops in energy prices caused the current string of declines.  However, recent price trends suggest another month of declining oil prices is highly unlikely.  And even last month, prices increased more than a percentage point on an array of goods, including lawn equipment, tobacco products, prescription drugs and household flatware.  The 0.5% rise in prices other than those for food and energy "was broad-based, and suggests that not letting our guard down on inflation as we move into 1990 is important," said Dirk Van Dongen, president of the National Association of Wholesaler-Distributors.  But Aubrey Zaffuto, an economist at IBJ Schroder Bank & Trust Co. in New York, said, "I'm not concerned as long as we see a moderation of crude and intermediate prices."  In August, prices of intermediate goods, products that have been partly processed, dropped 0.3%, also the third consecutive decline.  Crude-goods prices fell for the second time in two months, tumbling 1.9%.  The prices producers pay for these materials, which range from ball bearings to paper pulp, affect the cost of making finished goods, and ultimately their selling price.  "I don't see the real fear of inflation going up really sharply; by the same token, I don't see it going down much lower," said Michael Baruschke, a manager of National Westminster Bank NJ in Jersey City, N.J.  "I don't see it going higher because the economy isn't booming in any one area.  I don't see it going lower because the economy isn't doing poorly; people are still working and spending money."  One other report released Friday contained a bit of worrisome news.  The Commerce Department said business inventories grew 0.6% in July as sales declined 0.9%.  If build-ups in stock aren't matched by growth in sales, businesses eventually are forced to cut orders, leading factories to reduce production and staff.  In July, inventories equaled 1.54 months of sales, compared with 1.51 months in June.  @ Here is a summary of the Federal Reserve Board's report on industrial production in August.  The figures are seasonally adjusted.  @ % change from  July August  @ 1989 1988  @ Total ...................... 0.3 2.8  @ Consumer goods ........... 0.1 3.0  @ Business equipment ....... 0.6 6.0  @ Defense and space ........ -0.3 -2.0  @ Manufacturing only ......... 0.2 3.4  @ Durable goods ............ 0.4 3.0  @ Nondurable goods ......... 0.0 4.0  @ Mining ..................... 2.3 0.1  @ Utilities .................. -1.0 -3.3  The industrial production index for August stood at 142.4% of the 1977 average.  Here are the Labor Department's producer price indexes (1982=100) for August, before seasonal adjustment, and the percentage changes from August, 1988.  @ Finished goods ........................ 113.3 4.2  @ Minus food & energy ................... 122.3 4.2  @ Intermediate goods .................... 112.1 3.4  @ Crude goods ........................... 101.0 4.2  Traders called the first day of trading in a new 10-year government of Canada bond futures contract a solid success with an estimated 2,746 contracts, or a face amount of 274.6 million Canadian dollars (US$231.5 million), changing hands.  "It was fantastic," said Michel Sevigny, director of trading for McNeil Mantha Inc., Montreal.  Mr. Sevigny also traded for his own account Friday in the Montreal Exchange's new futures pit.  He said the market functioned well, with "good volatility and good volume."  But he and other traders warned the test for the contract will come in the next month.  "If we can keep that volume for a week or two, then we'll have a solid base," Mr. Sevigny said.  The C$100,000 contract is based on a 10-year government of Canada bond with a 9% coupon.  A futures contract obligates the holder to buy or sell a security or commodity at a given price within a specified period.  The new Montreal Exchange contract is the only existing Canada bond futures contract.  In what could be a landmark decision for hostile international acquisitions, Britain's Takeover Panel gave Sir James Goldsmith's Hoylake Investments Ltd. more time to pursue its unfriendly #13.4 billion (US$20.8 billion) quest for B.A.T Industries PLC.  B.A.T, the London-based tobacco, financial services, retailing and paper giant, said it would appeal the decision.  With the current bid obviously doomed because of regulatory delays in the U.S., the Takeover Panel permitted Hoylake to drop the bid and launch a new offer within 21 days of Hoylake's getting final approval by U.S. insurance commissioners.  It is expected that it will be several weeks before any new bid will be made.  Should it come, it will include a cash portion, in contrast to the highly leveraged, all-paper current bid, persons in the Hoylake camp have indicated.  The current bid ranks second to Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co.'s $25 billion takeover of RJR Inc. as the largest acquisition attempt in corporate history.  For the international investment community, a major issue was whether the panel could be flexible enough to dovetail its strict timetable for takeovers with foreign regulatory processes, which often exceed the timetable.  The flip side of the issue was whether a British-based target company could successfully hide behind a time shield created by lengthy foreign regulatory requirements.  In a 24-page decision released in London on Friday, the panel said that although the fight for B.A.T is a "novel" situation, "situations of this kind," where Britain's takeover code and foreign regulatory processes must be considered, "are likely to recur."  It added that the code should demonstrate that "it can adapt to new situations.  Foreign regulatory intervention is clearly one such situation."  In London, investment bankers unconnected with the Hoylake/B.A.T battle welcomed the decision.  "National boundaries are a cliche," asserted Ronald M. Freeman, head of European investment banking at Salomon Brothers Inc.  "The market simply doesn't respect them."  Added Rory MacNamara, a corporate finance director at Morgan Grenfell & Co.: "Clearly the decision limits the foreign frustrating defenses that might have been used by some companies in the U.K."  In London, B.A.T shares jumped 18 pence Friday to close at 819 pence.  In New York, the company's American depository receipts rose to $12.75, up 37.5 cents.  The immediate issue before the Takeover Panel involved B.A.T's Farmers Group Inc. insurance unit, the 15th largest in the U.S. Insurance commissioners in the nine states where Los Angeles-based Farmers operates must approve any change in ownership in the company.  Sir James now faces a long uphill battle with the regulators.  By every account, he and his associates -- including financiers Jacob Rothschild of London and Kerry Packer of Australia -- haven't done much to ingratiate themselves.  Particularly irritating to the regulators were federal lawsuits Hoylake filed seeking, on constitutional grounds, to keep the regulators from reviewing the bid.  Sir James was dealt another blow in that legal attempt Friday, when a federal court in Idaho became the fourth to deny his request for a preliminary injunction to block a state insurance director from reviewing the bid.  Reached by telephone in New York yesterday, Sir James indicated that Hoylake may soon drop the lawsuits.  He said: "My position has always been to negotiate in a constructive and friendly way with the commissioners to transfer the ownership of Farmers."  Sir James "can spend a year or more playing with the regulators," said an attorney for one of the state insurance commissions.  "If we do get to do our review and we deny the bid, they'll appeal."  Regulators also have been put off by the several shifts in Hoylake's strategy.  First it suggested it would put Farmers into a trust pending a sale, then it sued the regulators, then it introduced former U.S. Treasury Secretary William E. Simon as a potential buyer for Farmers, and finally it struck a deal to sell the insurer to France's Axa-Midi Assurances for $4.5 billion after the acquisition.  "Generally, when people want to move from Point A to Point B, they draft a plan to get there," said Theodore R. Kulongoski, Oregon's Director of Insurance and Finance.  "But this is the only time I've seen where every 500 yards they stop, reconnoiter the area, then decide how they'll proceed for the the next 500 yards.  I just think from the very beginning there's been no long-term strategy developed for this procedure."  Sir James disagrees.  "I can understand that when anything changes, it puzzles," he said in the interview yesterday.  "But we've made it clear from day one that we didn't want to be in insurance."  Hoylake's plan is to sell all B.A.T operations save tobacco.  Mr. Kulongoski said he believes Hoylake has mistakenly perceived the regulatory procedure as a political battle that can be won or lost on appearances.  "The Europeans don't know quite what to make of the American regulatory process.  They think it's a P.R. battle.  They hire P.R. firms to send out hundreds of releases, and to initiate these letter-writing campaigns.  But I think they're wrong."  Indeed, the Takeover Panel noted that both sides' U.S. efforts have been "massive and intense."  It said that Hoylake has deployed more than 110 full-time lawyers, lobbyists and public-relations personnel, while B.A.T's "battalions" include 21 law, 15 lobbying and 12 public-relations firms.  Axa-Midi has been doing its part to win over the regulators.  Chairman and Chief Executive Claude Bebear was in San Francisco Friday to tell California regulators why his company would be a better parent for Farmers than B.A.T.  The stop was the last in a tour that brought Mr. Bebear to Ohio, Illinois, Kansas, Texas, Idaho, Washington, Oregon and Arizona.  "I explained to them who we are, that we're an insurance company, not a raider, and that we have this joint venture with Jimmy Goldsmith," said Mr. Bebear in an interview.  "We're trying to invest for a long time.  We want to keep the Farmers management team, the employees, the agents.  When you buy a company that is very well run, it would be stupid to change things.  When we explained that to the commissioners, they seemed more comfortable."  At least some explanation by Axa-Midi was needed, since most of the documents it submitted to the regulators were in French.  "I don't think I'll be reading it.  I don't remember much of my French from high school," said Pamela Scott, chief counsel of the Kansas insurance department.  Axa-Midi says it is in the process of getting the documents translated into English.  Sir James, saying he was relieved Hoylake had been saved from "a time guillotine" by the Takeover Panel, added that he would be "happy and delighted to visit" with regulators "if they wish to see me."  On his current U.S. visit, he is expected to meet with members of the media and seek meetings with political leaders in a bid to alter his corporate-raider image.  The wrangling about Farmers made it obvious in recent days that Hoylake wasn't going to meet a Takeover Panel requirement that, among other things, the bid had to clear all regulatory hurdles by Oct. 7, or 60 days after the bid had been filed.  The panel said it gave Hoylake more time because otherwise shareholders wouldn't have had "a real opportunity to consider an offer for B.A.T on its merits."  The panel laid down three conditions: That Hoylake dissolve its current bid as quickly as possible, that it use "its best efforts" to conclude the regulatory processes in the U.S., and that it refrain from direct or indirect acquisition of any B.A.T shares until announcement of a new offer.  The following U.S. Treasury, corporate and municipal offerings are tentatively scheduled for sale this week, according to Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ U.S. TREASURY  @ Today  $14.4 billion three- and six-month bills.  @ Wednesday  Two- and four-year notes.  @ Thursday  $9.5 billion of 52-week bills.  @ CORPORATE  @ Thursday  Austria Fund Inc. -- 5 million common shares, via Salomon Brothers Inc.  Putnam Diversified Premium Income Trust -- 10 million common shares, via Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  @ One Day This Week  American Opportunity Income Fund Inc. -- 6 million common shares, via Piper Jaffray Hopwood & Inc.  Applebee's International Inc. -- 2.03 million common shares, via Piper Jaffray.  Central Newspapers Inc. -- 3,592,800 Class A shares, via Goldman, Sachs & Co.  Dial REIT Inc. -- 1.5 million common shares, via Alex.  Brown & Sons Inc.  Electronic Arts -- 2,076,165 common shares, via Alex.  Brown & Sons Inc.  Federal Realty Investment Trust -- 2 million shares, via Alex.  Brown & Sons.  Kaneb Pipe Line Partners L.P. -- 4.65 million units, representing senior preference Limited Partnership interests, via Goldman Sachs.  Merry-Go-Round Enterprises Inc. -- 3,350,000 common shares, via Alex.  Brown & Sons.  Stewart & Stevenson Services Inc. -- 1.4 million common shares, via Prudential-Bache.  United Healthcare Corp. -- 2.5 million common shares, via Alex.  Brown & Sons.  World Bank -- $1.5 billion global bond offering, via Deutsche Bank Capital and Salomon Brothers.  @ MUNICIPAL  @ Tuesday  Massachusetts -- $607 million of general obligation notes, including $192 million due June 29, 1990, and $415 million due Sept. 21, 1990, via competitive bid.  @ One Day In The Week  Cambria County Industrial Development Authority, Pa. -- $120 million of resource recovery bonds (Cabria CoGen Project), including $72.5 million fixed rate bonds and $47.5 million variable rate bonds, via a Morgan Stanley & Co. group.  Dormitory of the State of New York -- $660 million of State University Educational Facilities revenue bonds, 1989 Series B and $234.5 million of State University Educational Facilities special obligation bonds, 1989 Issue B, both via a Lazard Freres & Co. group.  Illinois -- $115 million of certificates of participation, via a Bear Stearns & Co. group.  Monroe County Airport Authority, N.Y. -- $107,835,293 of Greater Rochester International Airport revenue Alternative Minimum Tax (AMT) bonds, via a Smith Barney Harris Upham & Co. group.  Texas Municipal Power Agency -- $200 million of refunding revenue bonds, 1989 Series, via a Goldman Sachs group.  @ Pending  San Antonio, Texas -- $640 of million gas and electric revenue refunding bonds, via a First Boston Corp. group.  South Dakota Health and Educational Facilities Authority -- $51,135,000 of revenue refunding bonds (Rapid City Regional Hospital), 1989 Series, via a Dougherty Dawkins Strand & Yost Inc. group.  This British colony is finding it ever harder to retain its best and brightest people as the date for Hong Kong's return to Chinese sovereignty draws nearer.  The number of people leaving Hong Kong will rise 31% next year to 55,000 from 42,000 this year, according to projections by a goverment task force on emigration.  A statistical profile of those who have left so far underlines the impressions of business executives and politicians that Hong Kong is experiencing a "brain drain" of young, educated middle managers and professionals.  In 1987, the number of emigrants rose 58% from a year earlier to 30,000 people, according to goverment figures.  Last year, the number of emigrants rose 53%, to 45,800.  The projected figure of 42,000 for this year would represent a slight slowing despite the Beijing massacre on June 4, which has heightened fears that China won't keep its promises of maintaining Hong Kong's freedoms and its capitalist economic system after the colony's planned 1997 return to Chinese sovereignty.  The Hong Kong government says the effect of the Beijing massacre won't be seen in 1989's final emigration numbers because of the time it takes for applications to be filed, processed and acted upon.  Nevertheless, many private analysts are skeptical that fewer people are leaving this year.  Since China's brutal suppression of the pro-democracy movement in Beijing, thousands of prospective Hong Kong emigrants have flooded the consulates of the three most popular destinations -- Canada, Australia and the U.S. -- seeking visa applications.  A new resident visa program announced by Singapore attracted 20,000 potential applicants on its first day.  However, the government cautioned against assuming that all those who have sought visa applications in recent weeks would actually emigrate or would be qualified to emigrate.  It also said that the immigration quotas of the destination countries would ultimately determine how many Hong Kong people can leave and how quickly.  Because of these overseas limitations, the government predicts that the number of emigrants will settle into a range of 55,000 to 60,000 annually for the next few years.  Still, that would be three times the 20,000-a-year average of the early 1980s.  Emigration from Hong Kong jumped in 1987, partly because of growing nervousness over 1997 and partly because of increased opportunities to emigrate to Canada and Australia.  Both countries have been seeking entrepreneurs and skilled workers.  Although businessmen and local politicians began complaining about a brain drain of managers and professionals in 1987, the government at first tried to minimize the emigration issue by saying that Hong Kong people traditionally have been mobile.  A large part of the colony's 5.7 million population consists of refugees from Chinese communism.  However, faced with mounting evidence that emigration was accelerating because of worries about 1997, the government in May 1988 established the emigration task force to study the issue.  In announcing the task force's findings to date on Friday, the government repeated that it wouldn't restrict freedom of movement from Hong Kong and said that the Sino-British agreement on the return of the colony to China also guarantees freedom of movement.  Although a number of Southeast Asian and Caribbean countries have announced plans for investment-linked resident visas or passports, Hong Kong government officials said their research shows that 90% of the emigrants to date have gone to Canada, Australia and the U.S.  The brain drain is also borne out in the the government's study of those who have left.  For instance, "disproportionately more" emigrants are in the 25-to-44 age group than the population at large, the government says.  Also, the emigrants are better educated than the general population.  In 1987, 5,600 people, or 18.7% of total emigrants, held college degrees.  In 1988, 6,900, or 15% of total emigrants, held college degrees.  Only 3.5% of the general population hold degrees.  Furthermore, many of the emigrants are managers and professionals.  Of the 30,000 emigrants in 1987, some 7,400, or 25% of the total, were in the "professional, technical, administrative and managerial" categories of the work force.  Of the 45,800 emigrants in 1988, 11,200, or 24% of the total, were in this category. (About 11% of Hong Kong's work force is categorized as professional, technical, administrative or managerial.)  Although emigration-related turnover of staff has caused trouble for individual companies, the government hasn't been able to calculate the cost of emigration to the overall economy.  In announcing the statistics, government spokesman Mike Rowse said the projections for the 1990s take into account local reaction to the June 4 massacre.  He added that Hong Kong companies have so far been able to replace those leaving by stepping up training programs and promoting from within.  In some cases, expatriates are being brought in, though more may be needed.  And there is a still a flow of Hong Kong people with new passports coming back to the colony, he said, adding that it was hard determine exactly how many.  On the other hand, Mr. Rowse said, emigration is "doing damage by the loss of talent and doing damage indirectly to the morale of people left behind."  He said that the government projections take into account the new Singapore visa package, which could allow up to 100,000 people to emigrate over the next decade.  He also said it includes the possibility that the U.S. may raise its annual visa quota for Hong Kong as high as 10,000 people from 5,000 currently.  But he said it was difficult to factor in recent promises by Britain to devise an emigration "insurance" package for at least part of the population if conditions sour after 1997.  "The whole idea is to keep Hong Kong people here and keep Hong Kong successful, not to have them go and live on the other side of the world," he said.  About 1,000 Hong Kong residents a year emigrate to Britain. (People born in Hong Kong, though they carry passports issued by Britain, don't have the right to live in Britain.)  After the June 4 massacre, Hong Kong pressure groups stepped up efforts to lobby British lawmakers and win back the right of abode, which was lost through a series of British nationality acts since World War II. However, with both the British government and a wide range of opposition politicians lined up against the issue, it is unlikely to succeed.  By virtue of birth and other criteria, about 3.3 million Hong Kong people would qualify for right of abode in the U.K., but British politicians have said such a number of immigrants would overwhelm British social services.  Mr. Rowse called on British lawmakers to consider the right of abode "as an issue of principle rather than one of Asian immigration."  Launching a battle in a bitter war, federal regulators filed a civil lawsuit seeking more than $1.1 billion from American Continental Corp. Chairman Charles H. Keating Jr., various members of his family and officers and directors of the parent of California's Lincoln Savings & Loan Association.  The suit, filed Friday in U.S. District Court in American Continental's Phoenix, Ariz., headquarters city, alleges Mr. Keating and his family profited through insider dealing, illegal loans, sham real-estate and tax transactions, and the fraudulent sale of Lincoln stock to employees of the parent company.  The suit also named a number of subsidiaries of American Continental, which itself was taken under Chapter 11 federal bankruptcy-law protection the day before Lincoln was seized by regulators last April.  Moreover, Mr. Keating and six of the other defendants Friday were charged with racketeering.  Of the damages sought, $250 million stem from charges brought under the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations law and could be trebled by the court.  Although the suit alleges that Lincoln sustained total damages in excess of $1.1 billion, total damages could exceed $2.5 billion, according to an attorney familiar with the complaint.  In addition to naming Mr. Keating, the 160-page suit alleges wrongdoing by his wife, several of their children and their childrens' spouses, many of whom work for American Continental or its Lincoln unit, based in Irvine, Calif.  The action also names William Keating, Charles Keating's brother and a former judge and U.S. congressman from Ohio who more recently was publisher of the Cincinnati Enquirer.  William Keating, who was an American Continental director for roughly one year, said he received a copy of the suit only yesterday and declined to comment until after reviewing it.  Charles Keating, the 66-year-old real-estate developer and heavy political contributor to candidates of both political parties, has vociferously complained that the government has waged a personal vendetta against him for repudiating its thrift-industry policies.  He was said to be traveling and unavailable to comment over the weekend.  But A. Melvin McDonald, a former U.S. attorney in Phoenix who represents American Continental and its principals, said the allegations in the suit are "trying to take things that are completely harmless and trying to make something sinister out of them."  He said American Continental was "absolutely confident" that a jury would find in its favor.  Mr. McDonald said he was struck by "the mean-spirited nature of the lawsuit, which isn't surprising.  It identifies personal members of Mr. Keating's family -- wives, husbands -- virtually seeking not only to destroy Keating but to destroy members of his family as well."  He also charged regulators with leaking to reporters substantial portions of the suit as it was being prepared, saying that "we've now been defending this lawsuit for six weeks" in the press.  Charging racketeering, he said, is an attempt "to get sex appeal in their case.  These {defendants} aren't racketeers, these are people that are builders, that have been patriots of this country."  Charles Keating has said that American Continental's acquisition of Lincoln more than six years ago was designed to allow it to benefit from liberal California thrift rules that permitted high levels of direct investment in real estate, junk bonds and other activities potentially more lucrative for an S&L than the traditional thrift-industry home-mortgage vehicle.  But the suit by Resolution Trust Corp. -- the first it has filed since being signed into law by President Bush in August to oversee sales or mergers of the nation's insolvent thrifts -- charges that Mr. Keating and American Continental acquired Lincoln as a way of using its government-insured deposits as a personal cache for real-estate deals.  It says they engaged in circular transactions that benefited the Keating family and parent-company officials at the expense of Lincoln and the savings-and-loan deposit insurance fund.  For example, the suit contends that family members sold personal American Continental stockholdings to American Continental's employee stock ownership plan.  Lincoln put up $15 million of its property as collateral for a loan that the ESOP needed to buy the Keating stock.  The transaction resulted in a loss to Lincoln of $11 million, the suit says.  The suit also alleges that American Continental fraudulently siphoned funds from Lincoln, supposedly to pay the S&L's share of tax liabilities on certain loans.  Regulators say that the loans actually were sham transactions, and that American Continental used the funds for other purposes besides paying taxes.  The suit alleges that Lincoln sustained losses in excess of $125 million.  Lincoln also had losses of $76 million, the suit claims, in a series of loans involving Rancho Vistoso, a real-estate project near Tucson, Ariz.  The suit says that the loans were granted without appraisals of the real estate, and that American Continental then drained profits from Lincoln through a complex series of transactions.  For example, Lincoln sold an equity interest in the project to American Continental, a purchase the parent financed with proceeds of "illusory transactions with Lincoln subsidiaries," according to the suit.  Some specific allegations could provide a window on possible criminal charges that could be the next step in the legal entanglements between Mr. Keating and the federal government.  An industry attorney familiar with the case said a grand jury in Los Angeles has been investigating the company for possible criminal charges, although prosecutors there decline to comment.  One case cited in the litigation Friday involved a sale of stock in Memorex International in which Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. played a part.  American Continental was a major customer of former Drexel junk-bond king Michael Milken.  The suit said Lincoln tried to sell the Memorex stock to its parent for $2.8 million, based on a fairness opinion it had obtained from Drexel, but S&L regulators rejected the sale.  So, according to the suit, a Lincoln subsidiary sold the Memorex stock to a third party for $1 million, and then American Continental bought the stock for $2 million from the third party, and later resold it for $13.3 million.  For his part, Charles Keating has filed suit in federal court in Washington, D.C., seeking Resolution Trust's removal as conservator of Lincoln.  The RTC subsequently put Lincoln in receivership.  His suit terms the April seizure of Lincoln's property unconstitutional.  The company also has filed a $150 million suit against the regulators, accusing them of "a pattern of harassment and misrepresentation."  The RTC explained its legal action Friday by noting that "under the assignment given to us by the president and Congress to deal with the thrift industry crisis, we have a clear responsibility to take legal action where appropriate to reduce any losses to American taxpayers growing out of fraudulent financial activity."  Many industry consultants believe that the thrift could cost taxpayers as much as $2 billion by the time it is sold, merged or liquidated.  Mr. Keating, however, lately has been saying that there isn't much that could be recovered from him personally.  The executive, who has been most active recently running the Phoenician luxury resort in the Arizona capital, contends that he has been selling off assets and that almost all his family's wealth is in the moribund stock of American Continental.  Thou shalt not leave Drexel Burnham?  That seems to be the message at Drexel Burnham Lambert Group Inc., which is completing a wrenching restructuring spurred by its settlement in the insider-trading scandal.  Now closely held Drexel has proposed a bylaws change that effectively discourages defections by employees holding Drexel stock.  Under the proposed bylaws change, which Drexel hasn't publicly announced, shareholders who leave the firm will have to wait significantly longer to cash in their stock than they currently do.  In fact, says a Drexel official, the average length of the payout period in which departing shareholders get paid for all of their Drexel holdings will jump to 5.5 years under the new plan, from the current 1.4 years.  The wait will increase particularly for those with more than $100,000 invested.  Drexel is one of the two largest closely held U.S. securities firms; the other is Goldman, Sachs & Co.  At such concerns, the equity that employee shareholders have in the firm is an important part of both the company's financial strength and an indicator of employee morale.  Lawrence Eckenfelder, a securities industry analyst at Prudential-Bache Securities Inc. in Los Angeles, said even though Drexel employees generally have been happy, management could be concerned that "if a bunch of people would depart the firm, it'd put more pressure on their equity base than in years past."  He said the payout change, if approved, will probably help Drexel retain employees.  About 1,000 Drexel employees have purchased and own Drexel shares; others own shares through the firm's employee-bonus plan.  In all, Drexel workers have some $1.1 billion invested in the firm, representing a significant portion of Drexel's $1.9 billion in year-end 1988 capital, according to its latest annual report.  Drexel insists its shareholder-payout changes aren't spurred by any concerns about its capital base or disgruntled shareholders.  Indeed, until now, few important employees have quit Drexel, despite two years of government civil and criminal investigations of the firm and its employees that culminated this month in Drexel's guilty plea to six felony counts.  But Drexel has nonetheless shed about 40% of its staff during its past six months' of restructuring, which included the sale of its brokerage network for individual investors.  Some employees say there is a fear Drexel would be vulnerable if there were defections from several of the large remaining shareholders, such as those snubbed by certain management changes.  A Drexel spokesman said the firm has no such worries.  Instead, said the spokesman, Drexel is merely changing to a "more conventional" from a "liberal" way of structuring payouts to departing shareholders, "in line with what other {closely held} firms are doing."  This year was the right time for the change because of all of Drexel's other restructuring, the spokesman said.  Drexel's 5,500 workers -- down from about 9,200 in April and 10,300 before the insider-trading inquiry -- will vote on the payout change at a special meeting Friday.  Under the current and proposed payout schedules, employees who quit receive 30% of the value of their shares after 90 days.  But while under the current system, employees get fully 90% of their total payout after 18 months, under the new plan they must wait several years after the initial 30% payment.  They would get the other 70% in a 10%-a-year trickle in each of years four through 10.  There are several exceptions to the new plan; for example, employees with less than $50,000 invested in the firm get everything back within 60 days under both the current and proposed payout plans.  So why would the larger Drexel holders vote yes?  Among other things, say Drexel officials, the bylaws change promises a newly instituted dividend plan tied to Drexel earnings.  Also, they argue that until the final payout, Drexel employees should get a good return on their money.  Already deducted from the $1.1 billion shareholders' equity figure, said Drexel, is the stake of indicted former junk-bond chief Michael Milken, as well as about $61 million paid this year to other employees who left the firm as the result of the sale of its retail-brokerage network and the severe shrinking of other operations such as municipal finance, municipal-bond trading and over-the-counter stocks.  Drexel considers the payout bylaws change as the final piece in all of this year's restructuring.  According to Drexel, there are no plans for any additional large-scale staff cuts.  A federal appeals court in New Orleans threw out a federal natural-gas-pricing regulation, a move that could lead to refunds of as much as $100 million for gas customers nationwide.  Under the 1986 regulation, Order 451, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission allowed producers to bring contracts governing certain low-priced gas to pipelines for renegotiation at a higher price.  The gas was called shut-in gas because its price was so low that the producers weren't making it available under the contracts.  In a limited number of cases, the pipelines could bring certain high-priced contracts to the negotiations with the aim of lowering the price.  If the negotiations fell through, the producers could abandon the contracts.  The commission said 1,600 contracts were renegotiated under the order.  The appeals court ruled that Order 451 exceeded FERC's authority.  The ruling by a three-judge panel has no dissenting opinion, although one judge reserved the right to file a concurring or dissenting opinion.  Martha Hesse, chairwoman of the commission, said she would probably recommend that the commission appeal the case to the Supreme Court.  Private groups estimated that if the high court upholds the ruling, the commission will probably require producers to return the higher prices to consumers through refunds totaling up to $100 million.  The ruling, written by Judge Sam Johnson, came in a case brought by Mobil Oil Exploration & Producing Southeast Inc., a unit of Mobil Corp., and various other groups, including the American Gas Association and the Citizen/Labor Energy Coalition.  Edwin Rothschild, assistant director of the coalition, called the ruling "a great victory for consumers."  Michael Baly, executive vice president of the American Gas Association, said the group is "pleased" that the court agreed with its argument "that Congress didn't give FERC the authority to raise old gas prices."  Mobil spokesmen couldn't be reached for comment.  Canada's Atomic Energy Control Board deferred a decision on the proposed startup of the Darlington nuclear station, a nuclear-power plant on Lake Ontario, pending further safety studies.  The delay could result in tight Ontario power supplies this winter, which would force the province to import high-priced electricity from neighboring U.S. states, Ontario Hydro warned.  The utility, which is owned by the Ontario provincial government, also said a delay would hurt its efforts to curb acid rain by replacing old pollution-causing power plants with new installations.  The board said its staff needed more time to review the Darlington plant's safety measures, particularly the software of a new computer-controlled emergency shutdown system.  Rene Levesque, president of the Atomic Energy Control Board, said the board was "very much aware of the considerable costs involved in a licensing delay for Darlington, but we must be satisfied that public and worker safety are assured."  The Darlington plant is about 50 miles east of Toronto.  Its eventual planned output of 3,524,000 kilowatts would be enough power to meet the needs of most of metropolitan Toronto.  The plant, which is expected to cost about 12 billion Canadian dollars (US$10.13 billion) is to have four nuclear reactors.  Construction of one reactor has been completed, another is 75% complete, a third is 35% complete and the fourth is more than 15% complete.  Ontario Hydro planned to start the Darlington station Oct. 10 and test it for two to three weeks at about 1% of capacity.  If tests were satisfactory, the utility planned to ask the board at its Nov. 2 meeting to let it to proceed to full operation.  Mr. Levesque said it would take at least a month for the board's staff to complete a detailed review of the safety shutdown system and certain other aspects of reactor.  The board blamed Ontario Hydro for the delay, saying it only received some essential data from the utility in recent days.  Ontario Hydro has experienced heavier than expected power demand because of Ontario's strong economic growth.  It has increased its electricity purchases from its neighboring provinces of Quebec and Manitoba and from Michigan.  Canada's exports of electricity to the U.S. for the first six months of this year fell 35% from a year earlier to 11.55 billion kilowatt hours.  Canada's imports of U.S. electricity during the same period rose 61% to 4.99 billion kilowatt hours.  The tax bill approved by the House Ways and Means Committee last week, which would end tax benefits for certain securities, didn't include special treatment for a pending $3.35 billion tender offer for American Medical International Inc.  IMA Holdings Corp., an investment group that includes the Pritzker family of Chicago and First Boston Corp., had hoped that its $28-a-share offer for the Beverly Hills, Calif.-based hospital chain would be exempted from the proposed new rules.  "The clarification IMA sought was not forthcoming.  IMA will now seek clarification from the Senate," said an IMA spokeswoman.  The committee's refusal to grandfather the IMA offer, on top of the recent price drop in the high-yield securities market, has fueled doubts that the transaction can be financed on its original terms, analysts said.  "The offer was generous in the first place, and it's looking richer all the time," said John Hindelong, an analyst at Donaldson Lufkin & Jenrette.  That view was reflected in the stock market Friday, as American Medical slid $1.25 to $22.125 on turnover of about 1.5 million shares in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  The shares have slipped more than $4 since the acquisition agreement was reached in July, and the offer has been extended three times.  It is now set to expire on Sept. 27.  First Boston, which has agreed to invest $100 million of its own funds, and is arranging $713 million in subordinated debt financing for the deal, has already been hurt by weakened conditions in the junk-bond market, analysts said.  The investment banking concern had to withdraw a bond offering for Ohio Mattress Co. last month because of lack of investor interest.  And First Boston is believed to hold a large stake in the depressed bonds of Campeau Corp., the cash-starved retailing giant.  While analysts say that First Boston has too much prestige riding on the American Medical purchase to abandon it, they worry that the price will have to be lowered.  "The question I'm hearing, that I don't have an answer for, is whether that would mean that American Medical would have to reopen the bidding," said Margo L. Vignola, an analyst at Salomon Brothers Inc.  The IMA offer topped proposals made by several rival bidders for the hospital company, including a group formed by M. Lee Pearce.  Dr. Pearce, a Miami physician, sold his 10% stake -- or about seven million shares -- for a net price of $26.375 each shortly after the IMA agreement was announced.  While President Bush continues to hedge on whether and when to restore full ties with China, other prominent Americans are rushing back in -- including the president's brother.  Prescott Bush, on a business swing through Asia, spent the weekend in Beijing meeting with officials and potential partners for several China-investment deals.  The visit comes at a time of continuing uncertainty in U.S.-China business relations.  Some U.S. businessmen have hesitated to return to China or pursue new deals so soon after the June 4 massacre in Beijing, when troops opened fire and killed hundreds, perhaps thousands, of unarmed pro-democracy demonstrators.  Indeed, Bush administration policies continue to frustrate some U.S. business interests, both directly and indirectly.  A continued arms-sales embargo has cost U.S. companies millions in export sales.  And continuing State Department travel warnings indirectly send the message to businessmen that it still isn't business as usual.  Nonetheless, the president's brother believes this is a good time to be in China.  "We aren't a bunch of carrion birds coming to pick the carcass," Mr. Bush says.  "But there are big opportunities in China, and America can't afford to be shut out.  We don't want to lose the market to the Japanese, the Germans or anyone else."  Mr. Bush chafes at suggestions, frequently raised by the media, that he is taking advantage of his relationship with the president to further his business interests.  "There's no conflict of interest," he says, referring to his involvement in China.  "This is something that has been going on for years."  But, he concedes: "It doesn't hurt that my brother is the president of the United States."  Mr. Bush is representing Asset Management, International Financing & Settlement Ltd., a financial-services company that is trying to line up several investment projects in China, including a wood-processing venture and a satellite-linked computer data base network.  Mr. Bush is a senior adviser to the company.  Mr. Bush also will travel this week to Shanghai, where he is helping to build an $18 million joint-venture deluxe country club for expatriate residents.  Mr. Bush has a 30% stake in the project, which, when completed, will include an 18-hole golf course, 12 tennis courts and other facilities.  While in Shanghai, Mr. Bush also will discuss plans to construct a $20 million town-house complex for foreign residents.  He expects to take a 50% stake in that project.  In addition to Mr. Bush, other politically well-connected Americans are on their way to China.  High-ranking U.S. officials still won't visit, but former officials are showing little hesitation in renewing old friendships in China.  Alexander Haig Jr., secretary of state under President Reagan and currently chairman of Worldwide Associates Inc., will give the keynote address Oct. 2 to a conference marking the 10th anniversary of China International Trust & Investment Corp., or Citic, a state-owned multinational.  Many top Chinese government leaders will be on hand.  A number of U.S. businessmen are boycotting the event -- which coincides with China's national day celebration Oct. 1 -- in light of events here in June.  Citic is disappointed with the level of U.S. participation.  Henry Kissinger, who has opposed sanctions against China and who has extensive business interests of his own in China, turned down an invitation to speak at the event. (Citic got Mr. Haig to replace him.) But Mr. Kissinger will be in China in November, when he plans to hold private meetings with Chinese officials.  Another old friend of China, Richard Nixon, plans to visit before the end of the year.  Word of the separate Kissinger and Nixon visits has been manipulated by the official Chinese media in an attempt to show people here and abroad that it's business as usual in China.  W. Dennis Thomas, 45 years old, was named vice president of federal-corporate affairs at this pulp and paper maker.  He had been a director in that capacity.  Prior to joining the company in 1987, Mr. Thomas had served in the Reagan administration in various capacities.  The long-running scare over asbestos is turning out to be the "War of the Worlds" of environmental panics.  As with Orson Welles's famous scary radio broadcast, the asbestos panic has been whipped up by endless evening news reports about how the nation's schools were cancer traps.  A group of specialists on asbestos and disease gathered at Harvard recently and their report concluded what most serious scientists already knew: "Using conservative (pessimistic) assumptions, mesothelioma and lung-cancer risk projections from exposures to indoor asbestos for school-age children and the general population were generally agreed by all the symposium participants to be quite small."  The cost, however, has been quite large.  According to Kate Herber, legislative counsel for the National School Board Association, asbestos-removal costs could for elementary and secondary schools be as high as $6 billion.  This figure is only the removal costs for 671 of the more than 15,000 public-school districts around the country who answered a survey.  The cost of compliance of just the surveyed schools from fiscal 1986 to fiscal 1990 will approach $464 million.  "A lot of that money that used to go to educational programs is now going to comply with EPA regulations," says Ms. Herber.  According to the Harvard report, the average levels of airborne asbestos in buildings where the asbestos is intact are "extremely low," and it suggests that the emphasis should be on maintenance of asbestos, since removal, if improperly done, usually is more dangerous than just leaving it alone.  The report goes on to say that cigarette smoke or radon pose a much greater risk than inplace asbestos.  Interestingly, the report shares the school boards' concern that what the symposium called "fiber phobia" may be diverting money from other pressing needs.  One that springs to mind is the schools' war on drugs.  If there is an architect of this expensive public-policy fiasco it is Democratic Congressman Jim Florio of New Jersey.  Mr. Florio was the principal sponsor of the Asbestos Hazard Emergency Response Act of 1986, which mandates that schools inspect their buildings for asbestos and take appropriate action.  The principal effect of the Florio bill, of course, has been to publicize its flawed premise that asbestos in buildings is a significant cancer threat.  It simply isn't.  For reasons of its own, the Environmental Protection Agency hasn't made much effort to put the asbestos issue into proper scientific perspective, even in the wake of the Harvard report.  Charles Elkins, an EPA spokesman, says that the findings of the Harvard report is a position "we've taken for a good number of years."  This surely is news to a lot of private and public schools that have torn apart their budgets to satisfy the asbestos mandates.  Indeed, the politicians' phobia over asbestos continues.  New York City, for instance, is considering a removal law.  The costs would be prohibitive.  According to a spokesman for the World Trade Center, removal costs would be $300 million to $350 million for just the trade center.  The one group that might conceivably be at some risk from asbestos is workers, such as plumbers or electricians, who might spend time around asbestos that's being dislodged.  But the Occupational Safety and Health Administration imposes regulations that, though stringent, concede the relative harmlessness of casual exposure to most asbestos.  In 1986, OSHA issued revised standards that said that "countless maintenance operations involving the handling of asbestos-containing materials are conducted . . . and these operations, which are small in scale and of short duration, are vastly dissimiliar in degree of hazard to many other asbestos-related construction operations, such as asbestos-abatement projects."  In other words, if anyone's in danger, it is people around projects that are tearing out asbestos.  Despite all this, Rep. Florio now wants to extend his law to all private and public buildings and has introduced an amendment to the 1986 act.  Some of his colleagues, however, have received an earful from their local school boards, and Congress has hired a consultant to do a two- to three-year study of the potential effects of the bill.  After these accomplishments, Mr. Florio is pursuing the current logic of upward mobility in American politics; he's running for the governorship of New Jersey.  The asbestos story is an archetype of how in our time negligible health hazards are blown up into plague-sized problems.  Scientists are starting to use a phrase to describe the politicians' response: too much money chasing too little risk.  Charles F. Ray, executive vice president of this business products company, was named president and chief operating officer, effective Dec. 31.  He succeeds Robert L. Mitchell, who is retiring at that time.  Mr. Mitchell will continue to serve on the board.  Vice President Dan Quayle candidly answered a question about strategic defenses the other day, and ended up being mugged by a straw man.  The episode is worth replaying because it illustrates the fog of misunderstanding, some of it willful, that has surrounded the debate over anti-nuclear defenses.  In an interview with the Los Angeles Times, Mr. Quayle was asked if the Bush administration is scaling back its plans for SDI. Mr. Quayle replied: "The Reagan administration . . . talked about this impenetrable shield that was going to be completely leak proof. . . .  I believe that in the semantics of let's say political jargon, that that was acceptable.  But it clearly was stretching the capability of a strategic defense system."  He continued, "I think since that time the capability . . . has been clearly rethought.  We are looking at what is militarily effective and how this will be used for deterrence . . . and how it will be used in different types of situations."  The vice president then spent several minutes offering real-world uses for defenses, but he might as well have been talking to himself.  The Hallelujah Chorus of SDI critics broke into headlines and cheers, claiming Dan Quayle had finally blown the cover off Ronald Reagan's political illusions.  Our own view is that Mr. Quayle's remarks will have been worth the furor if they finally blow away the SDI straw man of a perfect "Astrodome" defense.  For most supporters of SDI, including us, the Astrodome has never been the realistic goal.  The point of introducing strategic defenses of some kind, virtually any kind, is to move away from mutual-assured destruction -- the goofy but influential notion that to prevent nuclear war every nation must be defenseless against nuclear weapons.  Ronald Reagan was making a moral point: It is wrong to leave a nation vulnerable in the name of making it safe; anti-nuclear defense is not illicit.  Mr. Reagan understood that if he unleashed American science on defenses, it could find answers.  And that is precisely what has been happening.  SDI's Delta 183 mission is even now yielding valuable data about the abilities of sensors in space.  At Livermore Labs, scientists think they've discovered a way to make space-based interceptors that are small and smart -- so-called brilliant pebbles.  In a successful August test called "On-Target," a sensor inside a building locked onto a rocket plume on the desert range at Edwards Air Force Base -- achieving another stage in the development of interceptors.  A few months ago, SDI scientists in California successfully fired the large Alpha laser.  Even if these technologies someday add up to a partial defense, they can contribute to deterrence.  They can put doubt in the mind of a Soviet nuclear planner: If 50% of his first-strike missiles may be destroyed by U.S. defenses, he will be that much less likely to strike at all.  Beyond the Soviets, nations from India to Brazil are developing ballistic missiles.  It strikes us as perverse to leave Americans defenseless against this emerging threat of the 1990s.  Dan Quayle, among others, has tried to explain all this, but the efforts keep getting lost amid the cheers over the death of the Astrodome myth.  Just last week, Senator Bennett Johnston of Louisiana whooped an amendment through the Senate Appropriations Committee to cut SDI spending next year to $3.7 billion ($1 billion less than Mr. Bush's request), and to micromanage most of that.  The news about SDI isn't what Dan Quayle did to a straw man, but what Congress is doing to the real thing.  Rick Faulk was named vice president, marketing for this software developer.  He will report to Frank King, senior vice president, and be responsible for overall marketing strategy.  Mr. Faulk succeeds Mark Flanagan, who resumes full-time responsibility as president of Lotus Publishing, a subsidiary.  Before coming to Lotus, Mr. Faulk founded two companies, First Software Corp., a distributor, and Creative Concepts Corp., which created and licensed software for developing personalized children's books, Lotus said.  New American Shoe Co. filed for protection from creditors under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code.  The petition was filed in U.S. Bankruptcy Court in Puerto Rico, where the Plainview, N.Y., company has manufacturing facilities.  New American Shoe, a maker of discount casual and athletic shoes, was established in April 1988 under a plan of reorganization filed by Amfesco Industries Inc., a predecessor company that had a similar Chapter 11 proceeding, under which a company continues operations while working out a plan to pay debt.  Robert Pollack, president of New American, said the company couldn't overcome the $21 million debt burden inherited from its predecessor.  New American Shoe listed assets of $17 million and liabilities of $48 million, he said.  The largest creditors are Chemical Bank, a unit of Chemical Banking Corp.; Irving Trust Co., a unit of Bank of New York Corp.; Security Pacific Business Credit Inc., a unit of Security Pacific Corp., and ContiTrade Financial Services.  Only Security Pacific is a fully secured creditor, according to Mr. Pollack.  Mr. Pollack said the company had negotiated since February with Chemical Bank, Irving Trust and Banco Popular de Puerto Rico, which collectively hold 30% of New American's stock, to reduce the debt burden to a level that could attract investors.  Those negotiations proved unsuccessful, Mr. Pollack said.  Under the 1988 reorganization plan, Robert B. Campbell, New American Shoe's chairman, owned 55% of the company, while the three banks owned 30% and shareholders the rest.  Mr. Campbell's $20 million investment in the company had partly funded the reorganization plan.  In a news release, the company said it had experienced severe financial problems almost from its inception.  Negotiations with potential investors and financial institutions about obtaining additional funding have been unsuccessful but are continuing, the release stated.  According to New American Shoe, the Puerto Rican government has expressed interest in keeping the company's factories there operating, and has arranged for private and government financial institutions to discuss local investment possiblities with the company.  Joseph J. Grano Jr., was elected to the board of this marketer of oil and natural gas partnerships, increasing board membership to 11.  Mr. Grano is president of retail sales and marketing for PaineWebber Inc., New York.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Appalachian Power Co., shelf offering of up to $100 million principal amount of first mortgage bonds.  Comcast Corp., offering of $150 million of debentures, via Merrill Lynch Capital Markets and Lazard Freres & Co.  Continental Cablevision Inc., offering of $350 million principal amount of debentures, via Morgan Stanley & Co. and Lazard Freres.  Devcon International Corp., proposed offering of 900,000 common shares, of which 300,000 are to be sold by the company and the remainder by holders, via William Blair & Co., Raymond James & Associates Inc., and Edward D. Jones & Co.  Kemper Corp., shelf offering of up to $100 million princpal amount of debt securities.  Philippine Fund Inc., initial offering of five million common shares, via Nomura Securities International Inc., CL Global Partners Securities Corp., and International Finance Corp.  Weirton Steel Corp., offering of $300 million principal amount of senior notes, via Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., Bear, Stearns & Co. and Lazard Freres.  Westinghouse Credit Corp., a subsidiary of Westinghouse Electric Corp., shelf offering for up to 2,000 shares, or up to $200 million worth, of variable term preference stock.  Mitchel Ross, executive vice president and general counsel, was named chief executive officer.  He succeeds Albert Holgerson Jr., who resigned partly because of differences with the thrift-institution's regulators.  Jay Fialkow, an outside director, was named chairman of the board, succeeding Mr. Holgerson.  Martin Heck, president and chief operating officer, was appointed to the board.  Francis Brennan, vice chairman, was given the additional title of chairman of New England banking.  The Bush administration is taking flak over its decision to hold down the number of refugees allowed into the U.S. this coming year for budgetary reasons.  "I resent the implication," Deputy Secretary of State Lawrence Eagleburger said Friday, "that we have some heartless, niggardly, conservative approach to this problem.  But there are limits on the numbers we can take."  If the problem is simply the estimated $7,000 per refugee processing costs, why not loan the refugees the money to get across the first hump?  Considering how many deadbeats the U.S. loans money to already, refugees seeking freedom and work surely would be the one group that would pay America back quickly and cheerfully.  Hellene S. Runtagh, 41 years old, was named president of GE Information Services, a computing and tele-processing services unit with annual revenue about $500 million.  She succeeds W. James McNerney Jr., recently named executive vice president of GE Capital.  Ms. Runtagh has been president of Decimus Corp., a computer financing subsidiary of GE Capital.  GE also has interests in broadcasting, lighting products, jet engines, appliances and plastics.  Olympia & York Developments Ltd. will have greater influence in the management of Campeau Corp. under terms of its $250 million loan to the struggling real-estate and retailing concern.  Campeau Chairman Robert Campeau "is no longer calling the shots on his own," said a finance executive close to Campeau.  In a statement late Friday, Campeau said it agreed to the terms of the O&Y convertible loan.  But Campeau said it still needed its banks' approval of the loan's terms and conditions, which include postponing the due date of an $800 million loan to April from January.  O&Y is an investment holding and real-estate development concern closely held by Toronto's wealthy Reichmann family.  Campeau also said Friday that a management group reporting to a committee of Campeau directors will "take charge" of refinancing and restructuring the company's cash-starved Federated Department Stores and Allied Stores units.  As previously reported, Campeau intends to sell its Bloomingdale's department store chain to reduce the company's $10 billion of debt.  A Campeau spokeswoman said O&Y "will definitely be represented" on the board committee, but she didn't know if Mr. Campeau would be part of it or whether Edward J. DeBartolo Corp. and Campeau's banks would also have representation.  DeBartolo, a Youngstown, Ohio-based developer, lent Campeau $480 million during its $6.6 billon takeover of Federated last year and has a 7.5% equity stake in Federated.  Executives close to Campeau and O&Y said the two O&Y officials currently on Campeau's board, Albert Reichmann, chairman, and Lionel Dodd, chief operating officer, will be on the special committee.  They said O&Y will have a major influence on the refinancing of Federated and Allied and on the possible sale of other department-store chains.  Also, it's expected that the O&Y loan will be convertible into Campeau stock, reducing Mr. Campeau's fully diluted stake in his company to less than 50% and boosting O&Y's current 25% stake.  The delay in getting its lenders' approval of the O&Y loan meant Campeau's Allied Stores unit missed the interest payment due Friday on one series of junk bonds.  Allied said it paid the interest on its 10 1/4% senior notes due 1992 but didn't pay the interest on its 11 1/2% senior subordinated debentures due 1997.  Allied said it has a 30-day grace period within which to make the payment.  Allied didn't indicate the amount of the overdue payment, but analysts said the aggregate interest due Friday on Allied's high-yield bonds was about $50 million.  Campeau also missed the deadline Friday by which it had to either secure financing commitments to buy back $401 million of notes held by First Boston Corp., PaineWebber Inc., and Dillon, Read & Co., or give the underwriters the right to take up 6.96% of Federated's common stock.  The Campeau spokeswoman said the status of the notes is "still open to discussion" with the underwriters.  Trading in Campeau stock was halted Wednesday and didn't resume Thursday or Friday.  This week's revision of the European currency unit isn't likely to alter interest rates on ECU-denominated securities.  But neither will it ease the risks to ECU-based investments caused by West Germany's rising trade surpluses with its European Community partners.  In recent years, those investments have carried low currency risk because of the European Monetary System's efforts to maintain steady exchange rates between most EC countries.  But unless the trade imbalances are addressed by other policy measures, a major realignment of European currencies may become inevitable.  The basic makeup of the new ECU to include the Spanish peseta and Portuguese escudo was determined last June.  At that time, there was no significant adjustment in the relative exchange rates of the present members of the ECU bloc, and a deviation from that structure isn't expected when the revised ECU is fixed this week.  Thus, readjustments in ECU rates have likely already been made.  "The change to the ECU was immediately discounted in the markets last June," says Andres Drobny, economist at Bankers Trust Co.  "But the problems of imbalances between the countries remain.  Those imbalances are growing and the governments aren't responding."  The ECU, which consists of all the currencies in the EC, was last revised in 1984 with the inclusion of the Greek drachma and will be revised again on Wednesday to include the currencies of Spain and Portugal, following their joining the EC in 1986.  Each country's currency is given a weighting in the ECU, based on the size of the country's economy, trade levels and participation in the EC's financial-support mechanism.  The revised ECU gives West Germany the biggest weighting with 30.1 (out of a total 100), down from its previous weighting of 34.59.  France's new weighting will be 19.0 and the U.K.'s 13.0.  The Spanish peseta will enter at 7.94.  Measuring the performance of ECU securities against appropriate benchmarks is complicated by a lack of consistent government ECU-denominated issues over a whole range of maturities.  Many analysts construct theoretical ECU bond yields based on government bonds of each country in proportion to their ECU weighting.  But even that is imperfect because of differing liquidities and issuing practices by the various governments.  Nevertheless, on the surface it would seem logical for ECU interest rates to be higher than would otherwise be the case because of higher inflation in Spain and Portugal.  "With the inclusion of the peseta and escudo, there is apt to be a rise in both the short- and long-term interest rates since the share of so-called soft-currency or high interest countries in the currency basket will increase," according to a study of the ECU by UBS Phillips & Drew.  According to that study, "the short-term ECU market interest rate after the incorporation of the Iberian currencies will be about 85 basis points above the synthetical ECU reference interest rate," which doesn't take the peseta and escudo into consideration.  But Spain's decision in June to also join the EMS exchange-rate mechanism underscores that country's determination to reduce inflation by tying the peseta to a strong currency like the Deutsche mark and accepting the discipline of the Bundesbank.  "Indeed, by 1992, it is highly likely that inflation will be fairly similar in most of the major EMS countries, prompted by the EC drive toward a common market and a common currency," says Jim O'Neill, economist at Swiss Bank Corp.  As long as foreign-exchange rates between the various European currencies remain stable, then fluctuations in interest rates on ECU-denominated securities should respond mainly to the changing fortunes of yields in the constituent credit markets, with the greatest influence exerted by West Germany, France, the U.K. and Italy.  But currency-market pressures caused by concerns over trade imbalances could destabilize the markets for ECU-denominated securities if a major realignment in European exchange rates emerges.  That may occur if the U.S. dollar slumps against the mark.  As long as the strong dollar has made European goods competitive, then concerns in Europe about deficits with Germany have been on a back burner.  An economic slowdown in the U.S. that shrinks world trade, drives down the dollar and reduces Europe's competitveness would make those countries' deficits with Germany harder to ignore.  I enthusiastically recommend "The Nightmare Years" (which began last night and continues tonight through Wednesday, 8-10 p.m. and repeated 10 p.m.-midnight EDT, on Turner Network Television) for two reasons.  First, it tells one of the original true stories behind today's stock figure of the journalist hero -- that of William L. Shirer, the American newspaperman who covered Nazi Germany between 1934 and 1940, initially for Hearst's Universal News Service and subsequently for CBS Radio.  And second, it tells the story well.  Unlike such monster miniseries as "War and Remembrance," "The Nightmare Years" does not plod steadily through the entire course of World War II, munching tons of advertising dollars and planting a heavy footprint on each and every key event.  Instead, it pulls off the delicate task of weaving history into individual experience without slighting either.  Of course, the hard work was already done by Mr. Shirer, whose best-selling memoirs form the basis of Ian Curteis's excellent script.  Perhaps it was inevitable, coming from the Turner network, that this miniseries would employ the latest colorization techniques to insert tinted dramatic scenes -- with Sam Waterston playing Mr. Shirer -- into matching tinted documentary footage of such momentous occasions as the Nazi book burnings, the massive Nuremberg rallies, and the French surrender at Compiegne.  As we know from Woody Allen's "Zelig," however, the effect of such tricks is unavoidably comic.  Much stronger are the sequences that employ old-fashioned film-making techniques such as good writing, acting, editing, directing and production design.  Every character is believably human -- from victims like Victor Schneider (Peter Whitman), a terrified Jewish art historian trying to save his family from the Gestapo; to perpetrators like Josef Goebbels (Kurtwood Smith), Hitler's fanatically loyal minister of propaganda.  Instead of the cartoon brutes populating most TV miniseries, the Nazis in this film display frightening intelligence and subtlety while bickering, plotting and rationalizing their evil deeds.  Even more interesting are the bad guys who don't fit the cartoon Nazi mold at all.  The British actor Ronald Pickup is superb as Ernst "Putzi" Hanfsaengl, the Nazi foreign press chief whose thwarted bohemian instincts and half-baked Harvard education keep interfering with his ideological purity.  Equally intriguing is the fiercely egotistical Nazi film maker Helga Bauer (Frances Barber), a fictionalized version of the film maker Leni Riefenstahl.  Such impressive villains might seem a tough act to follow, but the portrayals of Shirer, his charming Austrian wife, Tess (Marthe Keller), and the other good guys are equally compelling.  Pitted against Goebbels's overweening propaganda machine, a scrappy figure like Norman Ebbutt of the London Times (Peter Jeffrey) looks heroic even when shouting a drunken warning to an arriving delegation of befuddled Britons.  The same is true for the rest of the ragged crew of American and British reporters who balk at being spoon-fed lies.  This battle of individual wills succeeds in putting the global conflict between freedom and totalitarianism into a neat dramatic nutshell.  Here is my only reservation.  One of the characters in "The Nightmare Years" seems to offer a brief for the absolute freedom of the press -- not only from totalitarian control, but also from any sort of restraint imposed either by private management or by democratic government.  The character is a fictionalized American reporter named Peter Butler (Chris Muncke), whose craven obedience to his employers (the Hearst empire) connects seamlessly with his mindless admiration of Hitler.  It's significant that Butler is the film's only real cartoon villain.  It's possible that absolute freedom of the press matters a lot to Mr. Shirer, who left CBS in 1947 after a dispute with both Edward R. Murrow (a friend and colleague) and William S. Paley over Shirer's criticisms, on his weekly radio program, of President Truman's support of the Cold War.  It's also possible that absolute freedom of the press is the credo of another writer who worked on the script -- Bob Woodward of Watergate fame.  For both of these famous and committed journalists, "The Nightmare Years" seems to have been a labor of love.  And why shouldn't it be?  Those years of living dangerously in Berlin and Vienna were a golden age for their profession.  Yet my reservation applies only to the character of Butler.  The miniseries shows Shirer visiting New York in 1935 and being aghast at the reactions of his old crony, Nicholas Roosevelt, a wealthy Republican businessman whose hatred for the Bolsheviks (not to mention for his cousin Franklin) blinds him to the frightening tidings about Hitler.  And in a later scene, we see Shirer chafing at the folly of being required by CBS to cover "human interest" stories like the Vienna Boys' Choir at the very moment of the Anschluss.  But the film's Shirer never draws a facile parallel between these restraints and the Nazi campaign of mass thought control, or between the systematic hate-mongering of Goebbels and the caution -- or paralysis -- of news organizations and democratic governments on the brink of war.  Actually, given the rocky history of press freedoms during the Cold War, the film could have drawn more parallels than it does.  For example, it could have dramatized Murrow's famous remark (made in 1945) that he and his colleagues were going home "to fight the same kind of things we've been fighting here."  In this era of polarized opinion about the power and prerogatives of the media, it's remarkable to see "The Nightmare Years" keep its priorities so straight.  In scenes like the one in which Shirer cooperates with a U.S. Naval Intelligence officer's request to do a little spying on the side, the film illustrates very clearly that the survival of press freedom depends on that of legitimately constituted government.  When confronted with a world-class liar like Goebbels, or (more recently) with the kind of people who thought nothing of whitewashing the blood from Tiananmen Square, it's heartening to know that a line still exists between journalistic pride and journalistic hubris.  Computer Associates International Inc. fired about 900 people at its recently acquired Cullinet Software Inc., cutting swiftly and more deeply than most analysts had expected, former employees said.  Garden City, N.Y.-based Computer Associates, which has earned a reputation for quickly slashing costs at its acquisitions, couldn't be reached for comment yesterday.  Calls to the company on Friday weren't returned.  Cullinet has indicated that there would be layoffs, but hasn't disclosed the extent of the cutbacks.  Three Cullinet managers who were terminated last week said the unexpectedly deep cuts were likely to disrupt customer service and derail product development.  They said many seminar instructors for an annual customer meeting scheduled next week in Atlanta had been among those fired.  About half of the company's applications product development staff also were let go, former employees said.  Still, with expenses slashed, the business could quickly become profitable.  Cullinet has recurring license revenue of about $100 million a year from its large, captive base of customers who use its data-base management software on mainframe computers, according to a report by Scott Smith, an analyst with Donaldson Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp.  Sources said that severance and related payments were expected to cost Computer Associates $30 million, including $10 million in payments to Cullinet executives who weren't retained in the buy-out.  Analysts had predicted that Computer Associates would cut as much as 40% of the work force, which stood at 1,810 employees as of April 30.  Cullinet shareholders voted last week to accept the bid, which had been valued at about $300 million.  In the transaction, Computer Associates agreed to pay one-half of a share of its stock for each of Cullinet's approximately 36 million common shares outstanding.  The acquisition, which was announced in June, brought the end of a software-industry pioneer.  Twenty-year-old Cullinet, once a star of Boston's Route 128 region, was the first software firm listed on the New York Stock Exchange and was among the first to bring off-the-shelf software to market.  Previously, most companies wrote software programs in-house.  But Westwood, Mass.-based Cullinet fell behind in a fast-moving software market.  The company reported its first profit in three years, $2.2 million, in the fourth quarter ended April 30.  Revenue fell 7.7% to $59.3 million.  Revenue for the full year -- Cullinet's last year as an independent company -- was $203 million.  Computer Associates closed on Friday at $17.50 a share in national over-the-counter trading, with 1.4 million shares changing hands.  The Philippines, announcing a final agreement on its latest debt-financing package, said it expects to get nearly $1 billion in new funds from its foreign bankers and hopes to buy back between $1.2 billion and $1.4 billion of existing loans at a "substantial discount."  President Corazon Aquino's office presented the final terms of the 1989-90 restructuring package on Sunday, five days after Philippine officials and commercial-bank representatives resumed talks.  In mid-August, the Philippines reached a preliminary agreement with its bankers, making it the second country after Mexico to do so under a debt-reduction umbrella proposed by U.S. Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady.  The Philippines, owing a total of about $28 billion in foreign debt, is Asia's most troubled debtor.  The Philippine government said the buy-back of loans from foreign creditors would be equivalent to almost 20% of the $7.3 billion currently owed foreign banks in medium and long-term loans.  Manila bankers expect funds to purchase the debt will come from the World Bank, the International Monetary Fund and possibly the Japanese government.  The amount of interest saved through the buy-back could reach as much as $100 million a year.  After last month's preliminary agreement, Central Bank of the Philippines Gov. Jose Fernandez said the government expected to offer a buy-back rate similar to the discount offered by banks in recent months for Philippine debt.  That paper has been trading at a 48% to 49% discount.  The Philippine agreement is based on banks being able to voluntarily choose between subscribing to new loans or offering their existing debt to the government for repurchase.  The government said its estimate of the amount of new funds it expects to receive is based on "preliminary market testing" by the country's 12-bank advisory committee.  Assistance to the Philippines will come almost entirely from its larger creditors.  According to the announcement, the Philippines' "major commercial-bank lenders" will provide 90% of the new money.  Broken Hill Proprietary Co., an Australian steel, mining and oil company, said its net income rose 12% to 272.6 million Australian dollars (US$211.1 million) for the fiscal first quarter.  Earnings a share rose 9.2% to 18.9 Australian cents a share from 17.3 Australian cents a share.  Dividend for the quarter ended Aug. 31 was raised to 17.5 Australian cents a share from 15.5 Australian cents a share a year ago.  Sales and other revenue rose 23% to A$3.42 billion (US$2.65 billion) from A$2.79 billion a year ago.  BHP directors said the increase in revenue was largely because of higher steel sales and the inclusion of sales by Pacific Resources Inc., a Hawaiian oil refiner that BHP purchased in March.  Also, a weaker Australian dollar further boosted revenue, they said.  "Sweeney Todd" has been turned upside down for its revival at the Circle in the Square Theater.  And James Morgan has turned the theater itself almost inside out for this brilliant, small-scale production of the grisly musical with score by Stephen Sondheim and book by Hugh Wheeler.  Mr. Morgan has taken the normally awkward, elongated Circle in the Square stage, surrounded on three sides by steeply banked seats, and made it an eminently playable version of 19th-century London's Fleet Street.  It is the sort of total environment that experimental-theater exponents of 20 years ago often dreamed of but rarely achieved.  Surrounding the auditorium are worn rags hung on clotheslines bathed in red and orange lights; behind the rags are the windows of a hundred tenements with yellow light shining through dusty window panes.  At one end of the stage, smoke curls from a cluster of tilting brick chimneys, while the floor is covered with cobblestones.  Moreover, Mr. Morgan has arranged it so that the action flows smoothly from Sweeney's barber shop and Mrs. Lovett's pie shop at one end, to Judge Turpin's house at the other, with the teeming streets of London in between.  The result is that the audience feels completely drawn into the action, so much so that at one point, when a crazed Sweeney brandishes his polished razor toward members of the audience, many in the first row recoiled physically from his outstretched instrument.  The director of this production, Susan H. Schulman, has accomplished an even more radical transformation by reducing the show from the operatic scale of its original staging in the Gershwin Theater in 1979 to a personal, chamber-music size.  The basic material she started with was complex even without the earlier precedent to work against.  "Sweeney Todd" is based on a modern dramatic version by Christopher Bond of a 19th-century British popular legend.  Sweeney, a London barber, is exiled to a prison camp in Australia on a trumped-up charge by a wicked judge who covets his beautiful wife.  When Sweeney returns, he vows revenge, and is aided in his schemes by Mrs. Lovett, who makes meat pies and has always been in love with him.  In the original production Harold Prince spread the story across a cavernous iron foundry.  Ms. Schulman looks through the other end of the telescope.  Partly this is due to size limitations: She originated "Sweeney" in the tiny 100-seat off-off-Broadway York Theater last spring.  But more importantly, she sees "Sweeney" as an intensely personal story.  Instead of a demented Sweeney, actor Bob Gunton gives us a somber man suffering from injustice, who only gradually grows into an obsessive avenger.  Instead of a hard-edged, jocular Mrs. Lovett, we have in Beth Fowler a good-humored woman who is genuinely in love with Sweeney.  Rather than the 26-piece orchestra in the original production, there are now two players sitting at synthesizers.  So effective, however, are the arrangements of musical director David Krane that the music fills the theater.  Also, the eerie sounds of the synthesizers successfully underscore the macabre material of the play.  In addition, this production is unmiked, so that for once we get the full-throated voices of the singers and not impersonal amplification.  One result of this intimate, accessible "Sweeney Todd" is that we can focus closely on Stephen Sondheim's score.  He has long had a love-hate relationship with lyricism and the romantic.  He enjoys, for instance, a great gift for writing melodies, such as the haunting "Nothing's Going to Harm You," beautifully sung in this production by Eddie Korbich.  At the same time, Mr. Sondheim has always been fearful that the romantic would veer toward the sentimental.  The world, he clearly feels, is not a place of moonlight and roses, but harbors as well a great deal of ugliness and unhappiness.  In "Sweeney" he has found an ideal vehicle for both impulses.  The result is what may well be Mr. Sondheim's most intricate and glorious score.  There is a tremendous amount of beauty in the piece.  Amid the squalor of Dickensian London Streets we find Sweeney's lovely daughter, Johanna (Gretchen Kingsley), held captive by the evil Judge Turpin (David Barron) and courted by a young sailor appropriately named Anthony Hope (Jim Walton).  A rhapsodic hymn to Johanna courses through the entire play.  But the story of Sweeney also has more than its share of gruesomeness.  Sweeney, after all, slits the throats of countless people, and Ms. Schulman is not sparing of the blood that comes spurting out on each occasion.  And, as ever, Mrs. Lovett turns the victims into meat pies.  Frequently Mr. Sondheim juxtaposes the show's comic and macabre elements.  There is a scene, for example, when young Anthony is on stage wandering the streets of London singing the praises of Johanna, who has been whisked away from him, while her offstage voice rings in his ear.  At the same time, Todd in his barber shop at the other end of the stage is singing wistfully about Johanna while he distractedly slits the throat of a customer and drops him casually through a chute to Mrs. Lovett's bake shop below.  The audience is simultaneously moved by the Johanna theme and horrified and amused by the murders.  Finally, this "Sweeney Todd" is closer to us not only because of Ms. Schulman's physical production, but because of the 10 years that have intervened since the play was first done.  Unfortunately, with the great increase in drug-related crime and violence on our city streets, the metaphor of cannibalism in the play and the terrifying events on stage do not seem nearly as remote as we once thought them to be.  Ferranti International Signal PLC, Britain's third-largest defense-electronics company, is mired in a scandal stemming from its 1988 merger with companies controlled by James Guerin, a Pennsylvania arms maker renowned in the defense community for his close ties to the Pentagon and U.S. intelligence officials.  Ferranti hoped to significantly boost its business with the U.S. military by joining forces with Mr. Guerin.  Instead, it is looking into suspected phantom or overstated foreign contracts inherited from one of Mr. Guerin's companies.  And Ferranti, according to analysts and industry officials in the U.S. and Britain, eventually may have to write off $100 million or more of those contracts.  The controversy has raised serious questions about Ferranti's management, as well as the nature of Mr. Guerin's extensive but little-known dealings with Pakistan, South Africa, Iraq and other countries.  Over the weekend, news reports in Britain even speculated about Ferranti's long-term survival if the controversy continues to grow and the suspected contracting irregularities turn out to be more extensive than the company has acknowledged.  Ferranti knew that the secretive Mr. Guerin had almost single-handedly built a backyard workshop into a $500 million-a-year international defense business.  He became deputy chairman of the merged company.  What Ferranti apparently didn't know was that some of Mr. Guerin's arms transactions already were under criminal investigation in the U.S., along with his close association with a now-defunct minority defense contractor.  Barely 15 months after Ferranti completed the $1.54 billion merger, it has become a cautionary tale of the pitfalls of international mergers and acquisitions.  Ferranti's American woes illustrate the special risks of cross-border takeovers of defense concerns, which often have classified contracts and programs otherwise shrouded in secrecy.  The lesson comes as defense companies are responding to shrinking military budgets in the U.S. and elsewhere by seeking to forge international alliances.  "Institutions financing international defense transactions need to be more aware of due diligence issues" to uncover potential financial sleight of hand, says Barbara Bruser, an aerospace industry analyst for Security Pacific Merchant Bank, a unit of Security Pacific Corp.  To unravel the details of military sales, adds Ms. Bruser, foreign purchasers "need to make sure they have adequate U.S. representation."  In this case, Ferranti's top managers handled the bulk of the "due diligence" investigation, according to James Lupton, an official at Baring Bros., the British investment bank that worked on the merger for Ferranti.  Ferranti, already facing other problems, shocked investors last week by announcing an unusual review to determine the value of certain overseas contracts it inherited from a unit of Mr. Guerin's former International Signal & Control Group PLC, which was founded in the U.S. but incorporated in the United Kingdom.  Trading of Ferranti shares was suspended immediately by the London Stock Exchange.  On Friday, Ferranti said it "suspects significant irregularities" on several of the contracts, noting that the issues were "still far from resolved."  Ferranti also announced it hired the auditing firm of Coopers & Lybrand to conduct an urgent investigation.  A Ferranti spokesman said the company wouldn't have any comment, beyond its earlier announcements, until the internal investigation is completed.  Industry officials speculated that cash payments for certain contracts, including some involving Pakistan, prompted the internal investigation.  But the company declined to confirm or deny that.  British news reports over the weekend indicated that Ferranti's management was actively seeking a friendly takeover or cash infusion, and that top officials were in the U.S. for such negotiations.  However, the company's chairman, Sir Derek Alun-Jones, and another top official were at home yesterday.  They declined to be interviewed.  Meanwhile, Mr. Guerin's own legal problems in the U.S. are growing deeper as the Justice Department, the Internal Revenue Service, the Customs Service and other federal agencies step up a criminal investigation of his complicated finances and arms transactions over the years.  In addition to Pakistan, his companies sold military equipment to, among others, China, Iraq, Nigeria, and the United Arab Emirates and Saudi Arabia, according to defense-industry executives.  Law-enforcement officials say that the Philadelphia grand-jury inquiry, which began well before the merger, is focusing on whether the sales complied with U.S. export license requirements and other laws.  Mr. Guerin, who resigned from Ferranti's board in May and sold all his 32 million shares in the company, also remains under investigation by a second Philadelphia federal grand jury for separate dealings with the disgraced and nowbankrupt defense contractor he helped set up in Lancaster, Pa.  Eight officials of the minority-owned firm, United Chem-Con Corp., including former president James Christian, have pleaded guilty to participating in an elaborate conspiracy to defraud the Defense Department of more than $12 million.  Mr. Guerin's brother-in-law, Carl Jacobson, another associate of Mr. Christian, has admitted to bribing a Navy official and also is cooperating with investigators.  Mr. Christian, for his part, has told prosecutors and probation officers that Mr. Guerin, his mentor and a former United Chem-Con director and creditor, was the driving force behind the company's operations.  Neither Mr. Guerin nor his lawyer could be reached for comment over the weekend, but in the past he has disputed that allegation.  Mr. Guerin has such a strong penchant for secrecy that he agreed to pay the former general counsel of one of his companies nearly $2 million in return for, among other things, a pledge that the lawyer wouldn't divulge information about Mr. Guerin's activities or criticize him publicly.  Mr. Guerin is now contesting the agreement on the grounds that he was improperly coerced to sign it.  Mr. Guerin, who prided himself on being a major benefactor of various community and charitable activities in the Lancaster area, has resigned from nearly all of his community posts, put much of his remaining business assets up for sale and moved to Florida.  As part of the United Chem-Con inquiry, prosecutors also are investigating whether Rep. Joseph McDade (R., Pa.) violated election or bribery laws in accepting more than $45,000 in campaign contributions and speaking fees from officials of United Chem-Con and others affiliated with the company.  Rep. McDade recently repaid nearly $20,000 to the trustees of the defunct company, while maintaining through his lawyer that he never acted improperly.  Among the issues being examined by the grand jury are the links between Rep. McDade and Mr. Guerin.  Regardless of how the criminal investigations are resolved, they already have hurt Ferranti's business.  The U.S. Army earlier this year canceled a $23 million contract for bomb fuses originally awarded to one of Mr. Guerin's concerns, and additional Pentagon contract cancellations are likely.  Ferranti officials said that they expected that hundreds of workers at Mr. Guerin's old plant near Lancaster, which is now part of Ferranti Defense Systems, will be laid off or transferred in the next few months.  ---  Joann S. Lublin contributed to this article.  The following were among Friday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Student Loan Marketing Association -- $200 million of 8 1/4% notes, due Sept. 25, 1992, priced at 99.895 to yield 8.29%.  The non-callable notes were priced at a spread of 20 basis points above the Treasury's three-year note and will be sold through underwriters led by Goldman Sachs & Co.  @ MORTGAGES  Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. -- $620 million of Remic mortgage securities offered in 13 classes by PaineWebber Inc.  The offering, Series 93, is backed by Freddie Mac 8 1/2% securities and will be priced at market levels.  The collateral has an underlying weighted average coupon rate of 9.63% and weighted average remaining term to maturity of 26.4 years.  Federal National Mortgage Association -- $400 million of Remic mortgage securities offered in 13 classes by Bear Stearns & Co.  The offering, Series 1989-68, is backed by Fannie Mae 9 1/2% securities.  Pricing terms weren't immediately available from the underwriter.  @ EUROBONDS  There were no new major European debt issues offered Friday.  Friday, September 15, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 9 1/8% high, 8 7/8% low, 8 7/8% near closing bid, 9% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.70% 30 to 44 days; 8.625% 45 to 59 days; 8.50% 60 to 89 days; 8.25% 90 to 119 days; 8.125% 120 to 149 days; 8% 150 to 179 days; 7.625% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.80% 30 days; 8.70% 60 days; 8.60% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.27% one month; 8.25% two months; 8.23% three months; 8.16% six months; 8.16% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.75% one month; 8.65% three months; 8.65% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.70% 30 days; 8.62% 60 days; 8.50% 90 days; 8.47% 120 days; 8.35% 150 days; 8.27% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% one month; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% two months; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% three months; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% four months; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% five months; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 8 15/16% one month; 8 7/8% three months; 8 13/16% six months; 8 13/16% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, September 11, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.64% 13 weeks; 7.64% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 9.95%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.25%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 9.92%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.80%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.24%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  United Brands Co. said it sold its 18.5% interest in FII Fyffes PLC, a distributor of fresh fruit and vegetables, principally in the United Kingdom.  The food concern said the sale would be posted in the third quarter and would result in a gain of about 50 cents a share on a fully diluted basis.  In the third quarter last year, United Brands earned $2.7 million, or 90 cents a share fully diluted, on sales of $763.8 million.  United Brands also said it was considering cost-cutting options, but wouldn't elaborate.  "This slightly built romance," wrote Thomas Hardy in the preface to one of his lesser-known works, "Two on a Tower," "was the outcome of a wish to set the emotional history of two infinitesimal lives against the stupendous background of the stellar universe, and to impart to readers the sentiment that of these contrasting magnitudes the smaller might be the greater to them as men."  Peter Ackroyd, the author of "First Light" (Grove, 336 pages, $19.95), has plainly read "Two on a Tower," and has made not only its Dorset setting but its thematic concerns his own.  Yet while Hardy, with relative constraint, chose in his 1882 novel to focus upon the "infinitesimal lives" of his hero and heroine, Mr. Ackroyd -- a 40-year-old English author whose "T.S.  Eliot: A Life" (1984) and "Chatterton" (1988) made him a hot commodity on these shores -- devotes at least as much attention to "the stellar universe" as to any given character.  Not that he stints on characters, mind you: If Hardy gave us two main figures, Mr. Ackroyd fields a good dozen.  The most prominent is Mark Clare, the capable and earnest leader of an archaeological team that, as the novel opens, is preparing to excavate a neolithic tomb in Dorset's Pilgrin Valley.  The others -- all of whose lives are, in some way, affected by the digging -- include Evangeline Tupper, a civil servant who has come from London to oversee the dig; Joey Hanover, a music-hall comedian who has come to Pilgrin Valley to retire; and the rustic Mints, father and son, whose people have lived in the valley for generations, and who appear to have an ominous knowledge of the tomb and its contents.  Indeed, as the dig proceeds, Mr. Ackroyd seeks to create a sense of mystery and menace centering on both the tomb and the Mints.  We are meant to understand, too, that there is some abstruse connection between Mark's underground explorations and astronomer Damian Fall's probings in the other direction.  For a time, in fact, Mark suspects the crypt to be that of an ancient astronomer.  Hardly a page goes by without a heavy reminder that this novel treats big issues: man and nature, life and death, time and space.  Yet he does so chiefly by having his characters utter reams of windy, fatuous pseudo-profundities about the Earth and the cosmos.  Damian observes, for instance, that "the stars take on the shapes we choose for them. . . .  They become the images of our own selves, shining down and comforting us."  And Joey reflects that the stars "are not fires above us but souls, the souls of those who came before us and light our way. . . .  They are the word for far.  They are the word for dream."  Melodramatic overstatement of this sort is the rule here.  Damian sits "crouched under the vast emptiness of the universe."  The word time is Mr. Ackroyd's tireless refrain: "Time.  Past time.  Future time.  Imaginary time.  Other times curving around them."  Like Hardy, Mr. Ackroyd writes a rather unpolished prose.  Yet whereas Hardy's stylistic coarseness suggests a guileless man struggling to convey a difficult and enigmatic vision, Mr. Ackroyd's suggests sheer sloppiness.  Too often, moreover, he seems condescending toward his characters and glib about the immense abstractions he addresses.  Only rarely does the novel flicker into life.  While a couple of the characters are occasionally plausible, most are one-dimensional, and a few are outright disasters.  Joey's wife, Floey, for example, is little more than a fountain of unamusing malapropisms: "a wild fruit chase," "The Hound of the D'Urbervilles."  Evangeline, eternally and hyperbolically, professes the most obviously insincere emotions, proclaiming everything in sight the most "bizarre" or "wonderful" of its kind that she has ever seen.  This routine reaches overkill almost immediately.  The only letup comes when Evangeline is with her lover, Hermione Crisp, whom she calls Baby Doll.  But it's hardly a pleasant change, since Mr. Ackroyd's apparent main purpose in these scenes is to squeeze cheap laughs, a la Kingsley Amis, out of the idea of lesbianism.  The intended joke is that while Hermione wears a suit and tie and resembles "a company director with a crewcut," Evangeline considers her "the essence of femininity" and says things like "Baby Doll always looks her best in something frilly."  This gag is not only unfunny but offensive.  Nobody undergoes anything remotely resembling development.  At the end of the novel, one is left wondering: Why these people?  Why these traits, these quirks, these personal histories?  For these folks' widely divergent attributes don't add up to anything; they merely coexist.  There's no shape to it at all.  Nor does Mr. Ackroyd work up much genuine suspense in regard to the mysteries of the tomb -- a major failing, for he makes liberal use of the supernatural to plug up holes in his plot and to account for inconsistencies of characterization.  For all of Mr. Ackroyd's patent desire to convince us that he is communicating a transcendent vision, there's little vision here, and altogether too much mystical posturing.  ---  Mr. Bawer is a free-lance writer living in New York.  When Kirk Kerkorian agreed to sell MGM/UA Communications Co. to Qintex Group for $1.5 billion Friday, it was viewed as one of his shrewdest deals yet -- and the apparent end of an unusual last-minute bidding war between two Australian moguls, Rupert Murdoch and Christopher Skase.  But the sale has left Hollywood buzzing with questions about how MGM/UA engineered the final bidding.  People familiar with the bidding say Mr. Murdoch's News Corp. and its Fox Inc. subsidiary complain they were led to believe that a News Corp. bid of $1.4 billion would be accepted quickly by the MGM/UA board.  It also isn't yet clear how Mr. Skase's Qintex Group, an Australian operator of resorts and a large Australian television network, is going to pay for MGM/UA, one of the oldest movie studios.  On Friday, MGM/UA announced it had reached a revised agreement with Qintex to sell the company for $25 a share, or a total of $1.5 billion.  That topped News Corp.'s surprise bid on Wednesday of $23.16 a share, or $1.4 billion, and an earlier Qintex agreement in March to buy the company for $20 a share, or about $1.1 billion.  Analysts say Mr. Kerkorian, who has now signed a binding agreement to sell his 82% stake to Qintex, has once again managed to get a hefty premium for one of his assets.  "It's a new high benchmark," says Alan Kassan, an analyst at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. Qintex is "paying 13 to 14 times a best-case cash flow.  It's a very high price."  This won't be the first time Mr. Kerkorian has come out ahead after buying Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer 20 years ago.  Since then he has sold, repurchased and resold pieces of the studio, augmenting his fortune.  Mr. Kerkorian began trying to sell MGM/UA some 18 months ago, and a long list of companies expressed an interest, including Walt Disney Co., MCA Inc., and Davis Cos., controlled by Marvin Davis.  But many of those who negotiated with Mr. Kerkorian said he frequently vacillated over what he was willing to sell.  He also seemed determined to hold on to the famous MGM lion logo.  Sources say Qintex wanted to buy the whole company but was rebuffed by Mr. Kerkorian.  In March, Mr. Kerkorian agreed to sell the company to Qintex but only on the condition that he could buy back certain MGM assets, such as the logo, the MGM library of 34 films and the MGM television group, among other things -- making the effective purchase price for Qintex about $600 million.  But Hollywood soon became rife with rumors that Mr. Skase was having difficulty raising the money.  And although Qintex announced that it had bank commitments of $400 million and was negotiating with equity partners, Mr. Kerkorian became nervous.  He also began to consider, once again, selling the company as a whole.  Outsiders speculate he may have become less optimistic about running MGM as a small studio at a time when many independent movie producers are failing.  But sources say it was primarily his nervousness over the ability of Qintex to come up with the financing that led MGM/UA to reopen talks with News Corp. and Fox Inc.  In March, Mr. Murdoch's companies lost out to Qintex after bidding $19.80 a share.  But the Qintex agreement gave MGM/UA the right to terminate the pact if it accepted a higher bid.  "Since Kerkorian was going to ask for more money {for the whole company}, he wanted a solid buyer," says a person close to the negotiations.  Mr. Kerkorian couldn't be reached for comment.  An MGM/UA spokeswoman said: "The merger agreement allowed us to continue our discussions with Fox and, given the nature of the entertainment community, we were often in contact with them."  Other officials at MGM/UA declined to comment.  Officials at News Corp. and Fox Inc. also declined to comment.  People close to the negotiations say News Corp. and Fox Inc. were led by MGM/UA to believe that if they made an offer at an agreed upon price, the acquisition would be assured.  News Corp. officials "were invited to bid.  They were told that their {$23.16-a-share} bid had been accepted.  They were told that if they made a deal by {a certain} date, the company would be theirs," says one insider.  "We thought we had it," Mr. Murdoch said in an interview with the Financial Times of London.  Although he indicated that he would be flying to Los Angeles to meet with Mr. Kerkorian, Mr. Murdoch said: "We aren't going to pay $26 a share."  Mr. Skase couldn't be reached for comment.  David Evans, president and chief executive officer of Qintex Entertainment, which is affiliated with Qintex Group, says that after announcing the Fox offer, MGM/UA invited Qintex to participate in a bid.  Mr. Skase apparently managed to allay Mr. Kerkorian's fears about his financing by disclosing more details about his negotiations with potential equity partners.  Qintex also agreed to deliver an irrevocable letter of credit for $50 million as part of the final agreement.  To finance the bid, Mr. Evans says Qintex expects to increase its previously announced bank commitments of $400 million and is continuing to negotiate with "substantial companies with clout" overseas about equity partnerships.  He "doubts very much" that Qintex will sell any part of MGM/UA to help finance the acquisition.  Analysts point out that Qintex is assuming $400 million in MGM/UA debt in the transaction.  And they add that the movie business requires big cash outlays.  Mr. Kerkorian will receive roughly $1.2 billion from Qintex for his stake in MGM/UA, including the 10 million preferred shares he holds.  He controls almost all of the preferred shares, for which Qintex is paying $18 a share.  On Friday, MGM/UA shares closed at $22.625, up $1.875, in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  Four competing reorganization plans were filed in the Public Service Co. of New Hampshire bankruptcy case, setting the stage for hard bargaining among various parties over the utility's future.  None of the proposals has yet won the support of all the parties, and the failure to compromise could lead to a prolonged battle.  Still unresolved is the key question in the case: whether rates will be increased enough to satisfy the interests of investors in the troubled utility, or whether increases will be held down in the interests of the utility's customers.  The proposed reorganization plans have stated values of $1.9 billion to $2.2 billion for PS of New Hampshire.  Creditors and shareholders have said they won't support a reorganization with a value of less than $2.2 billion.  Wilbur Ross, a representative of the equity holders, said, "We're not trying to gouge, but there is a level below which it doesn't make sense for us."  But state officials, arguing that investors shouldn't benefit at the expense of ratepayers, have indicated that the level of rate increases needed to provide that value might be unacceptable.  All the proposed reorganization plans, with minor variations, foresee secured and unsecured creditors receiving full payment of their total claims of about $1.72 billion in either cash, new debt or stock, depending on the offer.  But what's left for shareholders would be sharply reduced under the plans offering lower values.  The newest of the four plans comes from United Illuminating Co., New Haven, Conn., which proposed merging with PS of New Hampshire into a new holding company.  The plan proposes seven annual rate increases of 5.5% a year, and has a value of $2.2 billion for the New Hampshire utility, United Illuminating said.  Such a merger would combine the two companies with the largest stakes in the long-delayed Seabrook, N.H., nuclear plant, PS of New Hampshire with 35.6% and United Illuminating with 17.5%.  PS of New Hampshire also filed an internal reorganization plan, backed by creditors and shareholders, that would require similar rate increases and values the company at $2.2 billion.  Unsecured creditors would get 38% to 45% of the common stock in the reorganized company, existing preferred shareholders would get 41% to 43% and the stake of existing common holders would be diluted to 13% to 19%.  While endorsing the internal reorganization, investor groups indicated that they likely could support the United Illuminating proposal as well.  However, some investor groups oppose the other two plans.  These are an offer by Northeast Utilities, Hartford, Conn., to buy PS of New Hampshire for $1.9 billion and raise rates 5.5% for seven years, and a bid by New England Electric Service, Marlborough, Mass., to buy the company for $2 billion as part of a plan that would require rate increases of only 4.8% annually for seven years.  State of New Hampshire officials, who earlier said that seven years of 5.5% increases would be acceptable, have indicated that they now favor the New England Electric plan because it provides for the lowest rate increases.  They also contend that the internal reorganization plan proposed by PS of New Hampshire management has hidden costs that could result in increases a decade from now.  Exactly how the differences between the state and investors might be resolved isn't clear.  Under bankruptcy law, creditors and shareholders have a say in approving a reorganization plan, but the state doesn't.  However, state officials could seek to block or delay rate increases that exceed the amount they deem acceptable.  If an agreement can't be reached, creditors have threatened to try to circumvent the state by supporting an effort to reorganize PS of New Hampshire into a federally regulated holding company.  That, however, could lead to lengthy litigation because of opposition by the state.  Because PS of New Hampshire is the first major utility in 50 years to file for Chapter 11 protection from creditors, there isn't any precedent as to whether a utility can use bankruptcy proceedings to switch to federal regulation without the normally required state approval.  PS of New Hampshire filed for Chapter 11 status under the federal Bankruptcy Code in January 1988 because it wasn't able to make interest payments on its huge debt, much of which was taken on to finance its Seabrook stake.  Wall Street may be hot for UAL Corp., but the flying public hasn't been so bullish lately on its United Airlines unit.  Throughout the summer, United's service has been a disaster -- with about four out of ten of its flights arriving late or cancelled.  The carrier recorded its worst on-time performance since the Department of Transportation started keeping track two years ago -- and has ranked consistently at or near last place among airlines.  The carrier's on-time arrivals of flights from 119 airports toppled to 63% in June from 74% in May.  In July, the number dipped to 62%.  United also accounted for almost half of the flights on what Department of Transportation nickname the "List of Shame:" flights that arrive late at least 80% of the time.  The average delay on the 60 United flights: 47 minutes and 42 seconds.  Things got so bad this summer that the Department of Transportation called United executives to find out what was wrong.  "They took a nose dive," says a department official.  Last year during the same months, United recorded a respectable 81%.  Internal department analysis shows that American Airlines, a unit of AMR Corp. and United's biggest rival in Chicago, trounced United's hourly on-time performance into O'Hare Airport in July.  United's recent performance is even prompting jokes on late night television.  Comedian Jay Leno fumed about a late flight.  He wouldn't name the carrier, he said, but "the passengers were real United" in their anger.  United's problems apparently have a combination of causes, including bad weather at some of the East Coast airports that it uses and its heavy reliance on Chicago O'Hare, where traffic often gets jammed up.  But the biggest cause has been a slowdown by United's pilots union in protest of management demands for contract concessions.  The pilots campaign, coined "withdrawal of enthusiasm," involved, among other things, taxiing slowly for take-off, ordering elaborate maintenance checks between flights and flying with so much fuel that planes were slowed by their weight.  Under still another tactic, labeled "Sweet Sixteen," the pilots purposely arrived more than 15 minutes late; the point at which the transportation department marks a flight late in the monthly on-time statistics it releases to the public.  Because of the time wasted by the delays, many pilots exhausted the monthly overtime they were allowed to work under government regulations.  Crew shortages began to crop up.  A flight from Newark International Airport was stalled two hours because a pilot had to be flown in from Chicago.  The same week, a flight from Chicago managed to take off after a long delay only because an off-duty pilot, a "dead head," in the passenger's section volunteered to join the cockpit crew.  A United Airlines spokesman declined to comment on the carrier's performance.  Things are likely to get better because the pilots are backing away from their campaign as they get closer to buying out UAL.  But the summer's problems may have done permanent damage in exhausting the loyalty of some flyers.  Gary Curtis, a Chicago businessman, is peeved at United because he was stranded for an hour on a plane that needed a light bulb replaced.  Finally, Mr. Curtis yanked out his cellular phone from his briefcase and booked a seat on American Airlines.  "I grabbed my baggage from overhead, walked off the plane and retrieved my ticket," he fumes.  "I made my mile walk to American.  Half an hour later, I was on an American flight leaving for Los Angeles.  That's survival in the air."  Says Mr. Curtis: "I decided if I want to get somewhere on time, I have to fly somebody else."  Thomas G. Ford, a dentist from Orlando, Fla., purposely avoided flying United on a trip last week to San Francisco because he got fed up with its delays this summer.  Mr. Ford says that as he boarded United planes it wasn't unusual to see a mechanic crowded in the cockpit with the crew.  He says, "It's unnerving."  The number of complaints filed with the Department of Transportation about United increased late this summer.  The biggest gripe: flight problems such as delays and cancellations.  Another sign of trouble is that some travel agents report that United is doling out coupons to mollify disgruntled passengers.  "I've had a rush of United vouchers in the last two weeks," says Luci Alvarez of Great Escape Travel in downtown Chicago.  United is also scoring poorly among seasoned travelers tracked by an Orlando, Fla., newsletter that's being flooded with complaints.  "Overall, it's dismal," says Michael Ashington-Pickett, editor and publisher.  One of the latest tricks in the drug war is "boot camp" for drug offenders.  Newspapers and television show young men in dungarees and T-shirts doing pushups or marching while being watched by a "tough but fair" drill instructor.  It all looks very impressive -- at least to people whose idea of boot camp comes from movies like "Private Benjamin."  If you've been through boot camp, however, the idea is someplace between silly and scary -- maybe some of each.  To begin with, military boot camp isn't set up to straighten people out.  It accustoms recruits to being part of a group, makes them want to be part of a larger group, gives them a common set of experiences they can build on, and teaches them to work together.  The most important thing drill instructors hold out to every recruit is the promise that if they play by the rules, they will be rewarded.  They will wear a uniform, contribute to society, be respected.  What's the promise of drug "boot camp"?  That the participants can go back to their old neighborhoods?  That they can wear an "I survived drug boot camp" T-shirt?  Or do people really expect that each offender sent to boot camp will come back several weeks later committed to steady work, voting and paying taxes?  Sure, everyone has heard about the former juvenile delinquent who credits military boot camp with turning him around.  But I can't think of many like that.  The young men who do best in boot camp -- and subsequent military service -- almost always enter boot camp pretty squared away.  They come into the military with a self-confidence and self-discipline that the drill instructors build on.  The juvenile delinquents, wise guys and goof-offs are often the first people to foul up so badly that even the Marines give up on them.  What's going to happen to a platoon full of delinquents, shirkers and misfits?  Sure they can be punished -- kept from dessert, made to do pushups until their arms ache.  They can be given short haircuts and early reveille, and they can be yelled at incessantly.  But punishment has never been the purpose of boot camp.  The 50 pushups for a dirty rifle are an incentive to keep the rifle clean henceforth.  And the controlled rage of drill instructors works with young men who, for the most part, are not used to being bellowed at by authority figures.  It works because it is different.  But will real or feigned anger work with people who think rage is the norm, and that punching, kicking or stabbing is an accepted way to show displeasure?  The other thing about boot camp is that most of it is not marching, close order drill, inspection or pushups.  It's school.  It begins with aptitude tests to find candidates to learn electronics, engine repair, meteorology and other skills.  After that, it's classes in basic military knowledge -- how to recognize people of different rank, how to salute, to wear the uniform.  There are classes in first aid, in military history, in hygiene, in wearing a gas mask.  Sailors learn to tie knots, to fight fires.  Marine recruits learn to use a rifle.  Everyone learns a new terminology.  But what are the lessons in drug boot camp?  What potentials do we test for?  What skills does society need?  Riflery is out, of course.  Do we substitute how to make change?  Fill out a job application?  Can we teach the skills in six or 12 weeks?  Can we guarantee they'll be used?  Another part of boot camp is medical.  Every recruit receives a physical and sees a dentist.  Men with poor eyesight are fitted for glasses.  Overweight people are given diets.  All to a good end: healthy people work better, fight better.  Do we do the same for drug boot camp?  Give the recruits eye exams and make sure they become stronger and healthier?  So they'll work better?  Fight better?  Work at what?  Fight at what?  Fight whom?  That's the scary part: Because there's one other thing you get from boot camp -- a sense of kinship with your fellow recruits.  That makes sense if you're staffing an infantry battalion, an aircraft carrier or a naval station.  You want people who'll stick together, be willing to risk their lives for one another.  But what if you send people with those values back to the same environment they came from -- back to a place of no jobs, no future, no mission?  What happens if the people you've just trained are stronger and healthier than they once were and there's no one to fight except the police?  No battles to win except the ones they start?  What happens when the drug users and the drug dealers, the muggers and the thieves apply the lessons of close order drill, standing watch and self-discipline to the professions that sent them to boot camp in the first place?  Boot camp's a good idea -- for the military.  It should stay there.  ---  Mr. Earls, who lives in Middlefield, Conn., spent 11 weeks in Navy boot camp many years ago.  N.V. Philips Gloeilampenfabrieken may sell off part of its 90%-owned Polygram B.V. recording-company subsidiary in a public share offer within a few months.  Philips Chairman Cornelius Van der Klugt says the Netherlands company is waiting for the right moment to launch a sale and that Philips will be able to say something more definitive about it within a few months.  Polygram is the third-largest recording company in the world.  A Philips spokesman Friday, added that during the past month or so, the company firmed up its intention for a Polygram share offer, but that "the timing still isn't certain, although it could be within the next few months."  Neither the Philips spokesman nor Mr. Van der Klugt would say how much of Polygram would be up for sale.  Analysts tend to expect at least 20% of the record company will be floated and listed on the stockmarket during the next year or so.  Scott Whitlock, the ex-lawyer who manages Honda Motor Co.'s big assembly plant here, looked out across the throng of workers at the end of the assembly line last Thursday to celebrate the launch of the 1990 Accord.  "This is the car that's going to support us and satisfy our customers for the next four years," Mr. Whitlock declared.  "This is our future."  Mr. Whitlock wasn't exaggerating.  The Accord accounts for nearly half of the company's annual U.S. sales.  Its success is a must if Honda is to make its U.S. subsidiary a fully self-reliant operation, in everything from design to engineering to manufacturing.  And this year's Accord, the trend-setting compact car of the 1980s, enters the midsized market.  For the first time, Ford Motor Co.'s competitive-analysis studies pit the Accord against Ford's twin flagships, the Taurus and Sable.  The Japanese assault on the U.S. luxury-car market has grabbed the spotlight, but just beneath all that glitter, Honda is aiming its bread-and-butter Accord at the heart of Detroit's home market: midsized, midpriced, family cars.  Honda not only plans a new Accord sedan, but next fall will introduce an Accord station wagon, designed in part to answer the prayers of dealers who have pleaded for a vehicle that can keep Honda families from defecting to minivans or Taurus wagons.  Other Japanese auto makers are taking aim at the same family market.  Little wonder, then, that Honda's rivals, who have eaten the Accord's dust for a decade, are sniping that this time, the new Accord looks bland.  "People say all Hondas look alike, and they kind of do," says Charles M. Jordan, General Motors Corp.'s vice president of design.  "The design of the 1990 Accord disappoints me.  I expected more from Honda."  Such words reflect the dogfight in the middle of the car market.  "The Japanese now have a more or less full product line, and what's going to happen in the next five years is hand-to-hand combat in every market segment," says Bernard Campbell, an auto analyst with DRI/McGraw-Hill in Lexington, Mass.  The Big Three not only will be fighting the Japanese assault from overseas, but from new factories in North America that allow them to avoid import restrictions and currency fluctuations.  The 1990 Accord, which will be unveiled officially tomorrow in Nashville, Tenn., is the most prominent symbol of the new Japanese wave.  The engines and automatic transmissions all will be built in Ohio, making the Accord a "domestic" car by government and industry standards.  In fact, Honda marketing officials want to enter the Accord in Motor Trend magazine's 1990 Car of the Year competition as a domestic model.  But it's more than U.S.-made engines and parts that make the 1990 Accord different from its predecessors.  Consider, for example, the distance between the new Accord's front and rear wheels.  It's 107.1 inches -- one inch longer than a Ford Taurus, and just half an inch shorter than a Chevrolet Lumina sedan.  With that wheel base, the new Accord offers as much leg room and head room, and nearly as much shoulder room, as those mainstream Detroit cars.  To put this growth in perspective, Honda's current compact Civic is bigger than the original Accord that made its debut in 1976.  The Accord's all-new 2.2 liter, four-cylinder engine puts out as much as 130 horsepower -- just five horsepower less than the Lumina's 3.1 liter V-6 engine, and 10 less than a V-6-equipped Taurus that weighs 100 pounds more.  The reason: Instead of adding extra cylinders, Honda is giving the Accord four valves a cylinder instead of the typical two valves Detroit uses.  Honda's top U.S. marketing official, Thomas Elliott, downplays the challenge his new car presents to Detroit.  "Primarily, our buyer is an import nameplate buyer, even though the Accord is a domestic car," he says.  But even if Honda's only concern was Japanese rivals, it would still be making the Accord bigger and more powerful.  Toyota Motor Corp.'s Camry, designed to compete head-on with the Accord, already offers midsized-car buyers the option of buying an advanced, multivalve V-6 engine.  It's likely that when the Camry is redesigned for 1992, it also will join the Accord in offering midsized roominess.  Nissan Motor Co.'s redesigned Maxima sedan, though more expensive at about $18,000 than the Accord is expected to be, challenges full-sized Big Three cars like the Buick LeSabre.  And Nissan's newly redesigned Accord-fighter, the Stanza, now boasts a 138-horsepower four-cylinder engine that's more powerful than the V-6 in Chevy's Lumina.  Even the smaller Japanese auto companies, such as Subaru of America Inc. and Mitsubishi Motors Corp., are weighing in with cars that are plush, powerful and nearly as roomy as a midsized Oldsmobile.  "They're coming into our market," says Michael Grimaldi, Oldsmobile's controller.  "We're going to have to fight like hell."  Honda officials won't release 1990 Accord prices until tomorrow.  But Mr. Elliott says that since the car is aimed at the "$12,000-to-$18,000 price range," he expects prices to rise some 4% to 5% from 1989 levels.  At that rate, the cheapest 1990 Accord DX model will have a base sticker price close to around $12,400, up from $11,770 in 1989.  By comparison, the preliminary price for the cheapest 1990 Taurus is $12,594, up 6.9% from 1989.  The Taurus is getting a standard air bag; the Accord comes with an automatic safety belt instead.  The Lumina Euro sedan, equipped with an engine comparable in performance to the new Accord's, starts at $14,240, up 3.4% from the car's introductory price this spring.  But sticker prices won't mean much in a market in which supply, in the form of North American car assembly capacity, is 10% to 20% greater than the expected 1990 demand of about 10 million cars.  The Big Three almost certainly will slap rebates on 1990 models.  Chevy is already offering a $750 rebate on the Lumina sedan.  Until this year, the Accord's success and its image as a trend-setting automobile allowed Honda to boost its sales and market share without resorting to sales incentives.  But that abruptly changed last April.  To counter slumping sales, Honda was forced to offer its first-ever discounts on Accord, thinly disguised as $100 to $300 a car advertising subsidies paid to dealers.  Then, in July, Honda offered as much as $350 a car in incentives to dealers who met certain sales quotas.  The money has allowed the Accord to maintain its record of seven straight years of sales growth since 1982.  Honda will probably sell more than 370,000 Accords this year, compared with 195,000 in 1982.  But incentives also have contributed to a rare earnings slide at Honda.  Thus the acid test for the new Accord will be whether Honda can avoid offering any more discounts.  Honda officials insist that they won't have to do that.  But they aren't taking many chances.  "We're increasing the advertising budget 25% for 1990, even though our sales projection is only up 5% to 6%," Mr. Elliott says.  Such caution appears wise.  U.S. car sales, overall, are expected to decline next year.  Also, a few Honda dealers and onetime partisans in the car-buff press are grumbling that Honda is losing its trailblazing edge.  "The (new Accord's functional and mechanical brilliance doesn't carry over to the styling," complains Motor Trend in an otherwise positive review.  Honda officials retort that the Accord's target buyers aren't looking for radical styling.  Executives also hint that Honda's 1990 advertising will throw barbs at competitors who've tried to copy the Accord.  But until the sales returns come in, the folks here are wary of bragging.  "We can't say, 'Oh, we're great,'" says Mr. Whitlock, as he strides around his plant monitoring the start of 1990 Accord production.  "We've got to keep working on it."  Brand names are hard to beat.  But that doesn't stop some upstarts from trying.  Federal Express took on the venerable UPS with a vengeance.  Pan Am boldly challenged the Eastern Shuttle.  Colgate is going up against Crest toothpaste.  And eventually some U.S. manufacturer is going to challenge the Sony Trinitron legend with claims of a sharper picture tube.  What are some of the secrets of tackling a product that has strong brand loyalty -- or recapturing it if your customers are being stolen away?  One landmark case has distilled the tempest in a cordial glass as the world's two leading makers of the liqueur sambuca contend for the U.S. market.  In a surprise attack, Molinari -- the leader in Italy but little known here -- startled predominant Sambuca Romana by doubling U.S. sales with an approach that ended up looking like a political campaign.  As a first step, posters were placed in New York City subways and, though not targeting a minority, all were in Italian.  An attention-grabbing marketing campaign was just part of the picture.  When it comes to breaking entrenched brand loyalty, a total marketing-communications approach is required.  With this in mind, Molinari's New York agency, MG & Messina Advertising, positioned Molinari to take advantage of a 200% increase in all Italian product sales in the U.S. (from $5.8 billion in 1983 to $11.7 billion in 1987).  Buyers of high-quality Italian items were becoming sophisticated enough to choose, for example, between brands of olive oil.  MG & Messina's public-relations consultant Steve Agins recalls that Molinari sought to ride the tide by creating a "best brand" image.  Mr. Agins adds: "It's crucial that an image is backed by quality convincingly demonstrated."  To this end Molinari claimed that only its sambuca was designated "Extra" by an Italian judge for its "superior ingredients."  But what has solidified Molinari's position is its competitor's failure to respond and blunt the challenge.  Instead, Romana continued advertising the myth of improving one's luck by placing coffee beans in a glass of sambuca (something that did not distinguish Romana from its competitor).  Agile Molinari swiftly struck again with aggressive headlines: "Molinari doesn't need a myth to be appreciated"; "Instead of quality, they offer coffee beans"; and, "If you can appreciate the difference between a myth and a tradition. . . ."   Despite mounting evidence of Molinari's success (although it doesn't offer specifics on the number of cases sold), Romana doesn't appear eager to counterattack.  "We have no plans to change anything," says Anthony Foglio, vice president and general manager of Morgan Furze Ltd., Romana's importers.  "We built the category and will continue to be the leader."  In contrast, Federal Express's managers recommend the opposite approach.  Federal Express's marketing vice president, Mike Glenn, says: "We built the overnight category, but we are absolutely not going to rest on laurels.  We act on the assumption that competitors are going to be successful in everything."  Since its start-up in 1973, Federal Express has recognized that success is built upon the same rule as in the sambuca case: Image comes first.  This same thinking applies to marketshare won by exploiting a new technology.  Federal Express improved overnight service with an innovation that permitted instant package-tracing.  Instead of relegating the system only to internal use, they made the tracking information immediately available to customers.  This was largely responsible for Federal Express's rapid rise (today a 30%-plus share, with sales of $4.6 billion, compared with powerhouse UPS's 15%).  Mr. Glenn says, "Status of package proved as important as a delivery itself, because it gives customers a feeling of control."  PR-wise managers fed positive information about Federal Express's package tracing to the media, which praised Federal Express's abilities, thereby further solidifying customer loyalty.  Meanwhile UPS, the industry leader in private package delivery, elected to maintain its long-successful, low-profile image.  Federal Express thus grew virtually unchallenged for more than a decade.  UPS management now recognizes the importance of a greater emphasis on public relations to mount a counteroffensive.  UPS marketing manager Joe Pyne says: "UPS is 80 years old.  But yesterday's brand loyalty is not enough."  After listening more closely to customers to discover how to improve its service, UPS's goal is to become the category's technology leader.  In other words, it is borrowing from its competitor.  In a bellwether for major market-share battles to come, Colgate-Palmolive is challenging Procter & Gamble -- the company that wrote the book on capturing brand loyalty -- as it moves within striking distance of P&G's number-one U.S. position in the billion-dollar toothpaste business.  In three years Colgate has come from 50% behind to within 12%, or six share points, of P&G's Crest.  Colgate management is highly media responsive.  But falling into the same trap we have seen elsewhere, P&G management remains reclusive.  According to P&G spokesman Bill Dobson, the company strives to remain constant with policies effective since 1961.  Doug Meyer, Colgate's U.S. oral-care division general manager, says Crest's market share based on brand loyalty won't survive.  And, in multipronged attacks -- which portray Colgate as a "Wise Choice" and level salvos of complaints against Crest that were filed with the American Dental Association and the Food and Drug Administration -- Colgate is eroding P&G claims.  Most recently it forced suspension of a major campaign touting the fluoride superiority of Crest.  And Colgate says it is equal in endorsements, so P&G won't have the slogan "the dentists' choice" much longer.  The Crest-Colgate battle emphasizes the elements that are particularly important in a tight race for brand loyalty: 1) swift management response both to media and to the marketplace; 2) ability to create a perception of quality; 3) maximized spending.  This new concept of "Megamarketing," applied to a quality product at a fair price, makes capturing brand loyalty not a mystery, but a challenge.  ---  Mr. Harrington is head of a Wilton, Conn., consulting firm.  Forecasters puzzling over whether the economy's eventual landing will prove hard or soft are beginning to harbor doubts about the cushioning ability of an important shock absorber: the businesses that provide services.  Most analysts continue to hold the traditional view that the economy's growing service sector will tend, as in the past, to soften the impact of any new business downturn.  "Service enterprises are apt to be more stable over the course of the business cycle, and this should help reduce the depth and length of future recessions," declares Geoffrey H. Moore, director of Columbia University's Center for International Business Cycle Research.  But some economists are becoming less sanguine about service firms as a recessionary buffer.  While "service companies still tend to be more resistant to recessions than businesses generally, some services are growing more cyclical than they used to be," remarks Steven R. Malin, an economist at the Conference Board, a non-profit research group in New York.  "People who advertise don't try to spit into the wind; when sales are soft, they cut ad budgets," he says.  "As ad firms grow, they're more affected by the cyclicality of ad buying."  He adds: "Any firms that have become more capital intensive -- securities firms and real-estate companies are examples -- have also become more cyclical."  The tendency of service businesses -- at least so far -- to be less vulnerable in recessions reflects partly their not having to cope with the inventory pileups that typically plague manufacturing firms.  Service expenses such as health care and shelter also are less easily postponed when the economy turns sour than, say, buying a new car or television set.  Service jobs, moreover, are often hard to eliminate; even in a recession, a pair of scissors needs a barber.  Such factors have clearly served to cushion recent recessions.  Jobs in service businesses, in sharp contrast to jobs in general, increased in every recession of the past two decades.  Over the course of the latest recession of 1981-82, service-industry employment rose about 200,000, against a 2.7 million drop in goods-producing jobs; even so, overall unemployment soared to nearly 11% from about 7%.  Analysts who fear that such a cushioning may not materialize in any new economic downturn note that many service firms, like manufacturing companies, have struggled to improve efficiency in recent years.  In the process, some service jobs once deemed essential are no longer so.  Examples range from computer-operated trains at major airports that can run without an engineer to home facsimile machines that can do the work of messengers and mail deliverers.  Looking ahead, Mr. Malin of the Conference Board ticks off several service occupations that he believes may eventually be wiped out.  On his list are librarians and middle-management secretaries, whose work can be done by computers; dentists who specialize in cavities, for which preventatives now exist; and keyboard operators, whose work can be done by optical-scanning devices.  "I gave up my own secretary," the economist says, "when my computer took over such chores as putting mailing labels on my correspondence."  Computers, he adds, enabled the Conference Board recently "to cut our chart-room staff to only four people from about 15."  The fortunes of many service companies, in addition, have grown increasingly entwined with those of manufacturing concerns, which recessions normally hit hardest.  Behind this is a push by manufacturers to focus more on actual production and to farm out service-type chores to service companies.  "If an auto maker lays off 5% of its work force, we have to flex downward too, though not quite as sharply since we have equipment that must go on being serviced, even if it isn't handling quite as many people," reports Joseph Neubauer, chairman of Philadelphia-based ARA Holding Co.  ARA, which employs 120,000, provides such services as laundry work, food supply and health and child care to scores of companies.  With annual sales of about $4 billion, the firm has "greatly benefited from more and more manufacturers farming out servicing responsibilities, which we can do more efficiently because it's our specialty," Mr. Neubauer says.  Eastman Kodak Co. recently farmed out its personal-computer operations to a service concern, Businessland Inc. Kodak is in the photographic-products business, a company official says, not the computer business.  Service companies, more so than corporations in general, have gone deeply into debt in recent years, and this also renders them more vulnerable in any new recession.  In 1979, when as now the economy had been expanding for years, the total debt of service companies amounted to 20% of their combined assets, while the corresponding debt-to-assets rate for corporations generally was nearly 22%.  But by 1987, the latest year available, the ratio for services was almost 30%, while the rate for all corporations was still near 22%.  In the same period, the so-called coverage ratio of service businesses -- their cash flow divided by their interest payments -- fell to 2.3-to-1 from 4.5-to-1.  The coverage ratio for corporations as a whole also declined, but not as sharply -- to 3.1-to-1 from 5.4-to-1.  "The severe deterioration of the service sector's financial health leaves it more vulnerable than in the past in the event of a recession," says Richard W. Kopcke, an economist at the Boston Federal Reserve Bank.  He attributes this balance-sheet decline to "extensive, highly leveraged takeover activity in such service industries as retailing and airlines," as well as a "thirst for capital to expand" at many fledgling but fast-growing service businesses.  Mr. Kopcke also questions the view that in a new recession spending on services would hold up significantly better than spending on manufactured goods.  He cites such service activities as vacation travel and eating at restaurants as "highly postponable items" if the economy slumps.  For all of this, most economists continue to regard the service sector, on balance, as a large cushion in the event the economy finally turns down in coming months.  "Even with the elimination of many service jobs, overall employment in services will keep rising in the next recession simply because of the sector's explosive growth," predicts Scott D. Aguais, an economist for DRI McGraw-Hill.  He estimates that the sector's share of total private employment, now about 64%, will reach 67% within four years.  He also reckons that service productivity gains, negligible of late, will "speed up appreciably and this should help limit inflation" in the service sector.  The importance of the service sector to the economy's continuing growth can be seen in a recent economic forecast by Morgan Stanley & Co.  It projects a rise of 2.4% annually in consumer spending, adjusted for inflation, in the final three months this year.  But within that total is a 1% drop in spending for durable goods, offset by a healthy 3.5% gain in outlays for services, as well as a lesser increase in spending for nondurable items such as food and clothing.  ---  Change in employment levels during periods of recession; in millions of jobs  @ PRIVATE GOODS-  @ SERVICE PRODUCING  @ INDUSTRIES INDUSTRIES  @ Dec. '69-Nov. '70 +0.5 -1.4  @ Nov. '73-Mar. '75 +0.7 -2.7  @ Jan. '80-July '80 +0.2 -1.2  @ July '81-Nov. '82 +0.2 -2.7  @ Source: Center for International Business Cycle Research at Columbia University  Congress has come to rely extensively upon the private enforcement of public purposes.  Private enforcement is fervently defended as an efficient policy instrument and as a participatory, democratic mechanism that allows "concerned citizens" to redress social problems ranging from procurement fraud to environmental pollution.  In truth, the driving force behind the expansion of private enforcement is neither efficiency nor democracy but interest group politics.  In purpose and effect, private enforcement provisions are off-budget entitlement programs for the Democratic Party's political constituencies.  Environmental law, where citizen suit provisions are particularly numerous, provides the best illustration.  Congress wanted citizen suits to be widely utilized, and therefore instructed courts to compensate environmental plaintiffs for their attorneys' fees "when appropriate."  But fee awards are not supposed to produce a profit for enforcers.  Similarly, statutory fines are payable not to the plaintiff but to the U.S. Treasury.  This arrangement ostensibly serves to ensure that citizen-plaintiffs are motivated not by private gain but solely by public, environmental considerations.  In practice, however, advocacy groups -- and only advocacy groups -- can and do reap sizeable rewards under these rules.  Although citizen suits are authorized under almost every federal environmental statute, all but a handful are brought under the Clean Water Act.  Few private actions are filed by unorganized "concerned citizens"; more than two-thirds are mass-produced by highly professional advocacy groups.  Five environmental groups account for more than half of all such actions.  Environmental groups concentrate on the Clean Water Act because this statute makes citizen suits cheaper to bring and to win, and financially more rewarding, than any other environmental statute.  The unique, highly detailed record-keeping system developed under the act reveals each individual polluter's specific violations of regulatory standards.  In less than a day, environmental organizations train student volunteers to scan records and identify infractions.  They then serve large numbers of companies with near-identical, form-letter complaints.  Moreover, the act authorizes district courts to impose civil penalties of up to $25,000 per day.  Legally, these fines are payable to the U.S. Treasury.  However, environmental groups usually threaten targets with an expensive trial, only to settle the matter for a substantially smaller sum -- so long as the defendant agrees to pay an environmental group or cause.  These payments consist of attorneys' fees (which are calculated on the basis of the going rates of for-profit attorneys, thus producing a windfall for low-cost environmental litigators), and of so-called "credit" programs, to be paid for by the alleged violator in lieu of a portion of the fines.  Such programs finance research projects, grants to environmental organizations for "educational" purposes, and land acquisition.  "Credit" payments to environmental groups (although not normally the group bringing the action) may amount to more than $400,000.  For alleged violators, private settlements are usually cheaper than trials or Environmental Protection Agency enforcement actions.  Environmental groups have no interest in obtaining winning fines for the Treasury, and will "trade" even a relatively modest credit project for very high fines.  A reasonably representative analysis of a set of 29 cases in the period from 1983 to May 1985 showed that more than 65% of a combined settlement amount of almost $1 million went to environmental organizations.  Industry representatives have denounced private enforcement actions as extortion; environmental organizations have responded that they care only about the environment.  But the debate about motives misses the point.  Private attorneys general must choose among enforcement targets.  Since the social costs and benefits involved in these decisions are extremely uncertain, private enforcers can calculate them only impressionistically.  The only factors they can and, as long as they face cost constraints, will assess are their own costs and benefits.  The problem is not that enforcers may not be "true" altruists; it is that even the most altruistic enforcers will seek to maximize private rewards, not public benefits.  As a result, environmental organizations pursue economically and environmentally inefficient enforcement strategies.  Like most environmental statutes, the Clean Water Act is written upon the presumption -- the pretense, rather -- that nothing but zero risk will do; it establishes a legal standard of zero discharge.  Hence, the act is easily overenforced. (If applied as written, it would prohibit the preparation of a scotch and water without a permit.) Studies by the EPA and by independent analysts strongly suggest that enforcement of the act generates high economic losses, and that the act is likely the most excessively enforced environmental statute.  Economics aside, the high level of water pollution enforcement may not even be environmentally beneficial.  More likely than not, private enforcement of the Clean Water Act has reduced industry's incentives for voluntary compliance with the law.  It may also have impeded technological innovation by making industry prefer fail-safe equipment to more advanced but untested devices.  And it creates incentives to pollute the air and the land rather than the water.  Although water pollution by towns or sewerage authorities is far more frequent and serious than corporate pollution, not one of the 162 recorded actions brought by environmental groups between 1978 and 1984 was filed against a municipal entity.  A private corporation's capacity for fast, authoritative decision-making makes settlement negotiations less expensive and more profitable than negotiations with government officials who worry about the legality of settlements and about their accountability to the electorate.  Finally, some environmental groups maximize their private rewards by bringing scores of actions not over substantive environmental violations but for non-compliance with the act's voluminous paperwork requirements.  These actions generate tens of thousands of dollars in attorneys' fees but no discernible environmental benefit.  Environmentalists and their patrons in Congress argue that private enforcement must be extensive because the EPA, due to its alleged "capture" by corporate interests or to a lack of resources, systematically underenforces environmental statutes.  In effect, this argument equates more enforcement with better enforcement.  But apart from the fact that environmental statutes are easily overenforced, Congress itself does not believe that increased enforcement would be unquestionably better.  If it did, it would not, as it now does, prohibit profitable enforcement.  For why should the enforcer's motives matter, if every enforcement action generates environmental benefits?  Properly structured, environmental bounty-hunting could improve the environment.  Private attorneys general could be treated like the government's deputies, and be placed under the Justice Department's supervision.  Fee recovery and credit projects could then be abolished; in order to entice private enforcers, the government would make discretionary grants for enforcement actions to environmental groups or, for that matter, to bountyhunters.  Private enforcers would collect adequate rewards, thus securing the benefits of extensive private enforcement; government oversight would prevent excessive or erratic enforcement.  Either a system of limited but strictly altruistic enforcement or a more extensive system of environmental bounty-hunting under executive control would better serve the public than the scheme Congress has adopted, which permits rewards in the form of credit projects, a currency valued only by environmental organizations, while prohibiting "profits."  But only the existing policy permits legislators to confer benefits upon a political constituency.  Through the current system, Congress has managed to establish an environmentalist enforcement cartel: Court-awarded attorney fees and credit projects provide an entitlement program for environmental organizations; the prohibition on profits keeps everyone else out of the enforcement market.  This bizarre arrangement makes no environmental sense.  But then, private rights to sue and object, to complain and to comment, have not sprung up in areas ranging from banking regulation to broadcast licensing to surface mining to housing law because they have been shown to have beneficial results.  They have proliferated because in an era of budget constraints and seemingly permanent Republican control of the White House, the Democratic Party has come to endorse compulsory philanthropy as its idea of voluntarism.  ---  Mr. Greve is executive director of the Center for Individual Rights, a public-interest law firm in Washington, D.C.  An expanded version of this article will appear in the Fall 1989 issue of the Public Interest. 